      "identifier" : [
         "8_06770_95"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "The Western School Journal O (\\' o, nt. q The most perfect character that ever trod the earth was a teacher. 1 love to think of Him ini this character,-that of the Great Teacher; and this ennobles the calling, and leads one neyer to be ashamed of it. In His if e, and method, and exarnple, and consecration, I find . help and encouragement. It is a great thing to be a school-teacher 1 CONVENTION NUMBER Mmiyt 1915 VOL x No. 5",
         "THE WEqSTICRN SOHOOL JOURNAL___ THE ýCANADIAN BANK 0F COMMERCE Nui) OnfFIO, TOROlNTOc *STABLISNED lui Paid-up Capital $15,000,000 Roserve Fund $13O,0000 SIR HDM UND WALKER, C.V,O., LL.D., PrOsident ALEXANDER LAIRD, G;encral Manager JOHN AIRIl, Abat. Gan. Manager V. (J. liIOWN, Sujit. of Central Western Branollem SAVINOS DEPARTMENT Interest Paid on Deposits of One Dollar and Upwards Branches ln WinnIpe\u0026g: MAIN FFICE 391 AIN S rEET{ W. Rowley, Manager MAINOFFIE: 31 MAN STEE! c. 0rdo, Assistant Manager ALEXANDER'AVE., Corner Main 'St. FORT ROUGE, Corner River Ave. and BLAKE ST., Corner Logan Ave. Osborne Street EiLmwoon, 325 Nairn Ave. NORTH WINNIPEG, Cr. Main \u0026 Dufferîn KELVIN ST., Corner Poplar St. PORTAGE Avs,, Corner Carlton NY thought of making a home for yourself some day? Most A ai I of us have dreams of that sort, at times. If YOU have, see us about the Furniture and Carpet part of it. We carry the, - BEST STOCK 0F m- FURNITURE «-IN ALL CANADA School Desks and School Supplies ini stock at reasonable prices. Send for catalogue. JOHN LESLI E WINIPE Klidl =0o 'the W..terf \u0026C!yohoio ol journal whon wrltinu te AdvertisemI",
         "THE SILK MARKET 0F WESTERN CANADA The Fine Showing of Silks and Satins 8t Pobjinson' this season is attracting wiidesPread attention, not only in Win- nPgbtin mnoftelarge cities of Worthy -everything dependable can bfound in their magnificent New Silk ýepart:rent. Ail Ladies advocate 'Robinson%~ for Silks\" because of the large stock carried, and the reasonable Price at which they are sold. ROBINSON 11I!Mi '38,08MAIN sTrREETr WINNIPEG KIndly mention the Western SchooI \u003e~HOME sThé A:-ts Couirse inay ~ fp bp takeil by correspon- dicbut students i desrn to grndnate 1esi ringattend one session. QUEEN9S UNIVERSITY KINGSTON, oNqTARIO ARTS APPLIED SCIENCE tDUCATIOrt éneludinq MEDICINE ENGINEERING SUMMER SCHOOL JULY and AUGUST G. Y. CIIOWN , Reglstrar, Kingston, Ont. 'z4w Mte tru Ocljoo 3ourtial Vor.. X. _____Ni). 5 Contents for May, 1915 EDITORIAL- Plige The Convention.......................151 A rank Statement ....... . : ............151 An Explanation .........................152 GENERAL SESSION- Miiiutes of Mee ting .....................152 President's Address...........153 Some Thoughts on theý Pýrese'nt' Wa. 156 Address of Welcome ....................159 Progress of the Year ...................159 The Moral Emplhasis in Education ...160 What We May Expect of Education ..161 The Tragedy of German Education ...164 Hygiene as Applied to School Pupils .... 166 THE SECOND.ARY SECTION- Minutes................................ 167 Secretary's Report ...................... 168 Committee on English ..................172 Minutes............................ 172 Recommendations...................172 Committee on Modern Languages...173 Sumimaiy of Discussion ............. 173 Recommendations...................174 Conimittee on Science ..................175 Committee on Mathematies.............176 committee on Classics ............. .....178 Comrnittee on HistorY ......... :.... :.....178 Committee on Art............. ......... 179 Committee on Technical Education..180 PAPERS 0F THE SECONDARY SECTION- Industrial Art ............... *'.....*.....181 How to lImprove Agriculttiral Course ..186 Manual Training in Rural Intermediate 187 Ways and Means of Managing Handwork 188 Wood-carving in Graded Schools. ..189 ELEMENTARY SECTION- minutes of General Meeting ..........190 Papers of General Meeting ...........190 Relation of Sehool Garden to School Room .......................... 190 Importance of Woîk of Prirnary Grades.................. ........ 191 Teacher as Cornîunity Leader ...192 Rural Conference- Minutes............................ 193 Time-table of a Rur~al School...193 Handwork In Rural Schools ......... 194 Practical Wrork for Rural Schools ... 196 primary Conference- Minutes............................ 197 Tlusy W ork .............. 197 supplementarY Reading.i Frs Grades......................... 198 Intermediate Confeience- Minutes and SummarY .............200 Senior Conference- . 0 Minutes ...............*..... 0 ........ 20, Rapid and Mental Arlthmtc.r ,\\in and Presentation of Lady of the Lake...................-........ 203 Clasesof nstucton..................203 sehool Exhibit ......... ....... 205 Findiîig Time Iletween Dates...... The Educator Must Know the Ci . 205 B3ook Review.............. *....... 0 Ed.ltor - W. A. MCINTYRE Terms of SubscrIption» PRICE-Per year, in advance, $1.00; single copies 15 cents. POS'T-0FFICE ADDRESS-~Instructions con- cernliig change of address, or discoritinuance of subsoription shotild be sent to reach us before the llrst of the month whefl theY are to go Into effect The exact address to whlch the paper Is dlrected at the tim-e of wrltlflg must always be aiv en, DISCONTINUJANCES-We find that a large majority of our subscrlbers prefer to have the journal contlnued at the expiration of their subscrlpton, so that their fies may not be broken. Like other school publications. the Journal Is contlnued until notice to stop is re- celved and arrearages are pald. Address letters and mnake orders payable to WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL CO. Cor. Elien and William Ste., Winnipeg Journal when wrltlrng to Advertl5ers.",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL, JOURNAL The University of Manitoba WINNIPEG, MANITOBA with the co-operation of afftliated Colleges and through its own Faculty of forty-two ProfessorS, Assistant Professor§, LeeturerS and ,Demonstrators OFFERS COURSES LEADINC TO DECREES in Arts, Science, Medicinle, Engineering (ivil, Electrical and Mechaflical), Architecture, Law and Pharmacy. For iniformnation as Io aiy of these courses, appty Io THE REGISTRAR Manitoba Medic al College 32nd SESSION NOW IN PROGRESS Full courses of Instruction. Well equipped Laboratories in Anatomy, llistology, Pathology and Bacteriology. Tjnexcelled Clinical Facilities. F Olt CALENDAR OF INFORMATION AvPIY TO E. S. pOPHAM, M.D. - - Medical College, WINNIPEG' KindIy mention the Western School Journal when wrltlflg ta Advertisers.",
         "ir: mcçttvn ecbool 3journal (AUTIIORIZF\"D BY P09TMASTER GENERAL, OTTAWA, AS SECOND CLASS MAIL) No. 5j WINNIPEG, MAY, 1915 Editorial THE CONVENTION Tt is not necessai'y to comment on the Nvork of tue Convention. The attend- anee. the interest, tlie practical chiar- acter of the addresses and discussions sPeak for themselves. It will be kaown iu history as the practical convention. Everyone who came to learu must have heeni benefiteci. Those wlio could not corne deserve our syînpathy. Those Who could come and who would not nleed not be referred to at ail. - or- tnnatcly, the number of this kind is ]esseuing from year to ycar. The Secondary Section is to be con- g1ratulated ou itsý attemnpt to reniodel the curriculum: the Elemcntary Section 01u its success iu subdividing into the four conferences. The Journal is very happy to plib-. lish iu some detail the procecdings of the Convention. Tt regrets the n'ees- sity whieh compelled the summarizicg Of practically ail the papers. A FRANK STATEMENT The followinig communication is here given prominence because it may be of liiterest to some readers of the Jour- uial: ''A feast of good things'' may be Said of Profesor Dale's interesting lec- tlurcs. But were they appreciated? 'fes, by some. 'What about those who eane iu late aud left before it wvas Over'? Those who were more engross- ecd in discussing their neiglibour' ' 51riuig hat, nndoubtedly înueh to the speaker 's, disgust? Hie Nývill return highly impressed withi manners Of the west, wvon't; he? Certaînly it waIs ni, education to hiear Professor Dale speakç; his langua\"ge was simple, yet cloquent and fluent- a voice that one coul4 listen to for hours and neyer be fatigucd. Now, of those who fai]ed to atppear at the banquet. rrhey triily nïissed the good wine. But pcrhaps they wcrc of those whio consider thcmsclvcs masters of their work and their language, too? Fondly iinagining that their public sebool education and six mnonths' Nor- mal training has left thein evcrytihing to be desired. Evidently some of those absentees think that thc Convention iS solely for thosc from the country, and do not take to heart the words of that intrepid leader whose naine thc old prophet did not condescend to give: \"'Be -tronig and quit yoursclvcs like mnen, O ye Philistines!'\" The brave words of that nameless captain have wingcd their wvay to us through thirty centuries of confliet. His heartening eall is worth attention, for it means to us: ''Exert yoursclves to learil sone thing uew, to attain a fresli point, to follow a new intcrest!\" Hie who does this ycar by year wvill win a prize more potent than any 'box of acacia wood overlaid with pure gold. The poverty of the- atten\u0026ance of iinmbers of the Association was per- haps due to their feeling like the one wvho rcmarked: \"This is a new coun- try;- we are willing to learil, but show us the man who can teacli us any- thing ! '' VOL. X",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL AN EXPLANATION lit presenting the report of the Con- vention iii this issue, it was founcl neces- sary to summarize most of the papers and to hold over a few. others in order that they might be printed in full in a subsequent issue. Among these is the paper on Wood-Carving in Graded Schools by Miss E. Farrow. Two or three of the papers did nýot ar- rive in time for publication, and a nurn- ber of the addrcsses were iii the forrn of demonstrations, such as those in the intermediate, primary and rural confer- (eces of the E]ementary section. This being convention niumber the special articles and departments arc oinitted. Prizes for poetry competition will be awarded next niontli. The coin- petition is stiil open. General Session MINUTTES 0F MEETING The tenth Convention of the Mani- toba Teachers' Association opened on rFucsday, Apt-il 6th, in the Kelvin Schol.1,.Withi President J. H1. Mulvey in the chair. Mr. Mulvey delivered bis presidential a ddress. Mayor Waugh cxtended a wvelcome fromt the city. Mr. R. Fletcher, Deputy Minister of Education, then spoke on ''The Pro- gress of the Year.'' Mr. C. K. Newcombe, Superintendent of Education, spoke on \"Canada and the Wa r.' Music was provided by the Orchestra of the Provencher Sehool. On Wedniesday afternoon an address w-as delivcred by Rev. W. J. Ilindley on ''Moral Emiplasis in Education.'' This was followed by vocal music front the boys of Provencher Sehool, St. Boniface. Professor J. A. Dale, of McGill Uni- versity, Montreal, then delivered an ad- dress on \"What We May Expeet from Eduication.'' On Wednesday evening in St. Stcph- en 's Church, with Mr. J. T. IHaig, M.P.I\u003e., in thc chair, Prof. Dale deliver- ed a lecture on \"'The Tragedy of Ger- inan Education.\" On Thursday afternoon the only ad- dress was by Dr. J. Halpenny on Hy giene as Applied to Sehool Pupils.\" During this saine session the business of the Convention was transacted. The Secretary read the minutes of the pre- vions meeting. Then followed the Treasurer's statement as aIready print- cd in the Western Sehool Journal. The Committee on Resolutions then report- cd as follows.: (1) IResoived, that it woni(l be a great heip in. the teaching of Engiish, and iead to wider reading on the part of the pupils, if a series of debatcs couid be arranged for be- twcen Sccondlary schools of the Province. If this idea meets with the approvai Of the Association, your eommittee would Sug\" gest that a cominittee be appointed fr111 the English teachers of the Secondary Schoois to select suitable subjeets and arrange a PrO' g1rammie. (2) Resolved, that in the opinion of this Association it is deemned advisable to asic the Department of Education 'to suPPlY free text-books to ail the grades of the publie schoois. And that school boards be required toi s'P, ply ail exercise b ooks and practice papers free to puipils. (3) Resolved, that a hearty vote Of than\u003c8 be exteaded to ail thoso who have il, luy way contribnted to the success of this on vention. (4) Resoived, that a vote of thank, be extended tn the press for the full and fair reports -they have given of, tho proceedings of the Convention. Ail these resolutions wcre adopted.",
         "PRESIDENT'S ADDRESS The Nominating Committee then re- comnended as follows: Hon. President-Hon. G. W. Coldwell. President-Dr. W. A. MeIntyre. lst Vice-President-Mr. H. A. Stokes, Sel- kirk. 2nd Vice-President-Miss Yemen, Souri's. Secretary-P. D. Harris. Treasurer-L. A. Ferguson. Auditor-R H. Smith. Committee--J. H. Mulvey, Winnipeg; R. Goulet, St. Boniface; A. E. Hearn, Winnipeg; W. W. McDonald, Portage la Prairie; Miss *. McDougall, Winnipeg; A. M. Simpson, Brandon; Miss B. Gnnn, Dauphin; F. W. Bal- four, Pilot Mound; A. Weidenhammer, Win- l'Peg; O. T. Gamey, Portage la Prairie; Miss L. Cull, Winnipeg; A. M. Shields, Virden; Miss M. E. Reid, Brandon; A. M. Stevenson, Souris; W. J. Parr, Killarney; Mr. Tufts, Car- rnan; I. Stratton, President Trustees' Asso- 'ation; H. Coxsmith, Secretary Trustees' As- SOciation. The report of the Nominating Com- flittee was adopted. it Was also agreed that the Past Pre- sidents and Presidents of sections be, by virtue of office, members of the Gen- eral Executive. . The Comnittee on the Teachers' Re- tirement Fund then presented the fol- ng report: bu The fund shall be made up of contri- bltions from, (1) Teachers. (2) School Districts. (3) Provincial Government. 2. Contributions must be obligatory upon, aerv'u respect of, ail teachers now in the serice and ail new entrants. 3s Teachers shall pay 2% of salary on ail Salary received. e . hool Districts shall contribute sums equal to those contributed by the teachers tey eiploy bute The Province of Manitoba shall contri- the t s s equal to those contributed by ail teahers in the Province. . The pension shall be - of $ (x\u002b 0) a year. ere ''a'' is the number of full years serv- Id in t province 'b'' is the number of full years' con- tributions made to the fund, and '' is the average salary during the 7. last five years of service. er The pension shall be $500 a year when- er ste above formula would produce a small- aulan, and $1,000 a year whenever the for- 8 Would produce a larger sum. sio N0 teacher shall be eligible for a pen- W o has not served at least 15 years 9the rovince of Manitoba. nale Eleept in cases of permanent disability, Stenhers may not retire before the ago of 60, and female teachers may not retire before the age of 55. 10. In the event of permanent disability, of which proof has been made to the satis- faction of the Board of Control, a pension as deterimined by clauses 6 and 8 may be granted, and clauses 7 and 9 shall not apply, but no disability pension inay exceed $1,000 a year. 11. Teachers withdrawing before the con- pletion of five full years of service shall have no claim upon the fund. In the event of a ceontributor dying before he becomes a pensioner, his heirs shall re- ceive the snm of his two per cent. contribu- tions accrued up to the time of his death, plus five per cent. interest, compounded an- nually, on the same. 12. In the event of a pensioner dying be- fore receiving a pension payment a sum equal to the two per cent. contributions made, the difference shall be payable to the estate of the pensioner. 13. The fund shall be administered by a Board of Control representing each of the three bodies of contributors. 14. School Districts shall deduet teachers' contributions before payment of salaries, and shall make monthly returns to the Provincial Government which shall maintain the Pension Fund Office. Telegrams were read from the Con- ventions at Calgary and Yorkton, con- veying greetings. The President-Elect was presented to the Association. The Convention then adjourned. (The speeches delivered in complete or summarized form are printed in the following pages). PRESIDENT'S ADDRESS J. H. Mulvey Ladies and Gentlemen: I am glad, very glad indeed, to'wel- come you to this 10th annual meeting of the M.E.A. It is always a source of pleasure to me to meet so many teach- ers gathered together, animated by a common impulse for self-improvement, and guided by a high sense of duty. I am sorry, however, that my ability as a speaker is not commensurate with the importance of the occasion and that many flattering expressions of congra- tulation and good will must to my re- gret be left unsaid. Nevertheless, from rny long connection with educational iatters in this province, I recognize",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL tlie bardsliip that attendance at this meeting entails upoil vou, and as far as mn personal sympathy goes, you have it iii abundance. I fully realize that aftcr a, liard winter's work you feel that some relaxation is owing you in order to create anew fresh energy for future efforts. I knoîv, too, that many of you have coic long distances, that you have sac- rificed many social obligations, that vo n have postponcd many pleasure ex- cursions to friends or relatives, in order to participate in our deliberations. This self -denial on your part is certainly grratifying to thc officiais of this Asso- ciation. Yet I have no hesitation iii saying frankly to you that I think it is a duty incumnbent upon every teach- eîr ini this province to attend these meet- ings if at ail possible. It is in fact a dnty ive owe the public, our trustees, our children, and more particularly ourselves as members of the teaching profession. You know that your per- soual. attitude towards our Association and towards education geuerally is nearly always a fair index-an appreci- able measure of your success as a teacli- er, and your suecess as a teacher ele- vates our profession in the social scale to unknown heiglits and gives it a standIing in the conimunity that is the equal, if not the rival, of auy other profession in the world. Now tiîc work in which we are engaged involves a great deal of diligent and intelligent stu(Iy, both before and after our enrol- ment in the ranks of teaching, and what ms more, it neces§itatcs a continuance of this study until thc end. As a matter of fact, no kind of work cails for \u0026o mucli energy of body and mind, so mnucli patience, kinduess, sympathy and sunshine as ours does; yet for the lab- orer the rewTar(l is great beyoud comn- putation. 1 think I amn safe in saying that no idler, no loiterer by tlîc wayside, ever reachcs thc topmnost rung of the ]adder of success in education. It is the work- ers that arc iIni)ratively nccded in the tcaching pirofessioni. It is the mcn and wone who toil iii rugged places, over- couuung cvery (liffieulty with chicerful perseverauce, mounting hiigher day by day, reaching ever, reaclîing forth afte r somnething newver aud better and truer than that which bas gone before. These aire they that do the wýýorli; these are they that leave the imprints on the sandàs of time that miake it posssible for you and me to lead our little flocks into the broad highwvays of truc knowledge and useful citizenship. Books bave been written iii profut- sion upon cvery conceivable topic that lies -within the domain of humai' thought-upon birds and beasts, flow- crs and trees, seas and stars. and s0 on uumberlessly; but none of thei eau compare with the living book that is dai]y open to our view, viz., the inid and soul of a child. This is the book that engages our attention and deinands froin us the greatest consideratioîi of cvery page of its wonderful record. This is the wonderful volume that shouid have printed -on its living pages ihe best of thoughts. the higliest Of ideals; iii fact, everything that is, pure ai-d holy, everything that creates, an appetite for the nobler things iii 1ife and an abliorrence of the iow, the vile and the debasing in human activitY- This study, this interpretation of the living page, however complex or difi- cuit it may be, constitutes our appoint- cd wvork iii the body corporate, and tO that end we must devote all our ener- gies, ail our abilities and our highest at- tainments. No matter what dj5courage- nients or clouds of miudrsadn sweep across our mental horizon, e jaust risc superior to them ail, for the clouds disappear at the smiie of a littie chiid an(1 our worries cease to be 'Whefl the dawning of intelligent comprehel' sion breaks like a ray of liglit acrOSs the wrinklcd brow of a youngster. (The President bas refcrred to tl lprogramme of the Convention and t0 the work of the Executive in plan1liII9 to inake it as comprehensive and as practical as possible.) Since we hast met in session hierea great event bas occurred-one that 111aS overshadowed cvery other event 111hl",
         "PRESIDENT'S ADDRESS \"\"aî activity-and that is the present ivar -%itih Germany. This war is being Waged b.v nations that have become great i11 inventions and discoveries, in science and arts, in music and painting, in commlerce and industries, in ail the convenienees and comforts that consti- tute modern life. The nations involved represeîît the highest type of civiliza- tion probabiy since the beginning of tlie ivorld, and it is a regrettable fact tilat ail the powcvr and greatness and inltellect of these nations sbould bcecm- Ployed in killing one another. Yet from oUr Point of view the war was forced l'pol us. We could not possibly avoid it and maintain our honor unimpaired ainong men and nations. This war was IPliari]y caused by a dominating caste inl Gerniany, supported by the power- fui inifluence of a servient press- al caste that speîîed militarism directed against Britain froin the days of the 1Oer war-a caste that, led by Bern- hardi and many other insane pan-Uer- 'nanists, promulgated thec pernicions doctrine ''that might is at once the su- Pýrnie right and the dispute as to what Is right must be decided by the arbi- lrran1ent of war.\" In pursuance of this Prînceipie that might makes right, Gem- iliany as you know vioiated the neutral- ity of Belgium, aithough she, in con- ' ulctiolî with the great powers, had Sýoilii'1Y guaranteed such neutraiity, \"IId because the Belgians refused to be- traY Europe and become the tool of a l\u003eowerfffi nei ghbor their countmy is now aJ 'Wiiderness of smoking ruins.' ])tobtI(,5s evcry teacher I sec before \"le has had littie difficulty in eliciting froni the older pupils the statement that Great Britain had no other alter- native than a declaration of war, or In .'naking those pupils sec that Great ]ýrîtain1 with hem allies is fighting not for Býelgiuin alone, but that she is figlit- ilig at the dictates of honor for the Preservation of the law of nations, Vhich is uitimatcîy for the peace of al ilatio1115 and the right of the wcaker 10exst Such a war is as vitaîîy important to 11 in, Canada as it is to our Mother- iand. Aithougli we arc a seif-govern- ing colony, wve are a part of the Bri- tish Empire; our thoughts, our senti- inents, our speech, flic cails of kinship makes us one in reality with the other sons of Britain,, and their cause is our cause, their foe is our foc, their war is, our war, and their glory is our glory. A British statesman once said that Canada ivas the fairest jewel in the crown of Britain. I do not know whe- ther this assertion was a diplomatie platitude tending to raise our self- estecm orhlot, but ail the saine its fril- filment is near at hand. At the con- clusion of this w'ar Canada, a littie sooner or a littie later, wiIl become a great nation-linked, it may be, in the solidarity of the British Empire-yet a, great nation. 11cr ships will plougli through cvery sea, hier manufactured produets will be distributed to ail parts of the earth, her great natural resources will be enormously developed, hier fields of golden grain will f11l the land with a golden showcr; yet our participation in this war will cost us mucli-the blood of men, the sorrows of women-but there must be no turning back; every- thing must be borne with heroic con- stancy and patience, for at ail hazards and at ail costs the lust of any nation for universal dominion, the right of any nation to tyrannize over other men and nations, must be for ever smashed. We as Canadians are taking part- and no mean part, cither-in this aet of rigliteous retribution, and when the great day of rehabilitation for ,shatter- ed nations comes, we will have the proud satisfaction of knowing that we did our duty as we sec it, nobly and ungrudingly, and side by side with us as representatives of Imperial Britain wvill be found the men of India, of South Africa, of Australia, of New Zealand-all animated by one common love for the dear old flag that repre- sents justice and mnercy and freedom for ail mankind. And now one word of caution in this connection. Thîis war may last long- ùr than we expeet, but in any case it is bound to entai1 considerable changes",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL in every arrangement that pertains to human life and liuman activity: homes will be left desolate, comnmercial enter- prises rnay suifer from, tcmporary stag- nation, economie conditions will be dis- turbed and a feeling of depression may brood over our land. But let us as teachers meet every misfortune with optimistie smiles. Let us follow ont the dictates of our profession with an unfaltering and unswerving fidelity to its high ideals. Let us continue to de- velop in our pupils a sense of their majesty and responsibility as citizens of the wide, wide world, and some day the fiags of ail nations may be mcrged into the white banner of Christ, andl then shaîl wars and rumors of wars cease to be for ever; but until that time cornes let us be prepared to stand by the glorious traditions of our Motherland, and when blood cals to blood from across the waters let us answer Engiand's focs then as now with the same unconquerable loyalty. In conclusion, ladies and gentlemen, let me impress this upon you: The present situation in the British Empire caflîs for citizens, and neyer before in our history was, the need so pressing for citizenship of a wise and unselfish eharacter as now. Ahl of us, both men and women, and even little children, must be prepared to do our duty to our country, and to sacrifice our per- sonal interests in its behaîf. The chief task of the teacher, then, is to prepare the pupils for participation in this citizenship-to prepare them mentally, morally and physically for the great destiny that lies aliead of them. And your presence here thîs afternoon shows that you at least recognize the import- ance of the duty devolving upon you, and that you are anxious to equip your- selves for the performance of this great duty. And I eau only express the hope that the programme we have prepared for you 'May in some measure be an assistance and an inspiration to you iii the prosecution of your work and that you will return to your classrooins after the Easter holidays thoroughly rcfresh- cd in mind and body., SOME THOUGHTS ON TUE PRESENT WAR By C. K. Newcombe, Stipt. of Ediicat ion II studying any war, we find that the causes are deep-seated anid fai'- reaching, the occasions trifling and ephemeral. We have heard this present war ascribed bo the crime of Gavrilo Princep at Serajevo. We have been told that its cause,- may be learned by a peruisal of the conversations between various Chancelleries of Europe during the fatal days prior to the 28th of .July last. It is truc that fhe occasion of the great struggle lay in the supposedly unsatisfactory character of the Servian reply to the twelve demands made by Austria, but the nature of thesýe de- mands, and the manner of their presen- tation, show conclusively that it wvas the desire of Austria to force upon Servia the solution by war of a larger issue than that raised by the crime itsclf. There are two methods by which empires may be unified-the one by in- ternal organization. the other hy exter- nal pressure. The Austrians have found it well nigli impossible to organize their Dominions so as to insure the unity which they desire. Francis Joseph is very old, and it, is doubtful whether the ilungarians wil recognize his sucecessor as king. The provinces of Bosnia, Herzegovina, Cro- atia, Slavonia and Dalmatia, ail like Servia are inhabited by Slavs, who tuVII eager eyes to the Servian hilis froila whence they hope will corne their aid. Austria has oppressed these Pro- vinces as she oppressed the Provinces of Italy, or in old days, the Cantons Of Switzerland. Then too, the Julian AlPs, t he Carnie Alps,, the Istrian Littoral and the Trentino are essentially Italian in character. 0f their inhabitants, onlY twenty per cent. are of Teutonie extrac- tion. These territories too, are a source of weakness to the Empire. The friction between the two doni- nant races of Austria, the menace of the S]av, the tcrritory tomn fromn ItalY' have ail eontributed to the failuire Of",
         "SOME THOUGHTS OF TIIE PRESENT WAR the flouLse of Hapsburg to bring about the unity of the Empire tlirough in- ternai organization. There remained the alternative of external pressure. For centuries Austria lias dreanîed the dream of domination in soàth east- erm Europe, of mile in the B3alkans, of 8ea eoast on both Adriatie and Accean, Ivith harbors where forests of nmasts flYing the Imperial f]ag miglit bea-r ivit- fless to dominion on the seas. Sca coast she bas obtained, but lier positioii is ever preearious whilc Servia menaces Trieste,, and Aibania, and Montenegro tlireateîî the lower Adriatie. l'le Ei- Peror, whose personality and tact liold hier rival races in seeming unity, iý; tot- tering to the grave. Meanwhule Aitria i5 goaded onward by lier ambitions, and 80 the fljouse of Hapsburg secs iii the -enmenting power of external pressure it8sSole hope of immediate preservation anld future continuance. And tliis ex- terlial Pressure is war. It iS a mighty force. We ourselves are feeling its power. Ail over our far- flunIg Empire, nerve centres are quiver- ifas We gather togellier for the con- hC. The coliesion of public effort is Wel'dîng together people of every lan- euage and every race. Sikch and New Zeaandî.Soutli African and Canadian aeside by side wiîli Kitciener's Tr- ritorials on that far-flung battie line. hAi ili thiscoliesion whicli Austria has craved fier great ally lias also ler ambitions. \"From the Nortli Sea tthe Persian Gulf, from the Baltie to the, M1editerranean,\" is the mollo of Panerns. Witli characteristie Pati11e and thproughness, Prussia liad 1l tli te iflost perfect systcmi of sur- lier lance tlie world lias ever known. lirsPies were everywhere, and one 41all brouglit back the tale thal \"Tlie ' ',Was at hand. England niglt saIfely be ignored. Conservative and 1Liberai were divided into warring e'lK and eighty Irish Nationalisîs h1 balance of power. The price aldO ter support was, a Home Rule Bill; Vola immediately upon ils introduction, Vl$ecrs began drilling as for civil war. ulster denanded Ilial lier terrilory slioulcl be excluded froin tlie applica- tion of tlie bill, but tlie Nationalists would conie to ilo agreement. The do- inestie legisiation of Lloyd George was considered by the landed classes to be notlîing less than confiscation. Capital it -was said would be alarmed by tlie proposed ineasures and -would leave the country. Recruiting ivas at a low ebb. Nor -%ere matters seerningly in better condi{ ion ou the outposts of Empire. Iiitia w-as filled -with a vague ruiîrest, and an cinigration inovenient was 'be- ginn.The Crown Colonies, howTever, looked with suspicioni uI)on the Ilindoo brother: South Africa (lenied limi ,quiality of statits; Canada refused 10 admit hini at ail. To tlie outside ob- server, it seemed, andi seemed witli rea- son, that Britain would long liesitate before she entered a great war. France -was by no means prcpared. lier artiliery was adnîiltedly old and defective. The frontier forts were by no ineans in repair. The effieieney of lier acroplanes bad been greatly 'exag- gerated, and tlie opposition to conscrip- tion wvas steadily increasing ini force throughionl the country., ilussia had not yet recovered from the effeets of tlie Japanese war. lier finances were aI a low ebb, and lier iniobilizalion would be necessarily slow as a resit of lier vast extent and the iliadequate nature of lier facilities for transportation. On the other lîand, Germany and Austria had improved their armies. Tlie German fleel liad been put on %i war basis. No imnmediale domestie difficul- tics tlireatened Austria so long as tlie E .mperor lived, and nolhing troubled CGermany save socialismn; a cloud upon thie horizon as yct no biggcr Ilian a inan 's liand. In the opinion of tlie generai staff \"eThe Day\" had come. A lasI altempt wvas made to delach Britain from lier Allies. Assurances were given tliat the territorial inlcgrity of Continental France would be respected, thougli a pledge that the Frenchi Colonies should remain unîouchcd wvas refused; and las,,tly, if Belgium would offer righl of",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL way io the Germans through lier terri- tory and refrain from siding witli France in any fashion, Germany coven- ante(l fhat bier neutrality would be res- pecte(l-after the war. These ''infa- mous proposais'' -,ere rejected, and the rest ive know. 1 do iot wish to speak of Belgium, of the violation of lier territories-a viola- tion froin which even Bismarck shrankç in 1870-of the murder and spoilation of lier civilian population; of the dese- cration of bier cathedrals or the crime of Louvain. Nor do I ivish to speak of the sinking of neutrals by submarines, or the raids upon lI-artepool, and Scar- borougli, but I do wish to say that wve have grossly exaggerated in our own minds the contribution of Gcrmany to ivorl d civilization. Germany has organized; she lias systematiied existing materials, but ive owe littie or nothing to lier initia- tive. Dr. C'harles W. Eliot lias ably epito- mizcd tlie inventions whici liave gone far ta make our material civilization whlat it is, and lie fiîîds tliat thue inven- tors in almost every case were citizens of the free countries of the eartli. The application of stearn to land and viater transportation ive owe to Eng- land and America. The explosive' en- gifle to the development of vihiel.i ve owe our vast automobile industry, liad its origin iii France. Frencli and Eng- lish chemists made the fundamental discoveries in chemica]. and physical theory. The telegrapli and teleplione wve owe to Amerîca; the wireless to Italy. The sewing mnachine, typeviriter and rotary press are ail produets of American invention. The Unitcd States built the first monitor and submarine, and England the first dreadnought. In thc wvorld of medical science, vie find the saine thing. We oye the discovery of anaesthesia to America, that of asep- sis ta an Englishman, and it was an Englishman who first discovered tlie possibilities of typlioid inoculation. The rubber industry wce owc to the inven- lion of the American Goodyear. Modern business organization lias arisen ont of the conception of the Joint stock comn- pany with its magie of liînited liability. This is an English conception and its greatest dcvelopment in the ocean steamsliip corporation lias been built up on Britishi sou. American business organization lias built up and made pos- sible corporations such as the Standard Oul and United States Steel. Germany, liovever, lias given us an idea of empire; of a state ''lacking its war through\" under the -influence of the doctrine of force, liaving no care for sanctity of obligation or riglit of con- tract, regarding a trcaty as merely a, \"cscrap of paper,\" and fired witli an Intense desire for the domination of Europe and the world. 'rit is tlie business of the State,'' said Frederie the Great, ''to extend its boundaries,\" and tlie samne monarcli gave Goetlie as lis reasons for lis vio- lation of the Pragmatie Sanction, and bis attack upon Maria Theresa, \"The vivacity of my temperament, my viel filled wvar chests, a favorable opportu- nîty and an ambition for glory.\"' SO Frederie, so Wllhelm! We too have an Empii'e, and of that Empire, and of the struggles and priva- tions ihl have made it great, let Homer. Lea speak: \"The Saxon lias marked around thiiS carth, as lias no other race before hul, the scarlet circle of his powier. This thin, red Saxon line, so thin viith his nutabers, so red viith his blood, was made possible only by lis lieroisîn and racial fealty. Where this line lias flot gone inan lias not found. It lias crossed evcry sea; it lias traversed everY desert; it lias souglit every solitude; it lias passed tlirough swamps vihere01Y the sacred ibis fishes; over sands that have neyer been moistcncd;- over Si1O0e that have neyer melted. There lias beell no storrn it bas not encountered; 11 pain it lias not endured; no race it h£1 not fouglit, and no disease it lias t contended with. This Saxon hune ha$ l)cen to the earth a girdie tragie aid lieroic, binding within itself ail the Oid",
         "TUE PROGRESS 0F THE YEAR and great places of the world. It lias been sulent in its duty, ignored in its achievement, and scorned in its devo- ti011; yet it has given down to this no-w fleglectful race a world sucli as man- kjind lias never known before; an em- pire over which the Sun and stars shine logether; wliere night never falis nor dawn begins. \" Thie great iBritish Empire has been bit up upon the eiiduring principles Of national honor and regard f or our Plledged word. And in this war we fight that gov- erniment of the people by the people, and for the people, shall not pass away il the din and havoe of carnage and death, and that the principle of indivi- dual freedom and liberty s\u0026hall not per- ish but have everlasting life. ADDRESS OF WELCOME May'or Waugh (Summarized) orsayer Waugh welcomed the visitiag teach- havng ne' tear et the profession, such as OeCsted ia his mind when ho was a small boy. The City et Winnipeg, which lie represent- ed, holonged te Manitoba and te Western Wanaa; it theretore boloaged te the people wh ealtrelled the destinies et Western Can- is111. , the teachers. The people et th Peg have shown in many ways that tey are interested la educatien. Sucli a bUilding as the eue in which they met a the best evidence et this. Educatien should flot eoase whea childrea lett sehool; it should go 0], until the end et lite. Educatien sheuld, as tafr as Possible, be et a practical charac- ter* A few ovonings age the speaker heard a leture Provin that the earth wasflat. W85ting thiugs were said, but the question ho 8a askiag himseit as ho went homewards was, WVýhat difference dees it make te you 2£nOwhether the earth is round or flatl B11itary authority had todhlm that what ritain oat f e Canadatnow was mea who eoUIld shoot straiglit. We may give ships, 0a *e nay -nan them with brave mon and thin, th- with fine guns; but the whoe th ig 1s liseless ualess there are some mon goere WIi kaow how te shoot. There is a variety. Of oducatiea that is et the useiess tO ho akes for adorament. If people alaght duated for service thoy must ho Od Young. It is impossible te educate sehol P *pe There are 13,0100 beys goiag te 00 la 'Wiunipeg, and the Mayor lad the feeling that thoy were aIl being trained to be consumers. In a countrY 'like this agri- culture is the first industry, ani people should be induced to go ''back to the farm.'' Hait of the people of Manitoba lived la cities. This is f ar too high a percentage. About 10% et the peoplc are tilling the tarms, and the other 90% are tilling the farmers. In the opinion ot the speaker, technical training,in cluding training for the farm, shouid be given wherever peopie eeuld understand it. And thon there should be recreation te make lite happy, but abeve all the slogan et the people should ho, ''Back te the Land.'' THlE PROGRESS 0F 1THE YEAR By R. Fletcher, Deputy Minister ot Educatien In the absence et Hlon. Mr. ColdwelI, Mr. R. Fletcher, Deputy Minister et Edueatien, gave an address in which he referred te the progress during the year. The following is a brief summary ef his remarks: ATTENDANCE In Maniteba there were onrollodl 93,954 pupils, and the average attendanco was 59,776, or 63.6%. The average in Alberta was 57.4%, ia Ontario 61.3%, and in Nova Scotia 62.6%. In Maniteba the number attending less than 100 days decreased frem 35,681 te 35,235; the number attending between 100 and 150 days decreased £rom 21,135 te 20,202, and the num- ber attendling between 151 da.ys and the whnb' yeur increased tremendefsly-frem 26,863 te 38,516, or by 11,653. TEACHER TRAINING Summer Sehools Last year 96 teachers gave up five weeks of their vacation te take courses in element- ary science and gardening, and various torms et handwork, including wood and iren work. The Summer Scheel will be centinued again this year, and arrangements are being made whereby threo-year courses will bhoefferod, leading te a diploma as special teachor in manual training, or sewing and millinery, as the case inay be. Last summer 115 French bi-lingual teach- ers took a special summor course at St. Boni- tace 'thus evidencing the keen professienal i terest thoy take la their work. The Act was amended iast Session se as te provide for a grant; et $10.00 per annum te teachers in town or village schools who wero doing satistactery work ia school gar- dening. One hundred and seventy-three teachers teok a meath 's course at the Agricultiral Colloge during the year,' thus gotting inte dloser toucli with rural lite, and learning te botter appreciatO the problems of the commiinitiOs in whlch they livo. BRANDON NORMAL SOHOOL This schoel is aoW equipped for work ia domostic science, manual training and agri-",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL culture. Next year it will ofer a full year's course, and second class work will be taken up there as well as in Winnipeg. Night school grants were paid last year to ten centres at the rate of $1.00 per night. This year this number has been considerably increased, though full returns are not yet in from all the schools where such classes were offered. Five High Schools, viz., Stonewall, Teulon, Holland, Roblin and Dauphin, offered courses in agriculture for the older boys in farm homes whb had dropped out of school, and found it uncongenial to work side by side with students much younger than they. BOYS' AND GIRLS' CLUBS In this work the Department of Education is co-operating with the Department of Agri- culture, and contests have been arranged in farm mechanics, fodder corn growing, pig raising, potato growing, poultry raising, bread baking, sewing, canning and preserving. Over 1,800 boys and girls were engaged in competitions of this kind in Manitoba last year, and it is expected that many more will compete during the coming summer. The work of organizing these clubs is now in charge of Mr. S. T. Newton, formerly head of the Technical Department in the Kelvin School. SCHOOL PAIRS Last year there were upwards of 40 fairs held in the province, where the children com- peted with their products. These fairs arous- ed a great deal of interest, not only amongst the pupils, but amongst the parents and rate- payers, and it is believed that their number will be largely increased. TUE SCHOOLS AND THE WAR During the year the Department bas dis- tributed or is now distributing: (1) The Dominion Government Blue Book. (2) Box of pamphlets (enough to send sev- eral into every home in the district). (3) Circulars and subseription forms for Red Cross contribution have been sent out to all schools, and the hearty co-operation of the teachers is requested. THE MORAL EMPHASIS IN MODERN EDUCATION Rev. W. J. Hindley My subject has been announced this after- noon as \"The Moral Objective in Modern Education.'' This, however, can be stated very briefly. Self-discovery, self-respect, self- control-these three things comprise the moral objective of education. I may say that my subject is: ''The moral emphasis in modern education,'' and not ''the moral objective.'' There is need of this moral emphasis, not only in our educational relationships but our industrial and commercial association and our political life. The need of our times is distinctively a moral need-greater in this time of stress than ever before in the his- tory of the world. I need not take up your time by going too deeply into the psychology of the mob, but I would just like to point out the difference in our attitude toward the in- dividual and the group or association of in- dividuals. You take ten men, and these ten men together will do certain things that not one of those ten men by himself would do, owing to a certain element, either a plus element or a minus element, of our moral and ethical world that is very hard to account for. We talk about our ''soulless corporations.' There is an impersonality about a corporation that causes individuals to feel toward corpor- ations very differently than they feel towards each other. If you ride in a street car, for in- stance, and the conductor does not take up your fare, you do not feel guilty because you did not pay. You have the feeling that, if yon can get ahead of the company, you are quite justifled in doing so; Men who will not take a nickel from anybody, so to speak, will take all they eau get from everybody. People who would not even think of robbing the individual would cheerfully rob the group, and not think they were robbers or pirates when they did it. That is the attitude out of which arises the problems that face our great social move- ments today. That is why it is almost im- possible to administer the affairs of state or province upon the same careful, ecolo- mical and efficient basis as private business. That is the reason why nearly every publie building or enterprise on this continent ,tO- day costs more than those engineered pri- vately. You would be surprised how imper- sonal, in this respect, is the attitude Of people even toward their own city. Things cost from 25 to 40 per cent. more when people know that we are buying them ''for the city.'' Now, I speak of these things because they are the expression of a very acute situation, the solution for which must form the very foundation of our movements for community betterment. We are facing a very critical time in the development of the moral and ethical life of Our people; and if there is 0ne institution more than another where we ean begin reconstruction, it is in our public schools. The fact is, that the spirit of our day is the spirit of individualism. You go into the average community, and you find in perhaps a very small town fixe or six ehurches and perhaps two public schools. What I look forward to is the tirne when, in a community of that size, there will bo only one church and one sehool-WwhO our schools will be so truly Canadian that iO them we will be laying the foundation Of our future Canadian community life. If you believe with me that morals i silP iy a sense of right relationships, and consts in the duties of life rather than the fohlOw- ing of rules, then you will agree with inO that the public school must proceed along general rather than specifie lines. I belie'V",
         "WHAT MAY WE EXPECT FROM EDUCATION ? that religion is the truc fountain-head of moral life, or the moral life and power of a people. But I do not believe that religion per se ought to be taught in the public schools. When I refer to religion in this con- nection, I mean set religious exercises. Just as you cannot have physical life with- Out food, neither eau you have moral life without some religious institution and reli- gious ideals. . . Now for the reason that moral- ity rests upon religious ideals more than re- ligious facts, there is no reason why religious instruction should be brought into the public sehools. Of course, in the old lands, like Germany, they still consider specific religious instruction, and boys and girls have to be familiar with certain portions of the Scrip- turc and the Prayer-book. Some such sys- tem has been followed out recently in the schools of Japan. But in America we have come to a point in our moral evolution wheu the specific forms of religious instruction can be relegated te the home. I believe that the teacher with a message can inculcate a moral lesson even in the teaching of grammar, usually considered the driest of studies; for none can use the spoken or written word without thinking of the har- iUOny and the euphony of our language in Song and story. Again, the teacher who eau- not teach arithmetic without moral emphasis is absolutely unfit; the teacher who cannot make history something more than dates and dynasties is unworthy of his high calling. There seems te be little doubt that if our histories had been less those of wars, of gen- erals, kings, queens and leaders; that if they had been less records of the sword and the mnusket; this great war of our time would have been made impossible. J believe that lot onlv nust a new moral emphasis enter into the teachers' interpretation of history, but Our histories must be rewritten, and in- stead Of being records of war and bloodshed, 'nust be made stories of the growth of the Peole-stories of those who served in pro- Motion of the common good. For that reason I think yo will agree with tue that our state and provincial colleges are facing a transitional period. Every time you nieet in the throng you hear somebody say: 'We are passing through a transitional Period.'' By that you know the moment when a new throb, a new thrill, has core te the common heart and soul. A little while ago you had a transition from the classical to the vocational form of education. The boys and girls of today are ceiving a type of education that is broader an that which you and I received-a general education, that takes in the heart, seul, mind, eya and brain. Under competent direction, 'ur children are learning to do something use- fui* Yeu are in a world where the law of rowth. IS inseparable from the law of change. ator is nothing static about education. Edu- o1s in its elements dynamic, not static. wita Want to join the cultu ral and vocational h te moral and ethieal. It is not necessary to write a new book upon ethies or moral philosophy in order to give due moral emphasis to the present eduea- tional system. But one thing we all need- a new sense of our own responsibility, a bet- ter developed personality, a keener sens0 of our moral duty. Let me say that the moral emphasis in the schoolroom depends upon the personality of the teacher. Thought transfer- ence is no longer questioned by reasonable people. There is no doubt that the moral atti- tude of the teacher spreads telepathically over ber schoolroom. More than that, the teacher who in exasperation strikes n pupil confesses to moral weakness. Control should not be, in fact does not come, by coercion, but through the influence of personality. Self- discovery, self-control, self -respect-these are what we need in our schoolrooms. I think that here in Canada we are still obsessed by the monarchical conception o government; and the danger with our teach- ers is that they seek to establish au auto- cracy in the classroom rather than a demo- cracy. The moral influence of the new teach- er with ber class is in a very critical bal- ance, and may go one way or another. Now, I am going to speak frankly when I say, further, that I believe there is not that supervision of your playgrounds which is ne- cessary for the furtherance of this moral om- phasis in education. A child may lose more in the fifteen minutes on the playground than he gains during the whole time in the scbool- room. I look forward to the day when the school will be the great fusing point of our con- munity life. Would it not be better, for in- stance, if our young people, when they at- tend balls, could attend properly chaperoned by their teachers, instead of assembling, as they do now, in the ballrooms of our public hostelries? In brief, I want to see the schpol assume the responsibility of directing wisely the general community life. The country de- pends on the teacher. Look for an educa- tional system that shall provide for our teachers a retirement pension, so that when they have given the best of their lives to their work, they will not have to depend on the savings fromn their small salaries to keep them from want in their old age. fhe citizeus ef the future, the country's future, is being made in the sdeveol cf today. Let us plan a moral and ethical develoPment worthy cf the splendid traditions of the B,- tish Empire and the outlook for the new Bri- tish democracy. WHAT MAY WE EXPECT FROM EDUCATION? Prof. J. A. Dale, McGill University Now, in putting the question, \"What May we expeet fromn aducaticht\" you will ne woubt sec that I have raised an enormous number cf questions. It is a question that thoughtful peopl are putting to themselves touge aud more sinea tha advent of this great",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL war. For years many of us have been in the habit of looking to Germany for our edu- cational inspiration. What has been the de- feet of her educational system? We spend our time and our energy teach- ing. What do we expect to do by our teach- ing and how will the system we are follbwing work out? We find our papers filled with criticism of the laxity of those in high places. We want to know whether our education is going to do anything in this matter. Mr. Hindley sur- prised me by saying he did not think there was anybody in this audience who had any compunction about \"doing\" a public utility if they could, or taking a rise out of a cor- poration. Now, I do not want to push that too far. For one thing, I do not think it is quite true. If true, it presents an addi- tional problems. Is our education going to improve condi- tions? Let me ask you to put it the other way round, and aýsk yourselves whether these conditions are not an integral part of your educational system. For education is not con- fined to the few hours ai school: you connot expect from any sehool system, however good, that it will undo the harm that other things are doing all the time. Advertisements, mov- ing pictures, discussions in the press on pub- lie immorality-all these things are teachers of our children, and with a force behind them that many of our school teachers have not got. The spirit of the community, of which Mr. Hindley spoke, is the community's chief danger. The first thing to do, then, in answering the question before us, is to clear away one or two of the things that we must not ex. pect from education. I do not know whether it is still common for parents to send their children to school because they cannot man- age them. Now, I have a great deal of sym- pathy with parents who cannot manage their children; but I always like to enquire how the refractory child started, what its handi- cap was at commencement. I was once trav- elling in a train in which there were two kinds of coaches, with two classes of tickets. ln the coach in which T rode was an olI woman with a market-basket and a stylishly dressed woman with a little girl. When the conductor came along, he looked at the old woman's tieket first. He said: \"You must get -out of this coach; this is a second-class ticket.'' The old woman cheerfully got up and went out. Then the conductor approach- ed the stylishly dressed woman with the little girl, discovered that she, too, had a second- elass ticket, and said, ''You must get out.'' But do you think she got out? No. She stormed and threatened, and finally mention- ed the name of some influential acquaintance, threatening that through him she would have the . ticket collector dismissed. When the conductor heard this name, he let her stay. I have thought many times since: What chance does that child stand, with ,a mother like that? Precious little. When that child goes to school, the teachers have got to make up for the kink put in the child's nature bv the mother's example. She trains her child in one direction, and then sends it to school to be trained in another. It is not a square deal for the school. What, then, may we expect from our edu- cation? I want to sec whether it would not be worth our while to try to do a little clear thinking on this point. Mr. Hindley well said that all time is a time of transition. Yet, looking back over educational history, we find that there have been certain ideals of education fairly clear from the beginning. At the commencement of compulsory educa- tion in Europe, it was considered that educa- tion must embrace the three ''r's''-reading, writing, arithmetic. Or again, there have been in other periods certain ideals held up -the ideal of knighthood, or of citizenship, as in ancient Greece-as the objects to be attained by the men of the country. But now, in our time, none of these old ideals finds complete acceptance from the point of view of the whole community, al- though there are still people in the con- munity that adhere to them, or to one or other of them. But, as a whole, we have the idea that there is something more inclusive, something wider, something nobler. That would be my first point in answer to our question. We must realize, when we ask our- selves what we are to expeet. from education, that we are asking ourselves the most ser- ious question that we eau put, for on our answer to that question depends nothing less than our whole philosophy of life. If you are going to judge any educational system, you must bear in mind its relation te its community; because it is an undoubted fact about some of our educational systems of today, that they have got somehow ont of touch with their community. One of the first demands we have to make of any edu- cational system is that it shall be in touch with its community. Another thing that I think we should clear out of the way is that we are wrong to ex- pect impossibilities from education. Educa- tion cannot do away with unusual inequali- ties between man and man. People who think that ''man is born free and equal'' could believe that education is the thing to do away with social inequalities. But if there is one thing more than another that educa- tion in its development has proved, it is that all men are not born equal. The old'simile of the educational ladder is now replaced by the newer symbol of the educational highway, along whieh men may walk as far as they can. You know that out of any class of children, no two will make exactly the same amount of progress. One of the most impressive sights I ever saw was a class in history at a certain school. I asked the teacher what they were doing* To my astonishment the teacher said, \"TheY are all doing diferent things. Some have got farther than others, although we start- ed out with a certain schedule.'' This teachý er spent all his time going from studeat to",
         "WHAT 14AY WE EXPE('T OF EICATION? '(tUiiiiiît. Tlîcy were doiîîg history ; luit thoy ý'vcre ail doîîîg differeîît thiings in historv. The inflaite variety wbiclî shows itself Iii thic developîncîît of differeîît 1\u003e111Ils is aniotlicr thiiîg which wc niust takçe iiîto eansideratioli Wb;en we ask ourselves the questioni lefoi'e lis. A certainî minister of education sajid tint be COuid tell at any mîomenit exaetly what anY elhliiin the wbale countî'y was doitng! That was a Vcî*y poiîîted index iiffeed of the Cdluca- tioiial value of lis systemi. The\" agaiin, apart fromi i nteileî'toal devel- opluilt, tliere is another sie of the question that has, to lie boîîe in îiîîî. Ediucaiti on eail îlot Whoily (Io awav, witb the ilOfer'ts of hci'ed- ity or' eîîliî'lonîîîcît, although it caoil (o soilic- * ilig -for baoth,-jni soule cases a great del, '~Otlieî cases iiotbiog. 1 liiow on(,e large iit.y which classes ill its ebildrecn aî'cordimg to grades aiid eraItksoioivwb thc, tey redefeitive or îîot. Whcrc thcî\"' 's iti 00e of thcse gradles a deetivle eh 111, 'hlisolttcy unale to dIo the work ot tlîat bi rae, the pî'csecî of that vhild in thc cllîss 'S a, liliixeîl evîl. The saine with cnvironnt. If a eoni- Onillity allows its chilrcii, or a coîisiderablc im ber Of tlieui, tu 'ow u p11 oiffdr sînîni cou' Seiiluitioli connuiit iiakc uIII foi- thiat. I. ea slPlIy the spiritual enviroiîncut wbii'li Will iJ( Somne relief frorn the other; but it is Warking under a handicap. I relinuilber a sehool iii England wvre a large 'nuIlber of bioys and girls cameî tii si'hoîl fr la mîarket gardiiiin il distrid'. Tliey gui 11J, befare it wIlS ligit; 'andl after thir. lias- Wete fre -eiîhticul at C'ovcîît Gaî'deîî, thc.v eefreto g0 o ta op yu(ai iIgl( te 00111itiaii iii which thase liil'lirealib a ren01.k ide 111 . Aftcr h c a îîî il t lic Sca0, e toid his viss ta lie iluwii Oii thei '1rins aiîd go ta siceli. Evr îiiig, the f1ir8t IeI.iial Wls Spint iii siveli. I îîftoî n'on ereed What woUid have hapjieiîcd hall thc ini lecta1. coule lu wlîcn those chiidren wcrc ly , allo that i'ci'cîtly it has iici'uinc 'ices50Y iii certain laits of the uobier ('onul- iîtl i urope ta look iota the jihysioal ol lti utOf iîool î'hilîlren whcuî tioy gaO ta Tere bas tisa hcciî iii iliiiiy e(01111 tes a 5sStcîuî bN, wih gouil food was slip 1 iv tll to, the ch i Id 'o atten iliii g si'ho(lsImp- Fibeeaîî5c it was io lise tryimr ta teaeh il]1- t hap~ ti bca tii a ity wici'i is one 18 ~Io fw uaesIl the wi'll wbce tiiere P'art0 ta11 i itic i si al] the ti lue, but mej fth c iritiî i siii falis t(i the gi'0ii uii 111 Ilo ýaelyit s salîl that the vbildreuar ili Il Hhol TilIl al] th, eli1ivhile, air icai' Iy bJeg are i~ aschaîil ail the ti me, yau i'aimîot in tO juldge tic, 4v,4tein. 0, ,as ta a piasitiv\"e aîs'rti tilte uesc Lot t \"'av we expert fraîîî eilvct iaîî 0faa 8 atteinut soluie slighit sketc'h or outliinc 01 1 nsw Th'Ie aswer, 1 repîent, depeiiis thilg lss hauourphulasoplîy of lite. lion ilii SvIlnûls aitise'? 1 lut th li' iis\\ve mnici' two hcails. 'First, i tiîlîîk tlicv exist iii ardci' to brilig Oui' i'hillreoil s i'lisfe as tienîs uf kîiiowicdIge andi puiaer thiheti raie lias avibievel. Scruiid, I thiiik tlicv exist iii oi'der ta conitinuei tue sirit iii wh lîli these iuisitîaîis wci'c iidil. If thei'e is, aie la acteî'îstic that, niore tlînn vîiother', býs dlis- tiiu c l oi' rlî' tii'uoiigýhnut its whlile Iis- toir', it Ns that iliini bas aia eci il iii- vnîtoî' aud diseovoier, ciilai'giîig his arvea \u003ci iistei5'; mil ibis ciiliî'geiiielit'liaIs iecui mi îaîîq ail icd troii Stop to stcîî liV the 'Xlubansiuii of his uw îî initellei'tuiil nul spîrîtiilai pwNer. ' telp foî'w'arl bas l)iliviilt thie WiY vfi st il tirtii effor'ts. Yuu iloi un' w liin t is 5 A loiii~ i a ten v'vars iii stiildy iid lhîi tiicsiili'îi 'iiu tu the li(iiii the raie lins lci i fter ages ut exîoieî'iicit m1l iii es- i-gtîii. Molst ot the tlîiîîs wlivîIi soriiiiii Ouiîî lIFes toiily are thligs of r-veit inN eiitii; b ut tIil irlii t g oes lii ik thliuglu a1 ilî selles of aviduuus andi ISlow adil ances', ti ii e -niiiciit day ot mnîaî's lialil ' y is'oN cî'y of tue iiqc of tire.' Yon eicile h stai'y ut stea I iiig flue tî'îîî the Soui. Witii tli'i gi 't îîîaii stuirteil. Latcu' lie, bcî'lie loird uf r rmge alu i la tc', bo e îasted oîî tlîci tii isii i tuin. Lol at tbe aviieiii the, l'aie bias 110,1u1îv iii Sie îî ce, li tciuile, ait!~ pSill)ia1îg li'l ce lînîl iîeei îîo i îstî'îît iuîî, Iis pi'i)gress wîîîidi îîîît hivne lieoi possibile. (iidrcîi iearii i'ead l 1i\u003cîgi as a ridie, *vlt tîcii' î,areits kiîî w; liiit leies'au tii t tb vc ii (011 îît lins T'Ii'.ciits aie kelligtbii e i ciiil'e luigei' a iiI oig ii tSî'b ual, 10i ail ci t a t tii v iiia itir Ili ire fîîliv iita ubossessi ofu tiie tien s' oires the r'ace lias wooi. fil 1iigliiid, fiiiii id' the lea ders aof the w'o'k iig cia rc ai î gi iig tiit tii c î' uiiîpllsOl',y Sobio (i) ngc sbu ubl i i iii ovle O u. lit Gerclini' all ct î'or thle val', a îî iii iiiaîiy parts of tlie Sta.s tbeî'o bave lîceii Siîî i' iio vciieiits. Peopile ar l'e îg il îî g tii 'eiisilei' thîe îidxisal)îlit 'y or. oxtendiiig tiie si'lo h aIttteilil iîii'c ou i Il ta tiie woi'k illg o If tbtat w'ere uîîy siiJct, I COlibl tell aOu g 'catil;(eai abouîît tbu'ie imitteis. But tlii iS' ain illustratiorn of thc tact tlîut îîaîî, in order to iii aiIîîta ii tIis pîirîetuai sp Iiritual exî mii sioo, NNill iîot let bis cîilrei'o w up0 1 il:' 'Yh(W, liiit sec tii it that tbey suai1 gron' 111) Soiiciiaw. Nu' thiat 1 take ta bc tiche aitu. ('cii tu-ai aiiei' ta our q1uestioii That cdhiiritioi ileteriiiati(iii ta sce ta it tiîat luis clildri'ii shal lie abile as far ns ticir caliacities allaw, to kýc 'li those possessiis uf the race wieh haive leiecl lîîilt; up 'tirii'ugh tic euiieavor of' tic îst- IY iiethad, by 1 hoiee ot subjeil iiinteli ai, hi' ail tiiesc i i fc 'ît ways, ta h r iii ]lus ihillicuil Up ta tcli oiiit at wilîî'i, ais f'ei ilS tlieii' cn1iacitio5 Iîiiaw, tbe'y sha icîllti take thoir siiuIre ot the nicbicveniicits îf tic Buit is thuit suffîieiIt? 'O- N. It is 'lt ecloligli that oui' ehîldreti shahl bc alie ta",
         "THE WESTERIN SCHOOL JOURNAL do nothing more than keep pacer w ith the progress of the race. It is neeessary that that spirit of the inventor mrust be continued. Nor is even that all. With new problems and new possibilities, man, in extending bis own power and bis own mastery over things, has enor- mously increased bis power both for good and for evil. In this expansion of bis powers, he has done it for evil as well as for good. You take a boy, for instance, and teach him writ- ing. He takes naturally to penmanship, this boy, becomes a beautiful writer-but later turns out a forger. Therefore all education is of no use, unless to the spirit of the inven- tor and discoverer lie added the spirit to per- petually revise, improve, refine. What, thon, are we te expect from educa- tion? We want our children to reach a point where they can take advantage of the im. mense store of wisdom and knowledge thaL bas been laid up for them. We want our children to gain increased intelligence, tlat their forces and powers shall be used only for the best ends. Now, what about the individual point of view? I have raised more questions, T am afraid, tban I can hope even to b gin to answer. But now take this. Ts not the cen tral problem in the eduention of every single individual the relation between bis individu- ality and bis allegiaice to the eommunity to which le belongs? I will just leave that ques- tion where it stands. I think the problei in every classroom is how to give the needed in struction and at the same time the needed initi- ative too. It is impossible to know how earh tea- cher faces this question; but it is safe to assume that every intelligent teacher asks himself: ''How am I to increase the initiative of these students, se as to make them inde- pendent and responsible men?\" Aristotle says: ''Mon is a state-building animal.'' He bas his individual life, and also bis life as a member of a ce operative community, te the building of which he must make some sort of contribution. This is Aristotle's conception of the state: ''The state is that arrangement of society in whieh individual man can live the best life; and the best life fer the individual is that which is lived in society.'' There you get the two complements. The state, then, should be se organized as te make possible the best life for its citizens; and the best life for any man muet be the best life that is lived in society. If we are to expect anything worth while from education, thon education must be the chief business of the state, because it must be that function of the state by which the co- munity becomes the vohiele of the best life for its individuals. Ruskin said: ''We have made nany busi- nesses in the city. It is time te realize that its chief industry is the manufacture of human souls.'' We have in Canada a body of intelligent public criticism in matters of edncation; but until we advance so that, in election time, the main question we put te the candidate is: \"What de you think about the bringing up of tlie children?''-till we get such conditions as that, ladies and gentlemen, I say we have no real answer te the question: ''What may we expect from education?'' That was a magnificent conception of edu- eation that Pericles stated in tbat glorious speech before the people of Athens, begin- ning, ''Athens is the school of Greece.'' Plato said: ''Our children are feeding, as it werc, upon a pasture, and that pasture is the state. If the food within that pasture 1s bad, they will not thrive; but if the pasture is good, they will grow up in the likeness of things that are beautiful, and the state will be full for them of breezes that blow from the fresh and fair country, bringing healing on their wings.'' What did the Greeks expeet from educa- tion? When the Greek boy had completed bis studios, he took upon him the shield and the sword that were the insignia of bis citi- zenship. He swore that he would defend the faith of bis fathers and the gods of bis coun- try in their temple; and that he would, either alone or with others, defend the institutions of bis country; that he would leave bis father- land not only as beautiful, but a great deal more beautiful, than she was wheon b- queathe to him. Suppose every child in Canada left school with thoughts like that in bis head, and words like that upon bis lips! THE TRAGEDY OF GERMAN EDUCATION (Prof. Dale, MeGill University) Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen: The subject of my address tonight bas becn ehosen by your exerutive from the list Of subjeets whirh I put before them-no doubt because, to all of us who are engaged in the teaching profession, there is something act- ually tragie in the present position of Ger' mnny in the war. We, many of us, have come closely into touch with German professors and German ideals. Wheo I have to teach my own stu- dents the method of work, or the history Of modern education, Germany looms very large. Although we have all of us been aware Of certain dangers and difficulties in connOctiOn with that education, yet, even then, to ail f us it came as a severe shock (not that We had considered war impossible, but that war should lbe accompanied by sncb a complete relaxation of moral fibre). If education meaS any thing to us, it means a stiffening of 0ur mental stkmina, assistance to our self-control, an organization of our thought and will by which we can keep our beads in crises. it does not mean that, it means something less than it should. The spectacle of Germany is not only tragic, it is a probleni. We want to ask ourselve's ''What are we to expect from education, this is the result in what we bad thought to a",
         "TIýrLIAU;EI)Y OF GEI~AN EDUCATION be the inosf highly cîlueatoîl country of i We have our ow.n proble ahcad of uis, and1 it tiaY lie, that in oui' solution of themi, w e cau' study flic Gerînan spectacle to aux an- titge. You learu more fromn wise mceli s folly thaîî yen learn froli %viHidon. The 'oducat jouai systein of Gerniany had its rise whOn Germany .itself was engaged in the PrOcess of reeonstruction. It is only fair to \"Y there is no more inspiring spectacle than that resurrection of Crinany. She set f0 WV'ork to bujld up tli Empire that should be litPrerne flot oilly i outward thuings, but ini th'e reaîm of the mmid. That was \u003cloue witli rrlagnificelif poî'soeeroute a ild magnificott Patriotjsmn. But 1 want f0 show youi how there \"'a' division1 iin this reconstrucfîvo work fal C'er'nany. 1i tike solie passages froîn souie Of the mnost rvimarkalîle ulocumcueitq il nmuodernî literafure, the speeches of the great phuloso- Plier Pielite, whicýh he delivcred f0 the German ulfiversity students. .'\"The state,'' hc says, ''which desires to ilierease its internaI strength is forced f0 the gradjîal abolition of ail privileges alld flie establishment of equal riglits for aIl niou, ltl Order thait if omas- prosoCrve ifs own trui' liglit, nameîyý to al ppis the wliole surluLs 1l\u003coWer of al] ifs cifizoens fui the furthcraucec of ifs OWn PurPoses.'' '5011 notice there flic note of self-saýrifice Whieh bas lîceti, preseut ini Ceî'niau tlioughf anld WIork. Tf calis for more ani more Self- 'acrifice Ou flh, part of fthe individual for the !lake of the, state Thoso of usq whlo are faili- Inr Wifb cîuaioa istorv know fliaf flic mnost crucial prtulii of cduetcfion lies in flic rîgfsfla , nîaî to t( flceornuuify f0 Whieh ho belOîgsý anîl those hoe owes f0 hbini- Self. frePiite KlYs llgnin: ' 'We do indecd desire freedo and WCO xglîf f0 ilesire if; hut frme freOn is te lie ohtained ouIy in flic ihigbet obedience to the law;'' fhonî, as f0 fli, app)li- ougi01 0ftist ducafion: ''The people tuli te reeivo instruefionl-fundamental, m0idI and. fvieiî instruction, not inl relig- Io o1ly, but in regarl f0 flic state, ifs pur- POeandj ifs laws. Irail 0.,r îlîamy s pe ieoches, anîl thouglif T wo)Ul Point ouf f0 i-ou bow outsîîle the life for eidxia a is flie spirit of flieni. Ilegel, exeple, regre te t is flnstt as flic sîejlrepoitCîîî oflic (lera stafoes ils flie tWay 0f ry of ah: this Culur But one reînembers-amîîl in Usf always- ho rcîîiomhercd fliaf Ger \"\"fY Weas fraîîliîi hol, polifical, social aInd ukaina ic l îdcr the îliresf possible ,h I fually life and deafh. Af ilrsf se Was' a colcto of liffle stafes, cai estoh o 'tnd by itself, and lacking fliaf tbaf t.me like, thon a groat mation. Aft 'Ti 0 to o there n'as oîîîosed f0 (oicrîllaîv k1tt 3iigbtiest liaftions, flie most elosel'y thm WorlçlO bas' nil der tlie ,rentest leader hieolf. b 01 Fra '( byoc Ie Nu p ovi 0 eht if ~5~sfiaîîlgc Ii Celoplitî fhîf flit ce froni flif pont. VWi the, fîsf plaîce i n flic wvirid tii îîîlLe tttecnti.jjve af srliool eoîipulsor v, that w-as ia 1619. Tue jlea fliaf if lvas fhe stato 's business mud Iîiilege t0 sec thaf ail the stafe 's ehuilreî wcrc ednîratcd in fli c itv sehools bcgaîî i i rîay Ilfore flic on( of the lSfli i'itiry n 1794, l'rîisi1î li gathoeoi aIl flie sc}îuîils anîd iinix-rsifies of flie state iiîfo lier owu banîds anul made flieni state institutions. The inove bail its con- sequciice fhint lefore flie ead of fhec 18fb centurv tliev liaI taken, up) this jîreiî of tuie righîf gîiilnice au dl iuistîue fion of fli c hildrcii of flic iiczf gomior- a-tion. Now, qile liv sie wifli this greaf de- velopmienf ii flic su-hiool syýsteili w.vas flic groaf dcvelopmnenf in iunive-rsify ediîilafio01. Beruliardi, hiself a relrcsciîfafive of flic (German edlucafionial svstcni, bas umade fhlis- foîîishing proîloun cîîîcaf thlif Gcrmnany is a1 country wliere fliore is ''freedoin of thouglîf andl fî'edom of words.'' But if îîilîsf ncvOr be forgoffen fliat a groaf deal oif flic edfuca- fional contributionî of Grinanv' eoînes freîu flie soufli, anu fhcr is a greaf 'deal of uliffor- ence between flic morfli aîd flic soufli. 1 lîappened recenflY f0 coulc across n passage in ''Imperial Geriininny-,' by Prinîce Von Blueloxv. lc says, ''fei cu11 cuîlture is flie juroducf of flic soul.'' Ris point of vicw is fliat flie real culture of GIeinîiy cornes fromi flic '\u003coufli, buf lier ''îurosaie mon of few woiduý but înany decds ail corne frorniflic nort.' Irf iras flicir duty nuit f0 croate culture, but te ereate a stafe whicli slioîld cmliody thaf cîl- llire. Gcrîîîlany, fo dite, lis uot, bowever, suc- cceded. ler inîlilre aîid lier state have ro- iîailied separato. Oiîo 'loftnrîuîtyicf a luan i, eligrossedi ii bulsiness, wliO savs:'I bave ne time f0 rcîiil. 1 have te attenîl f0 business. But a liffle later, when my b4usi- îîess is ini shape_, I Will falko tiîn.'' But WC Il kçnow fliaf flic fliuig eaniioflic dlonc flnt w-ay. Nature will îîof have if se. The two must lic luilf absolufcl.y, vifally, orgaaiciilly fogeflier. Oflierwis flic one wliicli is flic more spirituial, flic mîore transifion-'], flic more ethereal, will have cseaped. Yen remillner Ficlite saYs, in flic queta- tien T baveî given VOU, lýiaf flic stafo must ''îl away wifli piiViloges, and ltle 'aIll mo equal.'' Af the fimo tbis doctrine was liold up te flic Gorinalis, the, greafe\u003ct inspiring for-ce in flic cdueafieliîl wOrld was P'estalozzi, wlio gof bis inspiriiig force fronithfle F'renchl llevoliifiofl. 'But, Bide by sidc Wifi flic growfh of flic C unetional s3,sfem, flîcre hall f0 lc builf np flic iiflry systei;- and flic elle tfe infe flic oflier. W ec in erunaii eduetion fiat flic niiliftirism n of flic nation lias rcactedî vittîlly tîpon flic seheol. But even, long before flic ivar îneny lid süe fiaf fheldiscipline iii fli c shoolq iras nef of the niglif, kind. There lia ben veT froigniovement in many ((editfioîFil ciisleS cniliasizig flic iicssitv of idivduaie~iioi in flicblool\u003ci. Thaf, ofindeiidflic m-îo staiftig anîu striking dle ololOiullt ini flic ducafiolialfullol,.",
         "THE WESTERN SOHOOL, JOURNAL Naw, J will show you it a fcw moments that that lias bren the principle upan wbirb the Vnglisb systemn was built up. Aniyotir that knows the Englist publicý s(-haals kuîows there is nothin, nmore astai\u003e isbinig than the trani play. it often serins ta nie that England set ont ta canquer the world lurgely for the sake of exercise. Wben the va uag fellow fresb from the university gars ont ta the Soudan, for instance, ho takýes bis dlace as if ta the manner torm. But the kind of disciplinie iii tbe Gernian schools, f orbidding or eceki ng indivitinal expaasion-uîîîer tbis the niagaificent initiative of tbe boy is pracr tically tliscauruged. liHe is naot onl]y discaur- a ged, but prevciited froni rracbig a fuît andî lîealthy devrelopmeit . The effect upan bis meintal development is deadeniiig. Yct their bigb school curriculumîîs-ser how far almeud tbey are! 1 bave fou-nd lu the bigb sebool classes thero boys able ta talk Frenich amui Eils quite fiuratly, alîle ta \u003cla fine work iii'Latin and Greeli; and ail within tbe higb sciîool curriculum. Noxv wbat tapeard lu the development of the Germuan educational systeni? Sinre 10 amid miore espiecially sinco 1870, German cdu- ration bas pane abeait uiirac\\uilausly. Al teachers la Germmany wore servants of the state. Tbat kind of relation tetweon the toarlier and the stato was fraugbt witb dan- ger. Naw, la England, the universities andf liigb sehIools arr very jouions iii guarding thoir rmgbts froîa the iiitrferonce of the state; anîd the state is just as mîucb afraid ta tout'b tbommt ns sboy are afraid of boing taucbed by it. 1 remiimber, la the case af may awn scbool, the f eeiing was very strong tbat wr augbt nat ta afllow the state ta bave aaytbing ta \u003cla witb t. Alucb af the enitbusinsin of the Etomi ani Uuigliy boy for lus seboal woulîl ho îipossibîle muîîer thc Germiiin systeni. My awn uuîlver- sity af Oxford was jealous evemi of govermi- munît iiislirction. The saine tbing, 1 aîay say. ms truc af MlcGill, wbicb yau mmay lie surîîrîsod ta heur has bon very bard up for a long timne; as lilce Oxford, tboy takie tbr uuast elaborate îreiautiouis ta avaiil being emtangîcît ii aîîy af the ''strings\"' attacbod ta gavoramnen t gýrants. lIn order ta pet around those, we de- eide to tausk the province ot Quebe' anti tbe i'ity af MAontreal for ai\u003e amouiît; but lu lîotlî theso rases we sait deidedlyv: ''Wr arr nat poing ta give you any privileges in roturît for these grants.\"' Wr wilt not toîrrato amîy iiiterferemicc of the state. But the (lorinan way is exactly opposite. tii the case of the counîtry sebools in Egaii which arc state subools, you wauld hoe sur- îîrîsed if i was ta tell you bow tbey bocamne state sehools. But tbc go' orumuiemt praîît iii Enuglanil dors nat invalve nmîy stato comtrol. This dlivision wbich wc bave see.n in Ger- nin h as broui fatul ta the Gernaii c ,Illca- tioiîal systeu\u003e. It bas tutally ulestrayeul thuit fieim, that initiative, that exîîansiamî, which grew uji as liait of the Mnglisb systein of eîincatiom. The Germn nethod is funîla- unontally o1î1oscd ta the îîrimcitdes ot dJenur- i acy. I t is etlucatiaîî under pîressure, wbich makes the greatest attainument impassible. The fundamental thing about educatian is this: That we sbould. bring aur eidren inito possession of the spiritual anti inateriat achieveîneîîts of the race; second, that thr spirit whlch made these achievemients passible shaulîl te euntinured and imîîroved. That is why, lu a crisis of the worlîl's bis- tory, Germaniy bas faîled tbe world. She put ber magnificeat nmacbine together, and thon failed ta use it for tbe rigbt end. She bas not oaly sacrifierd the bodies of ber citizens, but thoir minds as weIl. Berubardi dlaims, over aud over againi, that the Gernian sword must bo unsheathoul lu order ta carry Germait cul- ture through tbe warlîl. But Berubarili, aI- tbough be waats ta carry this culture thraugh the worl at the l)aiflt of the sword, shows pluinly that ho belioves culture xvas a waste of timo. Wer stili mîust, anti alwuys will admire tbt' devation andi self sacrifice witb which (1cr- many bas tuilt up ber oducationial systîni. Thoso of yon wha are teachers will always bic grateful ta Gerinany for the honorable place sir gave the toacber iii the coininunity. Ti, tnuy ways, we must reinier that wo bave a great dleal ta lrarîî froîn Gerînany. What is it that Wr must esprcially learui, that ivili brîji us la answcr ta the question W\u003e' iliscussedi l the afternoan: ''Wbat are wt\u003e ta expert tram rîlucatiauf'\" This: That unloss aur educatian produceS rrspîopsile mcii, froc intelligent mtîn, uiC0 wha rau face crises, stand uîoîî their fret nad talce their share lu the gavernient af tbL, state, then it mîust be a, failure, as tue edu- ration of Gerînaav was. The tragrdy of Gerîna education, then, iS this: That she sot out upon the right road, with a utagnifirent goal iii vieW, bin t 111 înacbiniery whieb she thanglit waulîl acliieve it, ouiî then, wheil the crisîs caine aud ber belli was neeîled iii the councils ut the world, qhe fouîîdl tbat the sjpirit af ciluaaion haîl escalidl lier uiid ste biad lîctrayed the tause wbo5C champlioni sbe bail brou. IIYGIENE AS APPLIEI) TO SCIIOOL PUPILS Dr. J, }lalpenny (Simnmaryî It is right for- the peoplde af i liinîinunity tO live eniy.It is as uecessary ta teacb 11Y' pleur as it is ta teacb reaîlîag and writing. it us as inmpossibîle ta return ta bealtb and Vigat a persan wha bas lîraken down, as it 15 tO teach an 1\u003e1 (log new tricks. Evon 'yet 5O11 peopîle are ouîîîaed ta sucb a gooti tbiug g vacciuiation. lPeople will makie no mistake iî uîctiîug ou wbut is alnîast the unlaniiois uou5 1\u003e1 in of the medical profession. Saine are .vC opposed] ta anti-diphtherietlr seruna. VacCifa* tiouu is uiot liiniited ta suinîl pax. lu Paris 30O, 000 doses for typhoidl are administered ever\u003e",
         "MINUTES \u003ciay. Every sol(îier in Winnipeg has beca, or M'ill be, vaccinated for typhoid. The day bo- fore the speaker had seen six hundred pass in Itrece('ssion before the hospital tables. Teachers eould dIo a great ileal by nmaki1)g Use Of the bulletins isued by the city, anti by the Departnient of Agriculture. Among these Were blilletins relatiuîg to pure mnilk, to water sulplly, ventilationi and storîn sashes; infant mnortality, and the eare of infants; to flies ati inosquitoos; te inifectious diseases. In former days it was a favorite sehool ex- eycise te trace the stor y of a lump) of eoai. It wvould be a more interestifng alid v~aluable ex- oeise te trace the life of a niicrobe frin i t s origia-down te the timie Jlhnny. tied of ty- 1îhoitl fever. The Secondary Section MINUTES The Secondary Section of the M.E.A. meýt iu the Kel vin Techuiical Iligli 8cho0l, Tuîes(lay niorning, April 6tb, !%r, R, M. Stevensonî iii flic chair. There was a very good attendance of Hig 1 Sehooj teachers, somce 110 being pres- ent. Mr. S. E. Lang presenited flic report Of the eommitfee tliat wvas appointed as4t Year to revise the lligh School Pro- graîîîfle T his was followed by a very earnest dis'cussion led by soine of the leading te0lege and Iîigh Sehool teachers. Some 0f th\u0026se taking part iu the discussion ver'e: Messrs. Fletcher, Newconîbe, Me- In1tyre, Allen, Warren, Campbell, ,Shieid8, Bayley, Little, Simnpson and larris. Then the report was referred to the Sub-sections on Wedîlesday *rnorning, April 8th, the reciver Section met as a whole toreiereports froin the sub-sections. Rports were received from the «ItllratisEnglish, Ilistory, Classies, Techncal and Manual Train- 111g sub-sections and were adopted. The Science sub-sýection submifted a report, but if was referred back to thein 80 thaf fhcy could give a fuller OUflne of th, course desired in Science. This Science section were authorized to it esent their report later and thaf Woujjd be adopted. The Agriculture section did not make a report, but it was thought desirable that the Secretary ask fhem to do so. MloVed bY Mr. D. MeDougail, sec- OtL1dedi by Mr. 1). Bi. Hluggins, Thaf the Colnnitee on the Iligh School course of stifdies be re-appointed for the eii- suîng year, ivithi any suibseqiuent addi- tions to its neînbership, f0 inake sucli further mnodifications in flic course of stildies, as they inay (leera neccssary and advisable ini accordance with the sense expressed by the teachers of the seconidary section iii session and that they make sucli representations t0 the Advisory Board and University Concil as ry sein desirable with the view of having the course of stifdy as revised adopted by these bodies. Car- rie d. Moved by Miss Poison, seconded by Miss Doupe, That Miss Brunisterniani be added to General Comrnittee. Carricd. Moved by Mr. Garrett, That the re- ports submitted by tlie sub-scctions bc cdited and printed in the Western Sechool Journal. Carried. Election of Officers Secondary Section ('hairman, D)r. Gillan, St. John; Sec- î'etary, M. Cumimings, Teulon. Sub-sections Matheînatics-Cairînan, Mr. Me- Donald, Portage; Secretary, Mr. Simp- son, Brandon. Science- English-Chair 'manî, A. M. Shields, Virden; Secretary, Miss ThompSOfl, St. John. IIistory-~Chairînan, Mr. W. l3ayley, Kelvin; 8Secrotgry, Mr. Burland, Stone- wval].",
         "TIIIE WESTERN SCHOOI, JOURNAL, ?4odcrns- (liai riiiiii \\Iýiss Dotipe. C'entral; 'Secretary, Hiss MeIKenzie, Ke]lvin. Classies-( ~ P Chinaî.1.. Dobsoni Agriculture ('lia irma n Mi- Robin- qon, Stonewall: Secretarv, Technical and Manual Training- C'hairînan, M1'r. W. J. Warters, Winni- peg; Secretary, Mr. R. B3. Vaughan, Kelvin. We would recoiiniend that nminute books be provided for the, different sec- tions and sub-sections. We would also suggest that the sib- sections hold tbeir meetings previous to th, 'Secoîîdary Section mneeting as a wholc. ('hairman, Rl. M. Stevenson. Secretary, 1). 13. Iluggins. SECRETARYS REPORTI The report of the lligh Sehool Coin mnittec was presented hy S. E. Lang, inspector of high sehools. Hie said that for the past few years there hiad been considerable discussion iii the Educa- tional Association ancl elsew'here con- eerning the work of the high sehools in. their relation to the comrnunity at large. Nearly every variety of opinion lina( been expressed. Tt lhad been said that the high seheol should devote more attention to the large number of stu- dents who go direct froin the high sehool into practical life and much less to the smallcr number who intend te go forward te the university. It had beeni said, on the other hand, that the strength of the higli sehool lies in those studies which are noxv requîred for university entrance, and that what is -needed is not less but rather more eml)liasis upon uni- v ersity requiremients. Complaint had been made that owing te the pressure of certain less important studies wc do flot now send forward our, university students properly cquîpped. Tt was urgcd in oCher quarters that in the very important duty of prepar- ing Young people for service as teachers in tIlle eli mentary seb ools, o or lugh sehools were hamperýed by conditions ereatcd by univcrsity requirements. An examînation of thc limie tables of vani ous higli schools had showiî a, eoiisider. able divergence of practice correspond. ing to these differences of opinion as to the relative importance te various courses and of the differejît subjeefs of study on the programme. Thiere had been gencral agreement, however, that the high sehool course should be re- vised and re-organizcd, auîd accordingly a committee was apppointcd last year te go inito the inatter ami report to the association at the present meeting. Mcthod of procedure The first task of the commiiittec w'as te agree upon a list of subjeets re- quired in a modern high sehool for the various types of pupils, ai-d then te iii- dicate the relative importance of these subjeets by setting out a time division, se many heurs per weck, for cach group. This gencral time allotmient was arrived at after much discussioni and careful consideration. Each incli- b)er of the committee made ont a sched- niie showing the amoiunt of timie 'which in his opinion, ought te be devoted te each group of subjeets. rlhesc varieUS sets of figures wcrc then examined and compared. It was found that theY were rcmarkably close together, and, aifter full discussion, an arrangement of lime was flnally agreed ou. A sheet containing these figures ývàs printcd and distributed amnong the high sehool teachers. Chairmen of sub-commnittees on si- ence, mathematies, history, English, etc., were then appointed, wîth instruc- tions te confer with the teachers in these subjeets and report te the ilaifl cominittee on1 threc points. Within thie limits of the time suggestcd they were te indicate the branches that ouglit te be included iii a three-years' high school programme in cach of thc thre courses - university, teachers, coin liined. They were te indicate by Year~ the order iii which these branches should be taken up. They were te set",
         "sE4cRWI'AJýiY's REPORTl out in saine detail, referring to text- books where neeessary, the extent of Work that ought to bie undertaken iu eaeh branch. The reports of the sub-cornmittees were duly placed before the main Coin- rnittee, and, in course of time, a draft report was framed, which was printed and sent out jiîst before Christmas ta everY higli sehool teacher and trustee ini the province. Teachers were invited tO examine the draft report and offer further criticism and advice. This inl- vitation was acted upon by a consider- able number. The members of the coin rnittee received much assistance and advice in persona] consultation with individuais, and some 24 letters were recelved froin variaus parts of the prov- ince. These critîcisms wcre sununiarized and elassjfied in convenient form, and thle committec devoted much tinie and 3tudy ta tliem. As a result of the care- fui eonsideration of the matters deait With in the communications receîved .fromn the teachers, it was decided that certain muodifications in the way o changes and additions should bc mnade in the draft report. Critjcisms directed against the timec aiiotmlent related chiefiy to the ainount of timle devoted to English, one or two 81uggestio15 being made that the time for iEiglish shonld be reduced i the iflterests of mathematics; but, broadly sPeaking, the teachers generally seern to have accepted the time allotinent as a\"~ equitable one, and confined their crîtîcismas to the nature, extent and se- qu\"enee Of the work proper to be under- takenl in each branch or subjeet un- CludedlWti h eea eatet Ofhigh sehool'work. Science Comng1 10w to details and taking sciencee fIrst, it may be said that while the 'On'nunications received contained rallch 'natter concerning the right con- 0ut f Science teaching, the principal Polijt bearing directiy upon the pro- Pos dais eoth comittee as set down in tue raf reortwas the suggestion.that physies and chemnistry arc both neces- sary to a proper understanding of bot- a ny. iFowcver, the committee are of opinion that the time allotment and the or(1(r of takinig Up the branches men- tioaied should serve the needs of pupils of high sehool grade, and aceordingly 110 chiangle was made i11 the recomnmen- dations for scienice. Mathen'iatics Twelve of the twenty-four eommuni- eatioiis receivc(l deait with the subject of inathiematies at somne length. 0f the twelve, only two expressed satisfaction withL the eominnfttee's proposais. The (ithers vigoroausly iislniled the proposed arrangement of the work in mathe- mnaties, w'hich wvas variously described as the weak point in the report-ob- jectionable, a retrograde step, a great jiiistak e, at variance wvit1 ail estab- ]ishied eustoni, a rcckless experiment, revolulionary, too drastic, ruinous to grade 12 mathiematies, and likeiy to pradiuce a bmvl fromi thc country. In viow of the strong opposition to the pin ouutliincd in the draft report, the comnittee decided to xithdraw the first proposed aîîd to rccommend that arith- ineties be taught in the ninth and eleventh grades, geometry in the tenth and eleventil, and algebra throughout the thiree years. linder this arrange- ment, about 30 per cent. of the time ai- lotted ta mathematies for the -three years goes to arithmeti3, 30 per cent. te geomcetry, and 40 per cent. to ai- gebra. English The coammittee decided to make no0 change iii the time allotmeflt for Eng- lish. There were a few complaints that too much time is given to this subject. it is noteworthy that two of the strong- est advocates of the reduction of the time for English, point out the danger of killing the love of? litorature by too many hours devoted to its study and dissection in1 class. However, the com- inittee decided to let the original recom- niendation stand, and added the sugges- tion that a series of tern esgays, certi-",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOI, JOURNAL fied by the teacher, be required in addi- tionili to t regular exaissation iii Eng- 1Istory No 01jeetiols werc offered to tise Iiiiie ai lotinient iii history. Three of the eî gli i personis wlio eniiîîîa with tuie vnilliniil tee (l I ili. subl.jeci a1îproveid informations of tise atssociation. The' coinmnttee 's reconmnendation is : Grade 1) British and Caîsadian; Grade 10, Aiscierit and Mediaeval ;Grade 1l, Mod- erii. The1 other suggestion is: Grade 9, Ancient; Grade 10, Meriaeval and Mod- ern,1; Grade 11, Britishi Empire. It ought tII be added that sonme of tise verýy in- tereistiiig colt) Il] 1ieatîons on1 lîstory ORIGINAL RECOMMENDATION 0F COMMITTEE Allotment of time per week in hours for various Subjects of Study in Seconclary Schoole G, . ... ... ... Geograptillîs'......... ý l1t1. sejence .. Botany ....... ... \"Ilysic, ... - hiliaitrll.......... Total Science .... Arithiefltic ......... Algebret............ (4coinetry ............ 'I'rigononlieti, l... Total Mathemnatics Comîposition ...... (4 anirnar ....... .. Litcrature ...... ..... Total Enatisli . Total Hlstory . .. Latin ý.............. Frenîch ....... ....... Total Foreign L. School Arts and Elemi. Branches .. Physical Edlucation . Music and Orawing.. Ednl. Handwork. Vocational... ....... Un ive rsity Teachers Combinedl Technical Practical Arts (Girls) 9 10 il 9 10 il. 9 10) il 9 10ii l 9 10 il 2 '22 I 3i 3 1 3 1 33 2 2 2 3 3 3 3 5 2 3 3 2 3 à 4 21,4 3 1 4 4 2V4 1 ' 2ý/ 2 2 2 U 2 2 11 2 2 '1 1 1.ý 2y, 3 4 4 4 4 4 4 4 4 4 3 4 Y2 6 2Y4 2 4 2 V4 2 2 :3 2. 2 3 2 2 3 1'2 2 2 1 134 1 y2 1 i 1 1 1 1 2 2 22 3 2 2 3 2 2 3 1 Y2 2 2 1 2 12 5 6 5 6 5 4 4 4 3 -Y 3 3 3î 3î 3 3 :î 6 6i 2 2 2 3 3 2 3 3 2 3 3 2 2 V4 2' Y4 2Y 3 3 3 3 3 3 .4,1 4' 22~ 2 2 2 2 2 2 3 3 3 3 3 3 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 1 1 2 1~ 1'2 1 - 1' , 1~ y.2 23i 25 25 25 25 25 '25 25 lii e a, grajilgeiiients 1iro1oscd. Several, h nveve , rged tise objection tihat grade 31111e studesîts arc tircd of B3ritishs ;îîd ('anadian history, which thcy have beeni sttidyiîîg for thrc years, and that I lîey siîoîld have soînething nesv at this stage. Tise coinsnittce miade no change îîif i ist rccoiîsnseîsdation in this sub- .jeet. Jlowever, it was thoughit desir- ;ile tiîat two sîîggcstions-one a littic iire detailed ilhan thc other sisomld be p resenît e alolig Nvithl thle report foi' thc 8 V 8%~ 7 71, 10'ý 1054 25 26Y2 26 26 '26 26 26 woffld have been much more valuable i f tbey hiad lîees aecomplanied by con- erete proposais for tise allocation of the varlions phases of historical study. Foreign Languages rEhe recomusendation that the foreigfl language work of the eosnbincd course lîc ]imitcd to Latin is regardcd by the coînnnittee as an important feature of the report, and, if it meet the approvftl of tise alssoeiatioîý at coinsutic miglt A",
         "bc appoiîîte(1 to brnîg the moatter before the boar'd of studies of thc iiniversity. OnîIY two w'ritten coimmunications bear- iiig lipon the subject of lîigh sclîool Latin reached flue eommittee. and these WVerc1 favorable to the comîinittee's rcc- olrnendation. A number of letters, dealing with, French wcirc reccived, W1hich are of great value as a criticisrn 0f the aims, methods, and resuits of the -tudIy of the Frenîch language iii our high sehools. Another impulortant reature of the re- port is the place given to the so-callcd sehool1 arts of reading, l)enlfiflshii) and 9Pel]ing, 11n1the flc eview of clcmeuîtary branche,; Wlîat is involvcd iii this mrc- view is set forth. in saîfficient defail in the Printed. draft, report. The value of suich a review f0 the prospective teacher inl mir eltliicnttarv selîools ouglît to bc f-irly Obivions. rphî conrimuittee consid- 11% it highlv necessarv. The reîiîîùîjIjg to ie involve notbing \"iltCntio.1î5, anid (o10 not)ea for special (comnnient. Sumggestions Equitable This I)rogramrne, if adopted, should Prove sem'viceabîe in several. wrays. First as to the subjeets. An attcînpt has been 'flade to adjust and correct the dispro- Portionatp allotment of timce to varions StlisIt is l)elieved that the arrange- eutSUgcst\u003c1is fair and etjuitable ~n ~i1serve as ai lasîs for, a reason- able Year 's work f0 be prescnibed iii Qeh Sîîbject. As regards the studeiits, thre is here ind(icatcd a11 eua(- Viýi1 of the timye of the teaeliing staff (aniong the varlions courses, and the 25 orhOe r cent. disability under wbieli the Students in the teachers' courses hae bece1 ]l)oning wili be removed. As 1rcegards Ille tcachuîîlg staff, the proposcd arrangenient shoul d gî91I si11mplifv the tîme-tal)le podci aîîd So inc(,reaseý econoiliy a at effliîenc a1 r-ound(. Sup1leîncntaiy Reeoimcendatioii 1. Th(, (Coanittee decidcd that the iol]owiiig should take the place of thb\" courses suggesl cd al)ove iii Math- emiaties ( UnîiversîtY, Teachers anîd Coin- bined) hiude IN Gradef N (laeXI Arithmcfio, 2 0 il Algebra ... 2 2 1 (leoinety . O 2 il 2. Tfhe Comnmittee further recoin- menti thaf a scries of terni essays, ccl'- tified by the tcaclier, 1w rci1uired ini addition to flic regular examinatioli ini English Composition. 3. Tlie following suggestionis rc Juis- i ory wel-c slll)ititteil foi the consider- ationi of flhc Coiriiiitttec: 1. Grade IX, Oriental Grcek and Ro- mail Periods (i[cîs X, medîaeval aind Modern IPcriods ; Xl, Sfory of the British lEnipire with special empliasis on Constititi nal1 IIistory of Canada. 2. Grade IX, (a') Geuceral. Survey of the Ilistory of Grcece -%ith defailed Study of the Age of Pendesi; (b) Gen- cral Survey of the Ilistory of Roie with dttiled stiudy of (1) The work of Jiiuis Cacsaî; (2) 'l'le Age of Augus- i us cacsar; (3) Con0istitultioflal develop- ment of C'anada since 1763; Grade X, Mediaeval and Modern Tlistory (My- ers) ; Grade XI (a) rpe Story of the, Britisît Empire \u003cMvcyrs) ;(b) Civies (Bourniot). Tt wvas thouglit desîrable titat these two plans shjould be prescnted for the ilnformatioli of the, Associatioli along Ivith the course î.ecollîmended above. (1OînnatîS'Oll With. ReconImcfldîtioîî of NIL.E.A. NTJ~' A mil tT nits .. . ..f. . . . Ufi'ts 0f u f.rejgin ]anguag .. 0I f soXi adffsov ofl' 0 Naturai Science .......... \" Additionai, Units '«ýRr9nRP Units ............. Combifled Course as above 20 %...... 16/75=21.3% English 13.3% .............. 9/75=12 % -Latin 13.%.........2/75 = 16 % MNathecmti(. 13.3%..............18/75 = 10.6% Ilist0rý 6.6% .............. /75 = 10.6% Nntural Science 13.3% '1~22/75.-29.3%/ Otiier branclicS 26.6% (",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL. COMMITTEE ON ENGLISH Minutes *Wedîuesday inorning af 9.30 the Eng- lish Section met in llooin 27, Mr. -W. B3. Beer of Brandon heing chairmnan of the, meeting. Mr. Cowpcrthwaite opeiie(l the dis- cussion ifh a paper on the stfudy ùf English iii flc Iligh Sehools. Grarmar.-Two lîours per week con- sidercd sufficient fiune foir work in Grade IX. Work practïcally eovered iin this grade ani review wvoi-k leff foir Grade X. C'ompositioni nafurally follows. In (GradlTx twu forty 1fiiiine poriods per' weel\u003c, one given f\u003c) fhcory. flie othier fo oral and writfeni worh. Debates and oral1 composition considered very valu- able. Aim.-To secure clear and cor- rect expression. Liiterafuire.-Twvo periods a week to Le given to var;ied and difficuif sfudy. TPhe fwo poeins 'Aîîeieîît Mariner\"' and ''Vision of Sir liauiufal. '' COid(ered unu- -suitable and iuîsuîfficiemf foir Grade IX. Ontario course superior to ours. A ehoice of fwcnty-five authors for exten- sive rcading, biesidles selections for special stud 'y. Miicli mcunory work rec- ornmended. ýel A discussion followed, ledl by Mis s ('oldwell, of Kelvin. Speaking of Composition in Grade XI, with reference f0 extra time al- loffed f0 Composition, Miss Coldweil severely erificised the examinations set, also the method of reading the, papers in final examination. The feacli- ers require assurance that examinafions will be intelligently set and read. Text contains models and exercises logieally arranged. Plan.-1. Deduce principles, fromn models; 2. Then use text; 3. Then apply principles in practice. Teaeh oral expression. Three hours not too miueh f0 accomplish ail that is neeessary in Composition. Dr. Gillen expressed flhc opinionu that too littie literature is assigned, and that flot of the riglif sort. ''Skçetch Book\"' recomînended. En- ouigh style anîd color to iriterest pupil. Diffoeet literatuire sh oufl d e st1ndied ini Grade X. [il Grade XI. on1e jilaY not sufficiui for studv. Tu-o l)lays at least anîd per- lImps tbree iaigbit lie stu(iied. GTreaiter variety in poetr 'y is desiral)le. Thle question w-as isked : Wliat cou ,,itutes knweleof a play of Shuake speare? It w as slugg'este(l tilat Impers siiouli eseLy those actually eîîgaged iii Tligh Sehool work. Tlie value of ineinory work wvas cm- Ijlhasized by tlie chairnn. MlVr. Cowpeîtlhwaide 's opiniioni was tilat four or five books should lie pre- seribed for regular sfîîdy anîd several slipj)]eieiufalary except in Grade XII. plea foi, sînailler seblools wliere one teacher is responsible for seveInIl slb- jeefs w,-as miade Lv Miss Yemen and Mi-. Johnstone. A couifler w-asý( appoint cd to report -il a,1 ateî nieetinîg als to w1haf is iîludied in flue situdx- of -a library selectiouî. rphîci Miss Yeînen, Mr'. Jolinstone, Mi,. Cow- perliwa itc a nd Dr. Gillen. Election of Officers Moved by Di. Gillaîî, seeouîdred by Miss Coldwel], tlîaf Mir. Shie1d1s of Vir- defl Le chairinan. Carried. Moved hy Miss, ColdwelI, sceoiudecd by Dr. Gillan, f hat Miss Tlîouîpsoii of Sf. John's be appoinfed secretary- Carried. Comunittee instructed to Lring in r'c oîincndation rcgardiiig propel' sîuppl' of paper or nîote books for us in 111igh Sehools. There being nuo further bîiuS meeting adjourned. Reconimendations The Sub-Comnîittee on English begs to present the following recommnend8- tions witlî regard f0: (1) Grammiar in. Grades IX and X.- More time should Le given to Synthe8'5 than to Analysis. Examiners shOi1d h",
         "('0l%IM 1'\"I' EH ON MlOD)ERN 1,A\u003eNGUAUEý(,I give mnore eredilt foi, C2onstructionï thaîî for Analysis. (2) Composition. 0f t-he tw-o hours, (iiVided juta ti re far-t v minute pros onle, 'nt ieast, shouldîleh givoea ta orll eomnPosition. (3) Literatulre.-Thle f o il o w i il g sliould dispia1ce litera turc riow td led: 111 alterliat( eai uis as anld MlidsiinriirNiglmt 's Drea ni, Lay of thec Last Minstrel and Lady of the Lake, Trealsure Islanîd anid lvaiilîoe, Jungle flOok (Book 1) and Silas Marner, The' S ketch Book to lî( rîeîl in both grades. Coumposjtion, Girade XL. Taif tbe tiirme sliould be given to traiing inl Oral B\"Xpressiou a1 ](1 Debate ; liaif to Thoyand Practice of Composition. Literature. ,For. Stuidy :ilamnlet, Warren Hastinigs, Pacîns of iRointi'e Perod(sletias diedby Prof. Susaî Camnerol) ; Onitside iReading: Sir Roger dle Coverley. Quentin Bnirward, The Crick~et on the I-leartm. The Conuhîjittee is off 1eoiiii th a t astuldelt; nîay ime said to kniowv a play of hakIespeare: (1) If hie knlows hy heart the gener- ally aceeepted ,leoabepssgso the play.moalpasgsf (2) If be eaun oiitie iiu lis owfl W'rsthe stor-y of the play. (3 If lie eau i prove blis uiîderstamd- Ig0'a giveil passa ge i\u003ey reprodiueing hji, ls OM'u wol. S ()If he eaul explaili short psae wth referene to) the eontext. ()If h(e eau qulote frorn the pla~y diUiepassages. (6) If hie klnow's the siieeificencn 111g Of the iius;iiî words in the play. (7) If lie Cani by reeeest9 p»is- agsor by (Iiotatjians. showv Illecar pacte of th lic mii andm woiîaen in the fluies'ytt tlic exîaitiers ini intel'- atur C111(omipositioni set fleicper's wýith an oy th 1 î\u003c.oia îndations Conf8 11 k .d 1 1,1 I l d li m of the nî aîiilaiiby dia tli stiid(f1l îily siieli lîmowiedge as il[ajy lie exî\u003eeced troni a Iligi School student. T1he Siib-( oiîniittee furtier recoin- imends thai f ile exa imi ations in Liter- aitire and C omîposition be seleetemi from quiestionis Siiiiialittedl 1y a Comittee of Jlîgii Seiîool teaehers. *Ve recoiiieid that: tIie T)eîartilueit solJstandm-a dize lthe iote paper uised liy tbe Itie ,eiei l lte f herne- 1Iper. COM\\MIT'JEE ON M\\OI)ERN LANG UAGE '1l'le Mlodlern Language saib-section of tie M.E.A.. miet on WeasaApril 7thi, witii Miss F. B. Poison ini tue chair, and Miss S. A. MeMlorine acting as sec- m-etary. Summary of Discussion Mr. A. 1). Balmker, of St. .Jol's Col- 1 -ge., gave ani interesting address, in wvlileit lie enilJ)hasized( the followinig p)oints: 1st 'rih1t we protest agaiiiist aiiy ,siortening or ' ilie ftinte limit for Mod- erms. 21ld.-Tbait au lonor Matieulation (Course, siîilar ta Iliat; whieh obtaimîs ii Toronito, lie slnlstitiitel ili ail sub- jeets of the 111gb Seimool. course, thus I'élying a real famiffation for university wvork, anld înakiîîg tlic college ivork a real pleaslire. 3rdl.-Tliat tlie sJ)eiking of tlie lang- nage is naot the 1îrilnary aim in the Iligli S eliaul or evell i the [Tnjiverisit.y.thoioug it is reeoiîaeided that teachers use the conversationial nuethod as mudli as is possible. The knowledge of fhe reading and writiiig of flic language is the primlaîy aimi. Tlîe speakilig of the laîîlguage is a sce(onidmiiy nitfei for flie geilerality of studeilts. 4tli.-Tiit there is absolute necessity laur tue teae(,Iiiig of pure grammnar, anîd nî\u003ct of aiîmig at tlie deduction of ruies froin reaml îg. \u003c orrelaitioli if isoiated iii a text 01, Me 1riil intari 51 L ''Iil.1180' sliotld le miadle of a ýIiOl't t ext-book of prose fronit %iiilih",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL to deduce grammar rules, in addition to the usual literature texts. For these rules a topical study was suggested; and the anliicipative pleasure of the stndent after a mastery of the grammar points was emphasized. The meeting was then thmown open for discussion. The question of our aim in teaching French was considered fimst. Miss Brunsterman made a strong plea for the thorough teaching of elementary English grammar in the grades preced- ing the Iligh Sehool, that the pupils might the better cope with difficulties in the study of other languages. Shp cmphasized the importance of careful attention to pronunciation et the very outset. Tu summing up, she thought we should endeavor to get modemately good translation, but that the oral work must Le limited on acco-unt of the size of our classes. Miss M. MeKinnon reminded us of the probleins facing the teachers of rural sehools. Prof. Jlenzleinanhi emphasized thc, value~ of repetition in teaching language work. Every lesson after the flrst year should be made a reading lesson. We should teach ail the spoken language possible. The solution of the problem may Le found in the necessity of ques- tion and answer. Professor Heinzel- mann strongly opposed Mr. Bakem's view regamdîng tlie formai teaching of pure grammar after the first year, and favored a review of the principles of grammar through the inductive method of gathering the grammar fmom rcad- ing and conversation, with exercises based on these. Mr. Kestenbaurai considercd the aian in teaching a modemn language to Le threefold :-lst, the discipline which it ifforded through the careful working ont of the texts; 2nd. the mastemy of the *sound, and the music of the lang- uage of other nations; 3rd, the insight into the ways of thinking, ýinto the idiom, of other nations, and thc more complete understanding of their char. acteristies therefrom. Miss Poison suggested that in view of th(, faet that a very limited proportion of our lligh Sehool pupils ever enter the University, we should consider the needs of the pupils rather from the point of view of the High School than from that of the University. Our High School pupils are famishing for a wider course of reading in the modern lang- iiages. Could not a seheme be devised by whieh the teaching of grammar proper be restricted to the flrst two years, and the third year be devoted to literatlure and composition? Miss lloffner urged the importance of translation rather than of formai ab- struse rifles of grammar for examina- lion purposes. Tt is the application of the rules in ordinary reading and speak- ing that is of paramount value to the pupil. Miss MeMorine thought, that as ver-- fcw of the pupils ever come in contact with foreign people, or go abroad, the first importance be given to correct interpretation through thorougb teaching ol' grammar. The prose works' shoffld he taught as literature. The general feeling of the meeting with regard to the time limit as set hy the, committee was that a threc houxi allotaient is coniparatively satisfaetorY; but tli in consequence, a smaller amount of work in grammar as gramn- mnai should Le recommended, and in this way more timie Le afforded for the repetitiofl ani application of funda- iiital principles. Recommendations The following resolutions were then a(lopted: 1. Moved by Miss Bruns \u003eternanul, .sconded by Prof. Baker, That more Eîîglish grammar Le taughit in the ele\u0026 mentary sehool, in. order to facilitate the teaching of other languages in the lligh Sehool. 2. Moved by Miss Brunstermnll' seconded by Miss McKenzie,' That care- fui attention be given to pronunciatifl, aided if possible by phoneties, in the commencement of work in Modems. 3. Moved by Mr. Kestenbaum, sec' A",
         "(XNfiIFI~EON SCIEFNCE onded by Miss MeKinnon, rIhat a die- tation test, a reading test, and an eie- Mfentary oral test bc giveli at the lligbi ýchoo1l eaving examination, in addition to the examinations niow given. 4. Moved bv Miss McKenzie, sec- Onided by Miss'Hoffner, Tfhat the studv the first year of lligh Sehool, auJ that Of Germian in the second year. 5. Moved by Miss iloffner, seconded by Miss McKenzje, Tinît Miss Brun- Stermann represent tbc Modern Lang- lnage section on the cornmittee respect- ,Ing the Hligli Sehool Tinie Table. 4. That Miss McMorinc, of IBrandon (Moved by Miss' MeKinnon, seconded by Miss Bruinstermauniii), Miss Polson, of 'St. John's Teehuical Highi Sehool (Moved by Miss Brunsterînann, s(e onded by Miss Hoffner), and Mr. A. Baker, to represelît the colleges (Moved by Miss Fox, secouded by Mir. Kesten- bauim), be a'cominittee to confer with M1S8 Brunstermann concerning Modern Language requirenients. The 'Officers for the eusuilig year 'Ire appointed as fol]ows: Chairmrnan-Miss S. E. Doupe (Moved by miss MeKenzie, seconded by Miss Secetay-MssMeKenzie (Moved by Miss Brunsterînann, seeonded by Miss c~jno1 The meeting then adjourned. COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE The Meeting of the Science Sub- Section was held in room 37. There Were 31 present. Mr. J. S. Little oc- ~Uîdthe chair, and on his nomination 81*W addle was elected« secretary. r.Little read a paper on \" Science 'Our Iligh Sehools and Collegiate In- gStlttes-, Ife held that good Science t 111in does not depend on the quan- lity f information given, but on the POWer gained. i11 arriving at such knowl- edge; that the habit of accurate inves- tig atio 0 IiJ.ust be implanted in the îninds be Puis httecourse should 0largelY experimental; that note bokh'1OUld be carefulîy kept with the j)uils' ncoutsof experinîients and withi accurite drawings. In critieizing tHie p reseut Seience curriculum, Mr. Ljittle siated flit Botany eau on]y be ujnderst ood a fter the furidanentai. prin- ciples of Physies and Chemistry have 1\u003ecen Iearned. ie objccted to the First '[car Scienoe course as lacking in def- initcuess, and also because it interfered witli ind(uetive teaching in Inter years. le urged. ihat. (hexnistry should be taughit in tlie Arts course. The discus- sion which followcd was taken part in by Professors Buller, Allen and Parker, Miss McManus, and Messrs. Sadier, Iluntfly, Ilodgson, Grove, Gairrett, Lord, llanijîiton, and Knapp. The following were the chief points raised by thý speakers. Mr. Sadier objected to mi- eroscope work iii Botany, and to the study of Plant Physiology before pupils lind taken elernentary Physics and Cheinistry. Prof. l3uller thought Ber- genIs Botany wvas not suitable for High Sehool students and iirged the adop- tion of a book written for Manitoba. lle strongly approved of teaching from actuial. plants, and recomîuended the iii- stituition of a niuseurn in every sehool. Mr. llodgson xvas of opinion that not enougli systematie Botany was 110w studied. Mr. Grove thought that the Grade IX course was not definite, and that somne Nature Study should be taught in the publie sehools. Mr. Lord. strongly favored a fuller ehapter on the bee in the Elementary Science Course, and gave some interesting de- tails about the successful efforts of the pupils at the Britannia sehool as bee- keepers. Mr. Hamilton condemned the Grade IX course, objecting to the in- troduction of Plant Physiology and to the lack of definiteness in the chapter on Pond Lif e. In connectioii with Physies hc thought the work should be experimental, but said that because of insufficient laboratol y accommodation the teachcr's high ideals were often cast aside, and lie merely crammed for examinatioiis. Prof. Allen warned the menîbers against the dangers of too long a syllabus in Physics, but regret-",
         "'liEWE'PH SCH001, JOURtNAL ted aui c ny 10 ofietue ubIec to Meehaieis and Ileat. Mr- Knapp thlight the woirk iii Pliysics takeniin G rade X slîoifl be exinîniied at tlic eîîd of that year. Mr. Ilodgson approved of the teaehing of Chemistry in th(, Arts course, 1)111 conisîdered tlînt the timie allotted to Science was not, stiffi- (lent to allow of this. Prof. Parker coînimentcd upon the inability of uni- vcrsity stude-nts to iakçe gond, accurate drawinigs. le enipha sized t he inaport- ance nf experIillneni ai worIr ii Cliein- istry. H1e strougly (leuiotilcedl the teaehiiîg of qualitative analysis in schools and saîd tlîat it dîd mîore to harîn Scie'nce teaciiigt tlîaî anytliug else. TPhe sub-seetioîna îiiii-nously ap- proved of the aii-oitrit of timuie allottcdl to Science. Tt was decided that the, following questions, drawni up hîy the, Clinirinan and Secretary, shouild be sent to nl] \u003e cience tenelicis iii the Province, anti flic replies siiliiittcd I o tbe CiencraIl (onunittce: TPhe followinig resoltiiion ivas 1)assedl \"WNe agree to ice gencrai ailotinit ni tiiae for Science ai to flic illot- nment for each subjeet. COMMITTEE ON MATIIEMATI1(1 Tu accordance with your instructionîs, tbis cominittee met 'in ronîni 35 yester- day îaorning, April 7th. As a rcsult nf a somewhat tlîorongh and carefuil discussion the foilowing report is made: 1. That the Mathiematical Section place on record its objection to the our- tailînent nf the tiîne allottcd in our, Ilighi Sehool curriculmn to the teachiug nf Mathematies. Th~îis resolution ivas carried unanitnously. 2. That, acecpting the tiîne allotnicnt accordei to Matlienaties in tlîe coin- inittee 's report, wc recommiieid tlîat tliis time be, dîstrîltcd as follnws: G~rade IX tirade X G~rade XI Aritbmetie - 11 2 Algebra ..2 1 2 Geometry .. 2 lj - 'Plie foîloii i enlrses ;t roe on iiieiided : Aritlîîneli e Grade- X-1 J- houe1S per week J. Fractions. 1. Vulgar fractions. a. Reduction to l0weStten. b). Addition and suibtractioîî. e. M\\ultiplication and division. d. Sýimplification of not too coin- plex fractions. 2. Decirnal Fractions. a. Change of viilgar fractions tb decimals. 1). Terminating deejînals. (i) Change to vuilgar fractions. (ii) Addition ami suibtraction. (iii) Multi plication. (iv) Division. c. iRecurring decimials. (ii) Mixed Change to viigar (i) Puire Jfractions. Il. Squlare root. (a) Rational iffegers and dcci- mals. (1)) Irrational iuîtegers and dcci- mals to a î'equîreci degee of. accuracy. (c) Vulgar fractions where nuiiner- ator an(1 denominator are both, rational. (d) Vulgar fractions whcre de- nominator is irrational. III. Compound (jiantities. (a) Erîglishi, A merican, Canadiail money tables; Table of timie with notes; Tables of length, surface, volume; Table of' eapacity; avoirdupois wcight, Troy weight, Angle measureient, mîiscellaicofl unîts. (b) Reductioni both ways. (c) Addition, subtracti on, multi- plication, division. (d) To find any fraction or deci- mail of a eompound quai'- tity. (e) To express one componnnd qunntity as the fraction or (Iccimal of another of the sanie kind.",
         "\u003c)MI'EEO M'UEw;'I - V ( tier I robl emls l)r~iî\u003eially worked bvý unitary înethod fllvo]ving: ()Whole numbers. (b) Fra\u003cetioiîs (vul1gar or (leciloal). (e) ('orpouiîd quanitifies, ixitdud- ing, longitude and its rela- tion to tinme. V. Agg-regate,; and averages as in the text. V[. Percentaige. (a) Pind any p\u003eer cent. of a imuin ber, sliomi ng relation be- tweeln per cent., fractions and dceciiaals, special atten- tion bcing given to quick workl. (1») l'inî1 WIUda per cent,. one min b)er is of another. (c) Gliven aniy per cent. of a numfl ber, to find the -nimber. VIL Tradje I)iseollnt. As ii lc hereseribed text. VIII. Profit and Loss. As in t1ic l)rcseribed text. Gxrade XI. 2 ljoursý perq w'eek I. Iisin As in the Preserîbcd texti IL. Taxes. A1\"s in the prescribed text. 1-I Jnsurance. As in the prescribed text. IV. Duties and Customis. As in the preseribed text. V. imple interest. (a) Pind interest, giv en princip)al, tinie, rate. (b) IFind principal, given initerest, tinie, rate. (c) Pind fimie, given principal, in- terest, rate. (d) Find rate, given principal, in- terest tinie. (e) Pind princeipal, given amount, timie, rate. V B Iank Discount. (a) Find proeeeds and discount of nlotes: (i) flot bearing inter- ()0est; (ii) bearing interest. (b Gvenl proceeds, time, rate, find face. ()Given face, procceds or dis- counit, time, find rate. (d) G1iven face, proeeed,% or dis- comnt, rate, find tille. Vif. (Componnd lnterest. VIIIJ. Sharing and Partncership. IX. Raitio and Proportion, considered algebraically. X. l'le Graph. X[.Mnurto of Surfaces and Volumles. (a) Proofs and simple applica- cations' of the ordinary rules tused iii connection with: Rectangles, parallelogramns, t rian gl es, irregular, quadu- laterals, trapezoids, right- aingled triangles, cîreles, sec- tors, sirnilar surfaces. \u003c1\u003e) Simple applications without formai proofs of the ordin- ary rules used in connection with parallelopipeds, prismns, cylinders, pyrainids, cones, fr~ustra, spheres. (c) Board Measure. (d) Aýpplications of principles of mnensurationi to building construction. Consîderable latitude sliould be given the teaclier to adapt this part of the course to the nceds of bis particular class and coin- ni n i t y. Examinations should not require a techni- cal knowledge of any parti- cular branch of education. XI [. l\u003eractieal problems as in the text. lii connection with XI. (d) and XII. it is suggested that ex- aminers give optioflal ques- tions, principally to suit candidates of both sexes, but also to ensure the average3 candidate 's familiarity with the purely teclinical part of the question. Algebra Grade IX. 2 heurs, per week. Chapters I.-XII. Hall \u0026 Knight 'à iElemeiltary Algebra, omit- ting page 37.",
         "'rai', Wi.SErl? tIIO -W10,JOURNAL ('rade IX. 1 liolîr per week1. Cliapters XI[I.-XVI1., 0oinittingy cube root. Glradle XI. 2 Ijours peci -wcek. Chapters XV1II. to XXVIII., with the following omissions: Sections 146, 147, 148, chapter XVIII. Sections 161, 162, 163, chapter XX. Examples XXII (a)-29-36. Exaînples XXIII (c)-1-21. Examples XXIV.-27-36. Examples XXVI 1-9 Geonietry A comnittee bas been aJ)poilltc( liv the inathernatical section to prepare. a detailed syllabus of the work to bc covered in this, subject, and we recoin- xnend that the finding of this commit- tee be accepted as finial by flie Second- ary Section. Il was also recomnïended thal the .work iii aritbnmctic taught in lthe public sebool grades be iimited iii scope, t emnpliasize particularly 1he c lemncutary operalions of aritbm-etic, and that very litIle attention be given bo more ad- vanced arithmetic iii these grades. COMMITrFEE ON CASC The followin g arc the recommienda- lions made in the ineeting of leachers of the classical sub-section: 1. That ''Latin Lessons for Begin- neis'' be the sole text iii Latin prose composition for ail work iii tis s ub ject up to and including Grade XI matriculatioii. That an allotnment of xvork be made approximiately as follows: (a) For firsL year bo the end of page 115; (b) for second year, 10 thc end of page 232; (c) for third year, lthe entire book. 2. (a) That the selections for trans- lation in authors be changed in alter- i.ate years. (b) Thiat lte seîcetions for transla- tion be restricted to Cacsar and Virgil. (c) That the ehairman of this classi- cal sub-scction appoint a committee to djecide as, to sciections froni ('aesar and Virgil to be used for translation. Thle chairman of this section has iiiiied the following cornxnittec to comi- [)lete arrangements re selectioris for Latin translation: Prof. Joliff e, UJniver- sity of Manitoba; J. G:' Reeve, Kelvin Iligh School; P. C. Dobson, Central Col- ]egiate Institute; S. .Johnson, St. John Iligh Sehool. 3. That instcad of the translation prescribed for Grade IX. unider heading (3) of foreign languages, reading selec- tions be made from those given in the prcscribed text, ''Latin Lessons for Be- ginniers.' ('OMMITTEE ON IIISTORY The above committee met, and after tovNýig Mr. Baîley to flie chair and Mr. S. Burland as secretary, the merubers proceeded to discuss .the various changes recommended. After consider- able discussion the following pro- ,grarnnes werc agreed upon:- Grade IX. (a) Gencral survcy of the history of Greece, with detailed study of the age of Pendces. (b) General survcy of the history of Romie, with detailed study of: (1) The work of Juius Caesar; (2) the age of Augustus Caesar. Grade IX. Mcdiaeval and modern history. As regards text-book to bc used i Grades IX. and X., Myer's Ilistory would sug- gest the arnount of matter required, but tat it need not necessarily be the text- book. Grade XI. (a) Story of the British Emipire, witl' s1)ccial reference to thc constitutiona' development of Canada. (b) Civics. A further motion xvas carried tilit a ourse of, say. 10) lessons ecd, be given to Grades IX. and IX. in social~ and economie science; that the Depart- ment issue a syllabus of' thc same, and A",
         "(ýOMM 1'ITT1 OC'lN ARIT' tfiaI one \"bolus- 'questioni Oit titis iWork be puit oi lthe hislory examîina- lion. Thie restsof the eoiitîîittee ui rnak- 1i1g tiiese recommtnîdalîons ittiglit be sIuliiiiaris(,,( as folloxvs I hese suggesled progranites hatve~ th eieîîent of 'newness. '' Or'cater eli- lhuisiasnî, inlerest, etc., xviii be iîifused 11110 the work, thuis benefilting anîd stirfltIaling both pupil and leaciter. 2. The xidening of the Itistorical hiorizont of the pnpil and îaaking him feel lIat the hislory of lis own counlry 's Onfly a sinail page it te great record Of the huinan race. d. Il' rccoinineiidling lte sitggcsled Grad1ýe Xi. progratînne, the eoinnitlee \"'ere of the opinion that lthe problennt, oenslilutioiial. deveioprnent, botu Bri hîsIt 41td ('autadian, reîjuired a more ina- ture fliiid lIait tbat of lte average Grade IX. pupil. Accordingly, Grade XI- Seemied a class belter fltled 10 lake .11P Ihese -important probl ems. Afler havmng9 left British and Caîtadian is- lOysinice the Entrance class, titis study MWOuid again i)e laken up witii more fresiîness and grealer inlerest. 4. That the eomtuiltec requesl the I)epartinent of Educalion 10 write lte ''Canadian Archives, Ollaw'a,'' asking that al, Higi Sehools in1 Manitoba be 8UPpiied wîlth copies of lte publica- tonsl issucd in conneclion xith the his- tory Of Manitoba, and aiso wilh Cali- ada. COMMITTEE ON ART 111 Presenliîîg this report upon the sbetof art training in sehools, we regret the altitude of the commiîceé 10- 'eerd8 art as shewn in the proposed Wtirfl-table for higli schools. We feel lak f appreciation of ils value asa Iean8 0If education. This is expressed tht report of the flndings of lte P'Ornn Ott o the subject utîder discus- ''\"haý been, subîillîted to the artists on1 lie saiff that ilie subjeet in Mr. 1,1ng y' report was disinissed as highly Coittentjous. Il is part and parce] of the attitude of those peopie who regard art as the efflorescence of civilizatioti rallier titan the hasis of it. Frorn the eariiest times hu-nian activities have iteci devoted to tii very expression, and xvhen we corne to cotisider the building up of the eiîvironinent of te individuai in bis everyday life, we fin(] ltaI there is no point at mhieh art does tiot louch him, and toueli himn inîjinate- ly: his house; the things in lis house; bis attitude towards lis feilows; his b)usiness, down 10 his stationery; his lilerature, is domialed by sonie fea- turc or some Iterson traiîicd ini art. Thie refinemneris of life are undoubledly corîducled ou art principles, so that ini any systeîn of educationî it is iîîcuînberîl uipon those who franie the course that tlîey should first realize the imnportantce (f ils bearing, and then provide ade- quale limie for ils study. As presently coîîstituted, the acadernie course takes litIle account of Ihis. If education is preparatiofi for life, Ihen those things whiclt make life most live-able and con- tribute niost 10 the fullness of life should ite lte fl.rst consideration. The leaching of history is largely the teaching of lthe accomplishmeflî of races-and the highest point reached in the civiliza- lion of peopies synchronises with ils highest developmieft ini art. Whal is the use of talking of lte glory of Greece or the grandeur of Rome, arnd ignoriîtg the art of the nations? How are you go- ing 10 iînpress upon thîe stud'ent the mîeaniîîg of these ternis if the accom- plishments ini art arc not inlelligently and symîpathelictlly deait wilh by the teacher? What is the use of high- sounding phrases of lilerature and poetry if the muner ineaniing of the words is lost, as il is undoubtedly lost when it is deait wilh by pupils who fail 10 sec the art jîseif? We have known miasters of English and literature fully t.ogiiisajt of the rolling phrases of that art who yet have nieyer seen the beau- ties ini nature theinselves, as described",
         "rFIjjï I VE5'i'I'AN SCFIOOI. J(URNAIJ is ever lîkely ta bring tile resilts ex pected front the acad(efiie course. cii resuits in a fatal lacç of imnaginationi and a laekç of understanding of words. It is impossible to expeet people to put into wrords feelings they hiave neyer been tauglit to realize'or taughit to (le- scribe beauties or facts, wlien their training in observation is sadly dlefi- cient. The course makes littie or no p)rovision for remiedying this state of affaî rs. As a basis of teehnical education there is no doubt in the ininds of people trained for this woik as ta art's value; it is so seif-evident that we need not spend any time on this, section. I.ts uise to science, liistory ami litera- tulre could be largely extended botlî in relation to actual. expression by means of drawing, by mneans of correlated lessons on the principles of art involvcd in the great ages of history, and in the literature dealing witlî the history of those times. This is first of? ail to be advanced by officiai recognition of the eduicational value of art training. Th-e resuit of this woul(l le a îproper divi- sion of time in the tirne-table and ade- (luate assistance in the correlation of lessons in tiiese subjects to oceur s imul- ta'neously in the student 's, mental devel- opinent. Foreign governments, realiz- iug the tremendous importance of art in the life education of the student ' are spcnding huge suins, not only in pro- viding sehools specially fitted for that study, but in the public sehools they are providing larger and more ade- quate means foi' its development. The educational system of this prov- ince ean neyer hope to be in the fore- front of educational progress until it is realized that a sense of proportion between the various mental activities which are brought to bear in the stu- dent 's training is necessary. For this reason we hope to sec more provision for auch an important subjeet in the time-table than is at present considered necessary. Art is not an \"ornamental\" feature ini life, so much as a vital necessity. C\u003cM M ITTEE, ON TECIlNI(A1 E l)U\u0026ATION The mneeting of the Technical andl IXanual T'raininig Section wvas att endecd 1\u003eY about fifty teachers. The Chairman, Mi.W. J. Warters, opcned tie meeting with a short ad dress, forinally proclainîing the exist- e'nce of this new section, whieh immiedi- ately procecded witli a well-discussedl Sro grai nme. Mr. F. V. Fanii.dýiaw gave ait able ad- (l ress on\"IiiJdustrial. Art.'' Mr. Arthur Beach, in eommenting on the address, pointed out someo of the dangers to artistic training by the inoîîotoniy of machine operation, and Mr. Bennett, of Regina, expressed the opinion that at present the apprecia- tion of art by the general public was such that they distinguished its, excel- lence by thc attachcd label. Miss E. Fa.rrow presented very fore- il)le argiuments sustaining the art of wood carving in the elementary sehools, il]ustrating that not only did carving train the eye and the hand, but as a imeditai of individual expression wvas particularly a character-building sub- jeet. Mi'. Li. Thotupson, speaking on \"In- dtistrial Training in Rural Sehools,'' advocated practical training suitable to the community, suggcsting such lines as farmn woodwork, forging, leather- workz and tinsmithing, and appeale'd for a broad, policy correlating the workç with rural societies, such as ''Boys' and Girls' Clubs.'' Mr. W. Pringle then gave some verY hielpful illustrations on \"Ways and Means of Managing Ilandwork in Rural Sehools.\" In lis experience the mnak- ing of equipment for woodwork WaO possible, and held the interest of the boys. He gave as a maxim that a set of tools was, as essential as a librail to the teacher of a rural sehool. The meeting eleeted W. J. Warterg chairman and R. B. Vaughan secretarY for the ensuing year.",
         "Papers of the Secondary Section INIUTTIAI ART Bv A. X'aientiie Fanshaw Industrial. Art rnay be defifncd as that Art brouglit to the, service of labor in heprovision- of the ufilitarian wanfs of S0c)ietY, and may 1W l)lacc(l ii adif- eut aegory fo fluat art dcsignatnd Fine Art the produef of ilcstbelip plenisiiV( With a direct ajlpeal to ciiiluire ratlier than1- of a utilifariaîî basis. F'or a, long limeflt flic rtist, 1iroduceer 'If individnal p)ieces, whetlîer tliey 1)C tiiefure's or etchings. sculpfure iii iigli or loW relief, Lias becîu the cynosnrc of flic public attention, fostered by press floflees and exhiibition catalogues unitil Iifany are preparcd to aver that nonc Other May justîy lay dlaim to flic naine, iih the resuill . flat, flc gciicruii public has loNt sight of tlhc Art tradition mn in- dustriai production anjd unany would doubt wliether art wvas at ail nieccssary. This is plainly showîî by flic remarls One hears in the preseîîce of any con- siderable collection of Industrial Art Products. Mrs. Ultra-Modemn is iLcard to rednark- to Mrs. Passe: \"Yes, wîY dear.. Yol1 l\u003cnow, this, is ail donc bY n'aehiiev;porfectiy woîîderfli, voi kno~, ''t'S simply înarvolloiis f0 la apitch these machines arc got; flie stuf gOes in at one end and couacs (\" at the otber flnished,\" and there flic thlefi romance and glamomir 'f le finest productions of flic mod- C brain is dismisscd as an impersonal r'atter, likc th, record of a speedo- aieter. Býecause the arfist is subîaerged in the process Of commercial organisation \"\"\"d r1arcîl cornes inito the limeliglit of tle no11tice, the average person fails t, 'else hi9 important role in flic pro- Which go to mal\u003cc life amenable. \\Veî,j, w'e to consider f'or an instant the relative advantagc to the comn,111 ity of the Industrîi artist and the ar- tist engaged in the production of Fine Art w'c shouid of neccssity formi a con- cision that tbose flowers of the mind termed Fine Art were csscntiahly the ecstasies of life, tlif the vorks of the Industrial artist wcrc the good solid food and backhlonce of life's conveni- en ces. 0f the fwo, lielias the, greater oppoi- tunity of service to bis race. Nor is there mucli difi'crcnce in the quiality of mental pleasure affordcd hy either, for to tlic cultured person there is sometbing inflnitely safisfying to be- hold in a well buiît piece of furniture: a cabinet-may become a delight wvhen a Gonthiere or Resciner lias given the, foncli of an artisf to labor, and a metal cnp may contain ail fthc drarnatie fer- vour xvhich a brother of the brush eouid compress into an historical composition. Aithougli every mnedium has its spe- c]al limitations and means of expres- sion, who is bold enougli, or shall we say prcjudiced, fo say that tlic expres- sion of paint or inctal, miarbie or wood, is at ail times botter flic oIIe than flie oflier? Ccrtaiîîly no aitist, no connoisseur wrho clearly recognises ecd in is own inetier f0 be besf and that flic toneli of art mnade ail vibrafe wifh a new quality. The artisf is the power who raises, labor f0 a planme satisfYing f0 fthc cul- tured mind wlio dominates maferial and accomplishinent by qualifies of mind wliieli nay be tcrmie(l selective. No vulgar person. or persoil of vicions temperalfleilt ever produced a fine workc of art while under those influences; flic two are incompatible.",
         "THE NVES'rEIN SCHOOL JOURNAL Perhaps it is advisable at this point to state what we understand by Art, and conelude as to how much it per- ineates into the fabrie of industrialisni. Art is the expression of character, personality or ideas dominating mater- jais seiectcd for that expression. In this we have a wide basis for ex- pression. It may include the latest form of auto-car witli the last picture and be no0 less truc, for 1 liold that after the bare essentiais of motive power have been provided ail that goes into the making of such a car onters within the field of Art, the seleetive quaiity of mind is 'evident in the lines and proportion of areas and fittings stamped by personaiity and character in their choice of expression. Tfhis appeal of Art is universai and contrary to the opinion of many of our western friends, who consîder Art as a iuxury and the efflorescence of civi- lisation; it is at the very basis of it. The most superficiai research would disclose that fact. Long before history was written- t-ertainiy before literature addcd lier giorions cuiture-we find Art the means of highest race expression; the primaeval savage has left us evidence of its appeal and uplift in his scratch- ings upon bone and in the shapes of his utensils anid weapons; many of super-excellent form, as astonishing as they'are delightful to the modern mind. I sometimes think, when I sec the content and lack of taste displayed by many modemns, that we have in i5ome matters artistie falien behind our prim- aeval forbears in thîs very thing. Our houses are better, thanks to olir architeets; yet in how many of the best do you think it possible to find a disuse of good honest pot and to sec an array of flowering plants tncked into Swift Canadian Lard pails, or the insistent areas of highly poiished golden oakz, and to realise that simplicity need not degenerate into ugliness because we ehoose to label it Colonial or Morriss 7 The Industrial artist's great power lies in this quality of selection, the hasis of creative design; it is evident iii his choice of il idea, its fitness of 1)urpose, the ehoice oF niaterial for its expression and the niethod by which lie will express that idea in that ma- teriai. 1 have stated that his metier is great- er opportunities of service to lis race; lie miust anticipate the wants, the de- A- LABORW4tTH0U1. ART. BLABOR VJUIH AR~T C 5TA-riC \u0026nd -DYt4AMC EFFECT Of iIUt\u003eITRATIOt\u003c FOR A 5tHORT TA1-KýOr %%4CUbTRIALI APT sires and comforts of bis fellows; be something of a humorist, ready to ad- init and ailow for their littie idio5Yl cracies; hie is at ail tiînes dominated by the human standard, it, is .preselit with him from the size of the step bl",
         "INr)USTRIAf. ART ýwhich lie enters a building to the last COnveniences of life 's administrative service. Nor wiIl the mere provision of essen- liais satisfy any but the most boorish, and here is the bcginning of his special activities, which mark the boundary of Ilbor and the presence of Art. We have here two vases by whieh to estahlish a scale of values. (Sec illus- tration), The one (A) the product of a lahorer Art. ay; the other (B) of thc Greek 11, (A) von have essential service, the provision of a vessel cajpable of holding liquid. There is also evidence of that univer- ~a1ppeal, though dimly feit and ex- preIssed. foir do yon notice our laborer hadI a tentative feeling for decorative treatment when he placed lines on the d0v of the vessel? Tihere, is -Art to thalt extent. low in Iualitv' \"0 (loubt. Tt hieks selective geni'5 ; 'looki at his puiîv stuck-oi' 1haind- les; they bear littie relation to the Whl.were it iiot for these the vesse1. ývoflld l0ok inst as well tirined upside dOwu. There is a Jack of dominant ITiasures. Thes faitsare corrected in our sec oiîd illustration. WV flnd donminant in. tentiOn in the wi(l of the vessel placcd at a point of intel.est above the haif heîght. The hanidies are built grace- \"Yîî and with streîigth into the gen- eral OUtlineI Thre is evideuce of iiiid iii the relative proportions of decora- tive bands_ There is no doubt as 10 \"whidh i'S the riglit way iii) of thi ves- sel. pronI thiS coinpaî-isoin il is evident' htha certainm factors enter into idus- thia Production,% which dJifferentiate te Prodcilîs Of labor and Art, and these are hased on the appeal of cer- tan inhinations of jines, forms ajjjd s.iace divisions as more satisfying than thers; that in addition to the provi- si on of essentials, qualitieq are to bc reckoned with as a provision for cul- ture. When thiese are given -%e have Indus- trial Ait. the personal impress being so great 'in some works that we have no hesitation in saying with confidence, that mwal decoration is by Crane, this dress is froin Worth or Point, this glass is, of Tiffany, and so on. Wc do not nieed a label or trade mark; it is as fil of character as tbe handwriting of a friend. Having discovered so rnuich. it is the province of the artist to seize uipon hose fact ors which contribute to in- terest aind provide for them in logical sequence. The first is that an embodied idea shiou]d he reasonable and fit, both as to idea aiid the form of its' expression. A chair should assure you of reason- able support, a vessel by its sha'pe shonld inply flic service to be render- ed; a building, in addition to assur- anee of stahi]ity, give indication of its special use before decorative qualities, are eonsidered. This is the provision for ITtility, the great service. Thougli neyer a toueh of decoration bc added to this, we have ample opportunity for the good qiia]itie:s of Art. rlThesc find expression by means of a fcw simple detiils,. A straiglit linc placed horizontally gives the mental feeling of rest; additional lineri placed parallel ta tbis ciphasise this. Plaeed VeIltically, we have an impression of dignitv. ascension and growth.- Take tivo slicli Iines and incline themi at an angle, ind w'e produce quite different emotionS. Tf we inîcline theml fromn the base ini- ý),ards wc, gain an impression of immo- hilityý; this is evident in the pyramids of Egvyît. ('Sce illuistration C. Again. if incline(l outward from the mas.,w gin a. feeling Of ascension ~~cillustrations D)-",
         "TUE, XVES'EEi- SCH-OML .JOUJJNAI, '1'lat quality at E uiay bc terîned statie, w-ile tiat of F dynairie. It xviiI be seeni that the cboice of tie' inain huies of (lireetimm wiil lead( to ili- portant resuits. whatever the subse- oient developmndent of inîlor details. That huies such as flrst colisidered (E) wouhd Le more admirable for obh ieets of i'easomîably permanent situa- tion, such as furniture, monuments. fountains, caskets. etc. ;whereas the dy- nai ie quiiït.v ini lime latter case ( F) , tbe eontrolling lir es givimmg appearance of ascensioni, woaild Le of service ini the forrns of flow,ýr v-ase, cup) or (lrinking gl,C ,hr aui apilearance of bcing eiisiiy removed is ain advîintiigc. TJic straiglit lne is, of immuense ser- vice whenl use( pî'optely. lrsed to ex- e1ess, it beeones niomotoîious and mnech- anical in its rigidity, especially when (livered £rom the saving grace of pro- imrtienate spacinig. Tt has a'hteoi value w-heul useci iii conjunclion with cuirves or te brace tipI excessive cuirvatuire irn snrface areas, and riglîtl.v useil gives values ont ef al proportion to effort equircîl to pro\u003c- duce it. A curved fine is beautiful in propor- tion as it is subtle. TFhe simrplest curve is that produced ini the circle. There ms, ne siiitle gradation in this- ; very poertionm of' stieli bile is equaliy îîîterest- ing, and comsequcuîtly cmually noîotomî- ous. The iitrest pass frori the line Io tuie sl)pace eimloscd. A sinmple uieandering line (ira vn by the hond is geneî'aly cf fair more value. Tt is becantse cf the imcrascd subtie- ly cf atm elliptie eurve that we gain illore mentl pI eastire iii ils contemla- tion, and1( tis rec(lles ils highest foi-Il ini the ovoid( ('ilirveso e' 11 mnan figure, Tphe excessive lise ofet it er gives pool' reul ts, as exa ii pic E, P. Relative proportioni cf parts and1( space , dvson is aise orf gi at impn ance. lui these it is found that unequal. divi- sion of arcas contribute more pleasuire thoni equa] parts. Tt is as if the whole nature of the mid was to repel equaiil- ity; for you wiil notice -we have becu occasioncd to ehoose, right along, dom- niant ceilsi(leratioris ini idea, choice of Une for expression and division of space. iRedueed te formula, division of space ameas înay be pleasing in ratio emoved from equality. There are exceptions to ail these, biat in every sticcessful case it will be fourffd tbat definite intention is visible. Exact meptition ef space division is 101111(1 in inamîy a cli iteet itral details, certain walspacïngs, et e.. the pleasi'e usually greater -wlere verv abstract forms are used. A square or cirele ninst be exaetiy (quai anîl perfect geometrical figure,, to give their iiaxiiulm of imicasure. The utnîost inastery is denianded of ilhe Inidustrial Artistin buis uise or nia- f (,rials. rlherc is ehlaracter ini inlaterial which he sbould ever try to preserve. The r-icl ductile gold, the 1ilastic mnlobîlitY of cast inetai, the rigor of granite, the sauvity of mariible, the rugged oak and Ilhe doeilitv of lime and kindred woods a-]lave denîamîd and profit by sympa- thetie treatînent yiel(ling their oWfil eharin to the multitude by whicli Oi' pmeople coll sirreunid itself given the eves, to see anid the heart to desire. Many are( acenstoîned to believe thC t rue emîemy of hudustrial Art is the îfl8b chine ; tibat thje plethera oif oh.jeets dis- gorgcd by it has debauehed public taste. 1 do miot believe this to be truc. The îîaehinie is tiot the enemy of Art. Th' reai cneniy is the erass ignorance of the (lircetors of maehjimîery, who lave for, -ottenl tile Apt ini the desire to reaP fil e quiick rew~arîds oft ra pid prodiietiol'' This 15 ImUove( ove i ando over a gailn i n those pla nt s %vhcre(ý a n Art, 1)1reetol' is the arîbiler o f t he falte o f î'dj(tif'",
         "A stamp die has no choice whcthcî' it produce a wve1l or iii-considered shape. Tt îîrodîîees cîtiier elieei'fiilly. a1t a rate per bour as determincd by its master, a textile wcaving or print- iiig imachinc, as ail other machiniery, is \"10 greater or less tirant the brain \u003cif itS director. b No artist waultd* atteîup1t ta ,)roclue hY Ina c'Itiniery things beyond its power or expeet qualifiez, it cou]dà not Pro- duc t would be against bis fiî'sf Princiffles, fitncss of piripose. No, the machine is not the enciny. llgt~ trcated, it is a good friend, rlaklillg paOssible pleasture and iitility far tbauiSards whlo woiild lie il] proidO'Çe\u003c1 if d1eeielt uipan hand labor. l3iieflY as 1 aia eaiiilelle(l ta freat ihîs beariîîg of Art Ia industry, 1 bic lieVe T have advariced suifficient ilidi- cati011 that this qulestion of design auid d'ýe'ie(irecti an is ai fh lb lsis ai the WliOle fabnie af indidsi 'mal 1îradim lion tîît i-wfil(c soiree of iliost of* Oir Peri'aî )1csr a lidlmieileî fllife. It 'I 1)cyond question riot Art for A\u0026rt's sake, bult Art for Ljife's sakýe. This being 50, blow are ý( ta reap Srieh ]essor, s foi' tire henefit af Our' rre'selt generatjon ? As anr edilcatioli \u003c11 asset it is liard la over-estiiuate iis' ing _~~ Tre ti'ainirîg ini logical reasoui- gcause anid cfi'eet tlle proisOioni o) Cenilre(Iuii'eniieiits be fa'e gr'atifla I~on 0f Scle;the îîeeessity of doininanil idea an(l t]'arneteblila a' I 11 thol ghtfrijl observation ; Ill iii(ces- %ity' fol' fitiless of purpose; tire flîtility Of strivillg for effeet oujiside the lual Iir ofY0111 ilteniai ; ail these I essOlis a le l)re~ct 111erve step afi' lic traiîiîîgn for Art work. d ,cdo flot care, s0 ili wlîether 'w'\u003c s ove\u003e. Oiîc sile, a rtist, thIere is nio 1ife) thke v8ille of' simili t.raining for- '~sk. The vatlue i file citizen iltiitredto 1a iruitiai, lioli sucel prili- ('iples is indisputable. And îîaw ta an;sveî YOUr qtuestion.- A begiiiiiiiig lias beoii made in grade sc1iools. Voit have your grade books, 1914-15 irîtelligently followed, the.y offer aid. but it is esseritial that sym- pathetic dlirectioni be ohtamed. The objects of ciai]v use, and tile great Book of Nature arîe iiifiniitelyv more valuable îvhen the v, yoigoîllifl( is, tdeqiiitelv MoIre tii îe is îîecessilry under rileî( Table. Thi subjeet is af such fair-reacbi iîig ('ffeMl i tii, ife of the strident thai, shold 'weia t giveli. Thre iev generationl of teicliers slimiIl( 1.e i r elire( ta f ake a dvantage of sueli ail'5 if llot in thre (lireetiOii af s)caia tial hieti as, Culture. False st ilrsof resuilts by pretty lraw'ýýings ,sLoiild be relcgated. Tt is îieeesaly keep tii e brain îa aster of I lle biand(. f liave kniowai ci evel. dIrauightsiiae.ii withauit a trime of art. Wlienever pîossible, colleetioîi of (lb jeets, es]îeeially of local interest, citiier \u003cif mnent or deimerit, slîorld be atta ched ta al] sclools for eduicational puirposeýS. Courses, pa rticularly in collegiate î.staiblislîmieiits., slil\u003cl be corelated ta I lle extei fliaf aeadeaîic and teehunical sîîbjects be provide\u003cl wîtl amîple tiltre mnd direction foi'ftle e(lucidttiofl Of Art piiile5 relatînig ta techýnology, .1listaryý an d literature. This. îvhcrc passible, siiînul ta neaISlY With tire course of stud.v il, tirese, subjeets. Jjastly, allawv lie ta empliasize the(' faet that Art, far fromr being ai decora- f ive addition ta civilization, is virtually eaieerl] i its aeeainpllishin\u003cfît. Witl outi it la bar is pu i productioni and I ife shorjl, af ifsfueacolIilîeî N\u003e oY5 ssei \u003c\u003e e(l Oeitiali wliicli iregli t it cati liaje la haold 1dcc iîîhi val] a' edai iaîîaiil ProgresS. INI)USTRIAL ART",
         "'rHEý WESTERN .!CHOOL JOURNAL HoNv rTE AG1RICULT'UPAL (OURSE MAY BE IMPROVED IN 1111111 II1ili \"-tll('IO S B',\" S. .1. Sigfusson. (Suiomnary). The iaek etfoîîuiîîiiint is the greatest draw- hack to efficiencY in the agriî'ultuiral course in the 111gb Sehool1. The objeet of tho, course is to give an oee mentary training ia agrieulture, sncb as is aow heing given at the 'M. A. C. Many students xxili takoe the course whe would not think of goiag to the eoilege. The ' receive prarticiiliy the, saule ediwation as tîe 'v would get lu the coliege onlY ner homie con- dlitions. To pîut it lu brief, the Agrieulturai Coliege and tbc Agriculturai 111gbl Srýheol bave identieailly the sanie purpiose. Tt is iisefui, te compare tbe two courses. The Coilege bas o compiete equipmieît ond a s1ilenîiid staff of mutruetors. Students eomne from ail parts of tbe province, but Orly a few eine frein each district. On the ether hanîl a giceat iinanv f rein Paeh district cati attend the H-ilil Sebeol classes. We expert te sec iii the future, fiftx' lier cent. of Canada 's popunlationi on the fans. Ouiy a smail pereatage is ien' on tamnis, anu it is expedlient that sehools qhouý id be Orga ized te give ex'ei'*ylod ' the, nocessar *v traie- ing. The Agcricuituiral ('lei ra reacheli y n few%, but the AgricituralITi1gh Sîlicel eaui reach ii great niinilher. MNore thoni that, of those wbo go te the AgriculturalI 11gb Sebool niauy will wisli te continue the 'ourse at the College. The Agriruitural Iligb Scbool iii the hest advertisement the Coliege bas. Tbougb lahoring uînder financinil disadvae- tageq we beliex'e the agririîiturai course in the 111gb Schools is deing a]l, or ino rc than was anticipalcd. Wo caln give iîidi- idual atten- tion te the students. Thcoî'v can imîneodiateiv ho feiloa'ei 1) ' i'î'tr' Tr'aiing ratil bu'ý suited te honie rýoilitioiîs. l1upiis lieiig unoer parental coatiel tbey aie liopt aw'ay trom the dissipations aeil roeio f the city and therefore lne loser teuich with their werkç. 0f course- tbev receive less tr'aining lu literature, sudl they d o net haxvc the saine \"ecual adx-nn- toges, and ahoe ail they -arc cî'auped us te inhorzitory fiarilitica. The Manniai Tr'nininîg la quite oqual] te that donc uit the Coliege. Maey of our 9tudueiîts ho iîîg eiepleted the two yeara, course w'old liko te go iii foi' the, biglier ediucation. What \u003c'rouit xvould tbcy i eceive( foi' their xvorlî it the A. ('ellege? At liresent thoî'o isan uui'ortinitx'. 'hen the courses wei'e a iiiiig(,(] iii the, lgh Sohool it wtls uodelrqtooîi tliat those tsiking the A \u0026 B c'ourmses woîild get twe om rs \u003crelit ot th' MT. A. (C. 'Rei'cnti 'v woe have l'îîgiv'oi te uiffer- stand liv the\" ijotn iit et illneitiOit tliot oDI ne aoYear 's ciedit xvili lie givemi. The re sit bas beesi very disappointing to the stul dents, manv of whom regret that they ever toelc the c ourse. Somne of tbemn have given up the idea of pîursuing their culucatien furth- er, anîl on]lv a Iilniteil few ivili ever rench the college halls. it viii lie verv difficult to get studentq for next year. If they, could he as- sured that the work donc xvould ho eredited iu the Agrieultural (ollege there would be n0 d1ifficuity,. 1Tnless sîîch an -irrangenment can be made wc will find ireloswithout stu- dents, and tho course wili hav e te lie Piesed. We hav e aslçed on -%hat gr'ounds this distinc- tion is nuode. Wo lia vo already proveui that the 'our'se is worth as iînuehl as two voars at the coliege. A studfent wishing to take agri- cultural training would lie glad te take mnost of it under homc '-onditiens, but ho wiil nlot do F0 if it mneans tbe 1oss of a vear of bis turne. Again xvo esk. wh ' sbenld our studiînts ro0t receive credit for their %vork as was; originaly intended? Tbcy have no ]gel, of brains. They can acconipiisli as inel at the 111gb Sehool in ten moutbis ais they' eau acornplish ait the M. A. C. in five. Tt milst net ho takon for grant- od that wc haveo a lot of lugger-heads takiflg the lligh School course. -Most of our boys, thongh stili iii thoir teens havec a ma,,ture mind, nind havo as mucb ability ais the aveorage col- lege studeat. Every 111gb Sehool iii Munitohia sbould have ana agrirultural departinent, and this wil l Un-i doubtedIl vho the ease lu due time. AIl 111gb SC1hools With W('11 0i'ganlizedl rOurSeSs hold arct as feeders to tho _M. A. C' We belle\"0 the time xviii coie wbea the Iligh Sîeeol Wil dIo ail tho junior work. At tho ýoleg,,e the thirdl yoor is dividcd ilnt two distinct couriises-tlie 1)cgree and the PI' plomna. Aux' stîtrient obtaining oni average O 65 per relit, or over is eligible for the 'Dcgrecc course, tho î'emaiadeî' must take the idil' The Diffdonia (-ourse is b.v no ineans inferiOrý en foot iniivî~ tiike it xx'bo ar-e ci igibile for the Degree. Tt is a cointiniuation of the farnder* course, and great eniphRsis is laidi on we and farmn inaehinery. Now nil we ask is thSat the 111gb Sehool studerits lie admnittout te tbc, Diploma course. If their educeation is i n waxv inferior to that et the ceollege 4tudfelt, .sureiy: the ,v get a chnec to make ni) for ieficicacv ini this xvav. We do0 iot a9iC thi. ge mnueh beuose xv tbink our studfeets arc' 1 ferior, luit berauso14 WVo tbink that the ilt rourse is a spilendid rouirse ed it 'huOid b)o made coinpuisorvY for' evervýbodiy to tiike it l wishes to Iursîle higbor eulurcation. The .t) frt thant the tiid vair is iow ýlivid0d inti two distinit reîî r-vs leous us te thiîîk 018t' 't s oniyV a stepipiîg aton' andl fi îîaiiY th ho ,q %vi] hob loiîgtheedl j lti six N ours. Sncbh 0hOi lie the rase, if for gînuto s arc tei ho 111 eýqiial fîiotiiig, with tho' universit.N ilion 1.thei",
         "MANUAL TRAINING Eýnglish standing. There is noe short road to 81 iccess; an\u003cl -ne nîîst work bard and faitifutlv to aceomîîîis1h our end. NT'Ow trlyb the agrieulirai (ouise rit the Igli Schools inay lie impîroved, the saine as il1iY other course'in its infaîîcy. We believe the agiulua instruetor bas enuah. to do0 Wî'tholut teacbing any work in tbe Iigl Sebool. Ile 's exPeeted to be an authoritv on qules- tiens relating to the faim, and eveni a walkin- en'',c.lpe la b is coiinmnniiity. This is of Cour\"se utterly impossible but bc should 1,-Y !Is best to k,«eep in tourcl witîî tbe far-m'rs or' 11l other Words hie should talçe the place ci- a district representative. Wben tbe f ive o nths'ý cors iS OVer it sbouid be bis business tii visit the differenit f armers and communicnto w iîth theni- It is tberefore to tbe best initerestu 0f the eoi]nmunity that he sbould not le bur- dleed Witb furtber work. But if lie devotes his timO wholly to the interests of bis .iugr;- Clitural elasq, amd bas a f'air line of 'i- Mont, WOV believe tbe course cari bo greatly liii- lioelanul its henefits wili be feit throngu the' wvhoI00of Manitoba. MANUAL TRAINING IN RURAL INTEIRMEDIATLE SCIIOOLS, Levanît Thonipson (Suînuniry) IThel\"re is toclay a denuand thuît educ.ation bc rad practiai: liaI courses of stifdy sboldi 'J'his ieC barn on everyday prolulenis. andi deluand is being net ia the larger cities, alij twn8bYelaborate voecational and pro- dr alCourseos. in rural coîimunlities this 'i n 's slowiy being miade, and lie meth- of ane nans of ineeting it prescrit On1e of qh ost pressing educational questions t aY One steplas already heer imadeO aIl ard58 this by introducing agriculture in p1y.Public scîools. But tbe probtein of snp- lpl n Properly traincd teacher-s lias as yet lio, een Satisfactoiîiy soived. The iîîtroduc- 0 Moe PacteaÏbaud training into tic sch0ol ti10 greaeq tie teacier sujuydy ques- mt. th gra t obstacle te its fuil develop- a e hi8 paper T wisi first to outiine briefly rai Whc hrk, wiil meet the maîjual sent a gDeedsûOf rural comînuinities and pre- Preen Ietod of presentinîg it; second, to wîlj maa 48ysten, of training teacliers whivh 81(lth ( It possible to carry out this couîrse; tebest *r to give wiat T, îîow conisider to ho eCure est tem, of sebool organization tO se- t' bOst results in ail Unes of oduiq iouai effort. Tii0~~~ u'ao1f nrduiig îîuanual traininîg, l'ira th aredy crowdel p)rogrammiîe of the Tt~0 .C0\u003e ~ wf . edueatioîîat and prac- fdsthi 18 duationl~ first, beaiise it af- aSecond nethoul of self expres- Of il8 vae('. becaîîso it crystalizes iuanî rtoiak08 huan Unpressi ons. anîd blini, beaiiso tinik I 'ii praetîcall boeaume the habits and forn\"s Of W'oik arc, Or at leaist 'duouid lue, the saine als will te Meit iii the lifdustrial w'oîid. The svhoot curîricnuum should be fashioîied with tihe pi pose of îîîri g mor e effiei eh t c'itizelîs; and a iliaîitiai traininîg vourse as a part of the cuerieuînnu siouid reflect the iii- dustriai activities of tbe eoniinîunity. To de- cic what itemns shouid lie inchuîted it is oîilv necessaey te nialyze tue workç of the coin- îîînnity mbt its tueger divisions. lu the rural vnmiitiitese svoutld le woodwoek, ho-11 M'kl, ithrwokaîîd tiiusiithiuîg. T\u003crac- becal agriculture, -OUîLd aiso be classificd ris a1 barid training siitîjecb; tînit as it is a siibieot imnportanit eiîough toe bcteabed by itsetf, one eail omit it bere. Woodwoek, sbouid tue divided inito two parts: eliîîentary where tie purpeî~ shoumld l e to teavh the u'se of bbc tools; iîd advaaeed iere lie purpose should. bo to teach tie eieieîis of preierl caepeiitry as lised on, thle frin, riîd thc care aîîd sharpeiiig of bonis and the mise of eelieib i building. The îîodels shomîid ho practical, aad siuid fit ini with tic othor activities of boy or girl; ebiekenl coops, feed boxes andI tromîgis, etc.; kutes sIiigls anid otier toys. lI oîiw'orkç sbouid iiîeimîde drawi ng, beadiaig, twisting, w'eilig anud teînperng, and sholiul neot ai marchi at ornanielital wvoeI, btt euabie the, boy to do odd repairirig arolini the farîîu. Lcatier-worki siouid bake up tie care anid repaie of baeîuess amu sluocs, aîîd also lavinig of heits aîud spiiing and tyilîg Of repos- Tinsîîithiiig shoutd. emiabie the boy to (Io odld repair jobs aromîmd lie bouse aund baliî requiriîig tie use of solder. A course for girls shouid imclîîîl eleient- ary woodwoek, sewirig and cooking, The cIe- îîîeîtary woodwork coutld be takel with the boys Tic sewinîg sioild iieluide the ciîttiîig eîfittiîug of garnuents, as well as faney work. Cookiiîg sbomîld demi witb the înlakig of rationîs and tbc couparative food values. Tic initroducltion, of tluis course woull bav e two resits: Olîe, and the rInost inipOrtault, it wouiid keep the counitry boy and girl in seblool îoliger anti sendî thein out botter pro- pared. for tbeir life's work; second, il WOUld rcsuit ini a broader selinol organizatioli aiomg bhc files of Consolidation aîîd ini a systeili of training teaciers to carry on tbe work. .To provide an adeqîlate snpply Of properiy tiaiîîed teachers wiii require tilne, a .nd it womul lic iiiupreticable to ueqluîro o Icacior to take rip al the sub- jeets; hbit 1 tbuîîk tbat cvery teaclier oeaîited a thirl or, second class certifleate. The romailg subjeets of advanced, woo- woik,1 i ronwork, leather-work and tirisniithiiig( anid cookuîulg coulil ho gî,ven by speciai iii- streumtors, wbo w ould go fronu centre to centr .e, lakiîîg îup the sulîjectS as required. To train buaeliers alreahiy iii tie profssion would r quiro suîîuîîer courses and an iriflueiicO exert- iii, jirotuaily tirougi lhe bank, to induicO thomn to -attend. Andl 10 proteci thc districts no0 eurtiflcîite or diplomila s)iouitl bc given uuicssn",
         "['HE W-%EsTERN,, SCHOOL .JOURNAL the course had heen satisfactorily completed. With the introduction of manuai training in any fori into a schooi the need of more permanent teachers becoînes more pressing than, it is now.. And even now the need is serious enough to eause educators all over the country to coasider the inattor seriously and advance moans for remedying it. One of the means, and T fhink fthe nost ii- portant, is the organization of ail schools on a municipality or township system. This would secure botter men for the board, re- inove the teacher front petty neighborhood in- terference, and make the introduction of changes in the school programme easier and more effective. And se the educational eff j- ciency of the country 's sehool plant xviii bo greatly increased; and the v aine of each life be increased and a more prosperýous citizen- ship and nation will be the inevitable result. WAYS AND MEANS OF' MAN- AGING HAND-WOIIK IN INTER- NIEDIATE SCilOOLS By W. Prinigle (Suimmar),\u003e A.-Why lland-work Should be Taught. I will quote fromt Dr. John W. Cook, Pros. of Northern Illinois State Normnal Sehiool. Dr. Cook is a man of more than state-wide reputation, and clings inost feaaciously to book iearning, yet hie stated his views muost concisely, in a receat letter f0 me as fullo s: 1 \"'One of the maini arguments for voca- tional training is the abstract charactor of most of our sehool work. It does not appeal te the child, who is busy with the worlI about him. Ifs concrete eharaeter aiterests hum and furaishes that occupation for his hands and his eyes and bis intelligonce as weil, in which hie lives to engage. 2. ''It furnishes inteilectual enmploynient in that it illustrates very significaatly the universal. processes of ecafion aut( produi- tion. An end is very explicitly set up ani the pupil occupies bis intelligence te mooet that end. 3. ''It is assumed that this kind of ex- perience will reach over info his other work and impress upon him the idea of ends amui that ho will, in consequence, pursue his liter- ary work with a different motive and pur- pose than hie otherwise would. 4. ''This kind of work also introduces ono to the various callîngs. ''It does flot foilow of necessity fhat one should have the particular kind of inanual occupation in the sebool that he is going to foilow up in lis later life. I fhimk, however, if ho is going f0 be a fariner preference should be shown for agriculture. \"There is no danger of beginning work of this klnd too early, if the pupil bas Plearly defined te himself just what hoe wantm to ho- corne; indeed, that is a great advantage, for the longer one is engaged infelligently iii pro. larafion the botter hoe will be proparod and the more fume there -will be te deal with ifs eultural, aspects. 5. ''As you know th ' re is a vory strong tide moving foward vocafional training. If is fhoughf f0 bo fooiisiî for a boy in the country te devote himself f0 book iearaing exclusively when aIl about him are snch fine olportunifies for, intorpreting bis lifo as an] adulf. Furtbermore, theso opporfunifies are highly oducafivo, and a close union of school and life means greaf profit for bofli of fhomi. \\Ve wanf these boys and girls te have fhe habif of study in the fhings that are te en- gage thein when fheY are occupied with tIC, dufies of if e. 6. ''Dr. Bryn gave a suggesfive plan for liberal culture recontly by characterizing habit as a 'ftrap.'1 ''Meii learn one thiug and when fhé niced for if changes fhey find tîomselx os uiiabl, te (Io sù unless fbey l'ave the largor vie. t is the tragedy of life when what is ncsaX te maintain life (habif) becomes fhe cause of f allure.'' B-How te Introduco liant xvork Eeo cally. In discnssing this phase of fthe subjecf shall deal with if along the linos of my OWTI experience. 1 have made if a rule te sfart the Jîupi18 wbere they should starf w'hen they open uP a shop for themselves. First, fhe raw mnat criaI for work benches is obtained and flie benchcs mnade by the boys themselvos. Bondhes si- foot long and tbree foot wide will do. Ofle of fliese wifh fwe vices attacbod is large enough for two pupils fo work at, af a tiflo, ifs approximate cest is about $8.50. The fools needed te begin with are a cross eult saw, a rip saw, a f ry square, chisel, cOP1ina saw, smoothing plane, a brace and sef of bit8, a screw driver. As the work pr-ogresses more ean be added. 1 *maintain tIat a teacier sbould oWn set of theso tools just as ho owns a set o books for bis dlesk. One bencb and set o fools in a rural one-roomed school will b0 sufficient, while in a village school ,with il good basement or a roont ospeoially set aPart for this work, six or more benches cal'n uised. To the beginner who is introducilig th\"5 work in aay community, I wonld say start 011 a sinaîl scale aad work up te tbe needs Oftb classes, as the work progresses. StudY etble needs of the communify and make Usef. tbings, whicl can bie sold te pay for materlal Window props, scouring safes, broomn h0ldero s]eeve boards, ail of whicli will sell readilY ~ freint five cents te fxvenfy- f ive, serve to il$ trate this point, nnd are good models for be' ginners. The pupils will nearly alwayS buY the mnodels or seli tIeni. crs Aff or the work bas develeîed te a ced stage I ailow the boys te malte tbingO nee 01 at borne and it is sîurprising fIe nuinbet things wanted that a boy can niake.",
         "WOODI ('AHVING O-the~r Iijes, of work arc0 talion aip su,.Il as forge w url, elee-trieai wùrk, tiusuiithuing aun uxleehlanù.ai îrawing. The first, thirig iu wo()Odvoi'k is to teacli t'l pupils hoxv to rea J thie îuîh ra1w- ilgsý, aud ruahe the objeets fin thein. 111 thj5, way the lmnui (eaiu iroceed w'ith the W11ork wjth but littie assistance frouî the t0eer and is thus prepared to carry on tbe \"VOrk for hiioseif. Wherever the work Ilasm \"lcen intmodueed in this way the )eopie of the district soeua to be wvell sati-sfieJ and theO Pupflis (Otneto be very mueh iatcrcsted in the Work. \\VOOIy(»kItIN(;r [N (UADEI) S('IIOO11S BY E.. Fai mu' (A Suninuary) ith iîtDi esy thiîîg for al shilledlimfsîî ýiheliated. taste to (ogood wood-carv.- 1i1g, but to cari-e weil wh en oîîc is only just fearein how to use the tois is a '.ery dif- feotnatter. Tbo boy iearniung wooli-carv' ilî, is destroyiug iii order to croate. Tho ,Iefiluite task before bilaî requires ('are, \u003c'on centratedl effort, and the wfli to achieve. N1,o other foi-in of liîaudworkç so brings out these qualities. 'I'iey are the foundatiou of (-har, artol' aud the basis of ail success. Tiiere is no ehanice for slipshudl work here. The resuitq of wriouig doiiig show so piaiuly, 'sînce cvery slip of the tool is reg-istereà be- fore the eye. If a boy 's work in this craft is to lie worth iooking at, bis hand must serve bis minti; le mnust tbink and work sinmul- tanusSy. }{andwork is not anl enâ ia itself, but the ielas to anl end-the expression of ordered thouglit. It secmns to rme that this is the ellueationai value of woodI-carv iug iu our pub- lie sehouis. To kccp ever before the boys as tbey go through our 'Manuai Training roiîns the idea of thiiukiug of auJ cxecnting a thing simultaueolliy. Wood-carviflg is some- thinig uiost boys are dccpiy intcrestid lu. To teachi them how to woi'k inteiiigeutly, to teacli themi to desire per'fection, is onr ileal; but let us î'emcmber as we look ut their work iu the eariy stages of devciopînent, that unskiii- ed flugeis are trYing to execute, that mmid in the making is tryiug to express itseif. A W'(J1I) 'lO OURI~ TEACHERS .The Western o uroîînal lias 110w b)cCl 18sUed for about twelve yeairs. At fb'st it hall tfeel its way cai'efuliy, but -,,ar by ,'caî it4aPtO itseli morîe aud miore to thc ned\u003cl thfoe 11a1in bodly of the pi'oviiiee. oe bers, isltor anti evea Supeî'iutend- ents ô ~P~patela tI o~y aal ~ f 1Bducltio? 'hav'e wî'itten tiine and Iake to comp)limieut the Journ'ali upoli its 50eup, and its contents, Yet theî'e are 1It terse Ido not tako the Journal. buitia e they have iîothing to icarui; rif \"en sothey shouid taire it for the salie theua Profession, or' thoy sbouid, scîîd the to on to Soîne one who bas somoethiug f eara11 The best lu education was nover ny o One sehooi, nor anion, aay olie out Iht is the aini of the Joui-ual to find whtis best both hoe and abroadi, auJ to presenlt it ini a belpfui foruîî tii the teurbeus. More thau this, the Journal bas a 'oiumîî For the eildren. This bas pî-oved to be - of iucl iîitcrest. Wiîy not tuke tbe Jour-ual and get your owiî pupils iîîtercsted lu the iompetitions w'iiih appeai' froia îaontii to înoith ? This last year there bave been special ar'ticles ou drawing by oue of tbe best autiî oîlties on the continent, Miss Boulnie E. Siuow. Next year wc can provide somethuig eqîiaiiy good ln aunotber lino. rFbe Journal ian saY to nil its teachers: \",If therc is allYtbliig Yeiîi want, ask for it! Wii you malin a point of eanvassiuig 3-our îîext Jour neigbbor? Tbe Journal tan cou- tinue, anîl continue to enilarge, jîîst if the teacheors support it. iBy the way, why îîot becoule a loiîtributor? IN TuE I«OR WOliIIII) thIt seluIs a naturai thing lu Manitobawc huigo îoi toesiatc witii thein te ruame Of RîîSseii.Iangîs Booksbop, Winnipeg. This iiookshop bas for tbirty-five years Ibeeg lstrtibuitlîî g0ood liteature througbout the Canadjian W est. W blen we wrotO to tiein ingst1g that th-y nîaîke a sjiecial îîuouaîcîenit iii this issue, they iniediately respoad- e4) ad their advertlsernent appears ou anotiîe page. Russell.Laflg's ides of solecting Lili- rury Books) lot bY3 tites but bY Soeing the books themslves is a good one.",
         "THE WESTERN SOHOOL JOURNAL Elementary Section MINUTES 0F GENERAL MEETING The mepeting ýyas held on Thursday, April 8, at 9.30. President 1). S. Woods occupied the chair. The election of of- ficers took place as follows :-Presidcnt, Bro. Joseph, St. Bonifacc; Secretary, Miss E. Stephenson, Winnipcg. The president reported a, good atten- dance at ail conferences of the Elemien- tary section and called upon the vari- oîîs chairnien to report. Repiorts were then presented by D. J. Wright for the Rural section, Miss Me- Lean for the Elementary section, Bro. Josephl for the Interinediate section, fIspector Walker for the Senior sec- tion. (These reports are printed cise- where). Addresses were then delivered by IL W. Watson, W. A. Mclntyre, Rev. J. S. Woodsworth. A summnary is given in the following p)ages. PAPERS 0F GENERAL MEETING THE RELATION 0F THE SCIIOOL, GARDEN TO THE SCHOOLROOM By H. W. Watson (a Summary) Some teachers in the past bave regarded Sehool Gardening as an additional subject on the programme to lie ,taken up during thc spring months, somcthfng merely ta be played at, something to provide a littie healthy, out- door diversion during the weeks when work indloors is rather uninviting, even distasteful. I fear somle teachers even at preseut entertain this shallow opinion of sueli an important subject. What should lbe the relation of the school garden to the schoolroom. A slightly empha- sized interpretation of this relation might be obtained by stating the tapie thus:-The Re- laticn of the Schoolroom to the -School Gar- den. Yet this interpretation of relating most of the work in the elementary schooroom directly ta the activities of the school-farin and indirectly to the operations on the farms of the district should lie uppermost in the minds of the real, live, rural teacher. This correllation is most fully carried iuta cifeet, of course, in aur Agricultural Colleges and Agricultural schools where only tapies relating ta farm interests engage the time of the classroorn. Many consolidated schools realize the im- portance of directing and emphasizing the work of \u003ethe schoolroom along agricultural Elues, and are pracuring extra land for ex- perimental purpases. Saine Consalidlated Sehool Boards are pur- ehasing from 10 ta 25 acres of additional land whieh the scbools will use as a small experi- mental farin. They will own one of the van teams, which will (Io the heavy work an tho farin during echool hours. Small, yet modemu, farin buildings will b. erected for the keep- ing of a dairy cow, saine pigs, poultry, etc. Feed for the stock, vegetables, floweis, shrubs, etc., will be grawn on the f arm and in all operations the children will take as pro- minent a part as they are capable'of. Why this rdclchange iu rural cducClt tienu? President Eggleston of Richmond I'olyteCh- nic, Institute, bas stated: Il'The day is alreadY lit hand wheu the rural sehool must contraî the food supply of the nation.\" Most educators realize that this respù1lsi' bility actually rests upon the rural sehool. lIn f act, aur nation wauld now be saving millions of dollars annually, had the sehools of the last generatian realizedl and assuined this me- sponsil)ility. The permnency of auy nation depends upon the exteiit of prosperaus, happy content- cd haines wîthin its borders and the efficielcY of the clementary school wiIl lie measured bY its suecess in turning ont efficient home andl eommunity l)uilders. The rising generation should lie impressed w ith the prime importance of permanent houle building and that every quarter section O land should possess anc. How eau the rural school promote this 101\" ditiaul It eau interest the girls and boys, iu farm if e and rural advantages , sO that they will prefer ta inake homes theme. It eau alo0 introduce sufficient expeimental agriculture subject programmes ta induce the boys ta O came scieutifie farmers, not haphazard 80 Millers. The sehool ground with its fenceSq W8alc' trees, shmubs, flowers, portion for pla y gard eus, etc., is an essentiel feature of the edlueR tional plant, aîîd the training gained there may în'ove a greater fitness for haie buiîd' ing an(l eitizenship than nuch of that 01), taiîied within the walls of the sbOOlioiu.\"",
         "WORK 0F THE PRIMARY (,RADES What se'hooîî'oonî sublicets ean lî relatod te the sehool gardeîî, aînd liow? Arithn-etie. Many îîrolleîîîs nîay bo gix ou iegarding aî'ea of plots, division into plots, Yields, arnonîît of soed, etc. BoOkkeeping. AIl the pi'ineipies of keep' ing far- aceuîîts îmay be taught praetieally; records may ho kept witb varions plots, vaî'u- ous crops; total cost of labor, seed, etc.; value 0f the Produce and net pirofit. Geoîîîetry. A good exorcise wvill be af- thre vains plotsi to a scalle the entire gardon. thi'e vris p lowalr' ete., the di'awiiig of bOrersandfloerbeds of varions shapes. Readiîîg. Abundaîit material foi' suppdo- inlentary reading nîay be found in the varions farin bulletins, agrieultui'aî mîagazinîes, etc. Comp]ositioni. The sehool gardon will furîîisb au enless vaiity of the bost of subjeets foi' oral and writteîî ;'oinposition. No subjeet ('ail ho betteî' than'those that ar'e faunilinu' and of cv'ery uîaY iiiterest to the ('blidron. Geograîby. The sehool grounîl will funîish t'le \"nit froîn whieb to begin, its buildings, walks, gardons, their, directions and relatioîîs tO each other. Froîn the stu\u003cly of tho sehool ko'(Undl YOII will i)i0(ooed to the quarter soc- t'Oîî, the sohooil district, townsite, etc. Mails 0f eaeh nîav ho drawîî ia tîîîn. Cies. The sehool gardon înay ho a mini- ture nlunieip)ality with its quarter sections, 9lectOns, townships, wards, etc. Tt may have its aîuaicipalty offiers, rond iispeetor, th0' l)eet'or, etc. The offieers îîîay inake th aws and Iuiovido the inachiîei'y foi' cii- forci ng thein.* The principies of muîniciipal goverine01 ina, ho fully tangbit usiiig tlîe sehool garde1. as the nulit. rolawîing. Abundaît îîatuî'ai îîateri ai imay Year. fo hs subjeet at ail soasoîls of the atu '8tuîîy. The l\u003e('t oppoi'tunlity is '1orde, for' tb'e stiîly of plants, iliseûts, bird8, alillals. theiî' barnits, habuits, food, etc'., 11 hoir ecol;niî vaine te mnî. Tue t so h eool grun wih spossible 4 ive efntîesailnu'ose te the (ili 'îoksubjeots takon nll witbiîî the sebool'oouî. Rý1OTANCE 0F THE WORK 0F TIE lIMAî1Y GRADES. W. A. Melntyre (A Snmmary) foTre 8co e is linet tho oiiiy eîlîîîatoî'. The- ree8 Olier tb rougb the sociaîl millieu r roet thau thoiie olîeratiiîg iii the cîas'- assist . htit is botter for the parenit to eloitiIn ecuifg r iht social aîîîl eeoîîoiîiie rothe h0 the i seî'uring eveil good schools. hre educatioiî of the houle i's Sijl î1-eahng thaîî that of the sebool. teltehayo tbough reaehiiug ail ini a sys' R11 'l -Wa andî through luuingiîîg togetbe' ai~jse0s liii conitionus of ehildreui, i4 per' anid th a at ork both for the iîidividluîils 'eePrnarY sehool represeuîtiuîg the f irst four grades, il' iiuotaIit for at loast three relasons, It reaches the great body of chu'- dren. It reaâches them while their bodies and minds are in) the formative stage. It coneerils itself with iaving foundlatiolîs. No less thanl 70 per' cent. of ail the pupils in the eliîieutary aiîd higb scbools are in the first four grades. Probably 40 per cent. nover -et beyond the fourth grade.* As it is better to raise the intelligence of the niasses onie degree thaît to raise the intelligenice of the favored f ew 011e huîidred degrees, the im- piortancoe of the elenientary work is clcariv evident. The three ])robleflis that ougbt to be raised here are: (1) Woul it be wise to arrange foi' kindergarteils, so as to give elhi- (lien another yeai' at the beLiîîning? (2) Would it be possible to ally the p)rogrammeit or- social coniditions so as to enicourage ('bit' (lion to ronlaini at sehool a littie longer? (3) Wouldl it lie possible iîy i'c ariangiilg hour% of' woi'k or by siipl1ifyiiig it to get moure ijîto the fouir years? A iiiodified affirmative rail le given to practieally ail of these questions. The impi1ortance of the yeai's of piastuî'it ' ('an iîot be bighly î'egaî'ded. It is then that adjîîstiîOits are effeeted, it is then that af- fection is fostered. ''.Just as, tho twig is bout the tree 's ineliiied.'' Tîe înost sigiîifi- cant biological fact foi' îiaîkmndl is that liii- mail infancy is so prolonged. The foundations that ai'e laid iii the iri- iai'y grades îuîay be rougbiy stated uîider these divisionis: 1. Physieal Fitîîess. 'The tî'aiiîîng giveil iii school aiid oii the Ida.ygi'otitld , tlirouiîh eorc'ises, plnly, hygien le supervisioni, shoffid iinake for health, strength, graee aiîd 'îgoi'. This ineias better buildings, important enre- takiîîg, inodieal inispection in countr'y places, mîore atteuntion to play grouiffd aetivitics anid mîor'e scueiitific physieal instruc(tion. 2. Kiîowledge. The knowvledge of ilon aîîd thiîigs is îîeoessaiy very Iiiiii'ted and uîî- orgaiiized but it slîould be cor'rec't as fai' as it goos. Tt inay bc suppleiiientoll and systeini ized later on but shoul îot have to bo coin- pletelY uîîileau'uied. ý- 3. Power'. The pupbil should have bis seils0 aîîd his tliought power trailiiel ly lise se that ho wili be aile to gather thouglit nt fiî'st hand, aîîîl ho shonld bo traincîl to i'eal aîid listen so that ho îîay bo able to gather thought froîî Cther's. We hiave, made îîîuol of teaeliug ehildi'ei toi read. We have îîot doiiî aswI soui' foiefathers iii tr'aining thei to listen, aîiu we ]lave îîot ouîtside of kiiidei- gar-tel) (jolie very luncih to train the selîses te qui'kîiess anîd aeuîracy. Tt is also nCoeessiry tlîat there sboîil ho tr'a'iuing iii power of ex1ression-oi'al aîid written, aîîd of these0 two, the formerci is thie mîor'e imîportanit. Wbieh of the two is i'e(eiviiig greatei' attenitioni iii the i)riniary grades? Witb roolîls î'ontaifllig 50 ani 60 Iihls how liu'h eau bo (lone te develoli pîower of froc speech? 4. Attitude aîîd lîleals. The attitude of plipils to niatuire ani to lhlail is nmore iuiloi't' it thaxi their actual knowledge. The mani who woul chanige sympathetie nîature stud.v",
         ",jIl FVE4IEt SCHOO, .JOURINAI, ixito clementary agriculture in the prilniary grades Iarks both ordinary sense and reverence for childhood. WVha-t. rhilircn eau get in srhooi at this taeis not practirai tcrhnical kenow- iedg-e andi ckiil but rigbt attitude, ami this is in the ed the better preparatien for acttuel lite service, ripe saine idea muav he carniei inte ethar rields. The clcmentary sehool ccxx- net ç1irectl,, prepare fer the ivecations, Put it can indirectly prepare by dcx dloping tii' qualities et body and nîind that are essentiel te snccess. Ner is îrepaîîîtiei for the oca- tiens everything. 'There is sonîething more important in the world than ineterial pros- perity. 5. Habit. ('hiidbood is the pcriod et habit formation. Right habits et speech,' thought and action slîoul Pc rarcfuily. feste-:cd. lYn- less dlear enuxiriatiexi, prelier prontuirciatieii, addIress are tixed in ehildlheod thcy wiil likely neyer ha attained: tPe child who is trainedi te be accurate nd sincere in Pis thinkin.g will retain his habit; and in tPe great field et action Pce bas au abunidant capital Who learna in yonth these six-hedience, c coîîomy, indnustry, trutiflness, silence, erder. 6. Taste. Chiidrcn xeay Pc taught, te ap- preciate the bcantv in sound, formn and ar- rangement. Our sehools may rightl : inake miîch et music, ai-t and dancing, ard la every seheol actix itYcipai rau 1w placedl on ortistic production. Pairtie-îdnrlvý iu tPe, fieldt of literattîre sbenild au atteînpt bc mnade te davelop literary taste. Nor must it Pc fer- gotten thet fer most -hihlren t.-ste is (le x-eloped tbrough doing simple wvrkarit eally, rather than through set lesseus iii art. 7. Disposition. SxirelY wben we jîxdge people in later years tirs t of ail 1),7 their dlis- positions. nîghtlY se since their dispositions méasure their iusefulne\"s and bîxuxan Worth, it is wall that in the primary grades kindlliness and ahl the other graces et tPe si irit shoîîld Pc emphasize\u003ci. By this hurricdl statement it will ha cîcar that tPe hast thiiug the eienxcntary seheel can do for ehildrca is net nîercly te fux-nisb tPe minds but te inould thx'm, thrnîîgh th(, furnishiîîg. Tt pna ' Pc saidl et ail subjects as was said ot iuanual traininxg: \"T't nmust uer bc judged by tPe niaterial produet but Pv- wxhat is left.in the puipil ot attitudfe, hait, anci iategrity.'' Tf the work of the clcîneiit'ury su-Pool is se) importanît it is Worth w hile sttiîpextiiig it. In Canada we, have ente, faor short ot doin- jus- tica te the little cbildren. Let any one figure, eut what it eosts an et of ir provinces te give al young Ixersoxi a voar eit i, uiivex-sit vr ni-ai agricultural ellege, annd let hini eoixîplre it with the amoxi nt spexît «n the educanti ox \u003cf tPe littie chilci. The eoiarison is illumninat- ixîg, anil indicates thiat atter. ail woe tire îîet low-grade teachex-, th(,enn pid tarbx- is placed le the prniary grades. The Pest teaei' ing shboulil Pc for these Nvhe haeut n tewý cears te attend sehool. Look agail at the, living iii a dlemnorinry,,but thiit the poor are payiag to eduroate the fairly-welI to-de. Note, also how iu miaux of our rities ani towns th(, eostly equitimelit in the higher sehois. and rontrast w ith tPe Parrei primarY elassreoxlq, and the W'onder grows that people dIo not riamor for bettcr things. .Tust a Word touelhiag olpen Condiitions of success. The firqt thing of course is to get, competeut teaelhers. They nmust have outlook. They wiIl sec the school in its relation to thc individual and to societv. They wilI ever have in mind the words, 'lite ani service foi' it is to fit the lives ot iindividuals for service in the eouniutnit-y, that the seheol exists. Then the.v mnust earry on the work in a right, spirit. Te the sehool xviii Pc inanifest everY day full huinan syxnpathy andl friendly ce- operation. The se bool wilIl not be inercly ai preparatien for lite but participation iîx lite. And what as to the teacher 's reward. 1 can promise you no înorc thau that awardcdý Hlm who weat about doiîxg good. But let un0 one be diseon rn'ed. Be 'vond the loneliaiess anid sorrow and blood -sweat and crucifixion there was a resurrectien. Our 1h c'i (au neyer bc s0 lonely as His for wc bave net toi treqxd thi wine press alone. Lite for the moderni primary teacher may be a great joy, for it is passedl in the prescure of pure and( happy' c-hi]dhood audf siirrouindcd( bv the goodj wiqheS of fellow workers andl thanktul parents. And ut the end of it ail wc ton shall bave a resur- rertien, for each goodl thougbt and kindY dleeul, will li i e agnixi iii thc hearts of little eues Who bali-e Peen ledl Pv us iiito the xlî et truth anul benity Ral righteoinsness. THE TEACHER AS COMMUNITY LEADER- Ex Rev. J, S. Vuseii (A Sninmary). lu tis aialie contributi ou to the PrO' gramme, the speaker peintedl eut how the peCuiliar r ireuinstaeces of rapidiyN dev~eoiig western commnuiities ralicdj fer, scleade sh'ip as murch as for raptains et i'nolustry RI leaders iii the commnercial Wold. De.einilia- other protessional men frein exercising ta lendership adcc1uaiýtelyv, whiie the position of the teacher miade Punii the iatuirai leader'11l r\u003eoinmunlit.\\ lite. I t ives a posi tion of iiti1t responsihiilitv 111d higbest honor.. vet 0 whieh hce old net, ai oid witbent 'beung re- creant te bois trust. The future of tbe, Datot Wa5; in Pis ha iii, andx Pv bis attitude 'tSde- term mcdi the whxde course of wvesternl izf tien. The siilstnIire ot Mi',. \\Vnoodswort1.th address aiNe e short t inie ugo ini thei\" S. -Jeu rniai n xi w-e h upe t ha b\\ e ilnit \u003cler ('oll triPuition in t he neai' fuiture.",
         "'1imE TrAIqlE OF A RUIZAL -'CHOOL, RURAýLi (1NFERENCý1 NI1N U TES Mr. D. J. Wright\u003e chairinan, report- Id that the Meeting wvas very suCcess- fulin ef very way, excepting that there w'as 'lot sufficient tinte for (IiSCUi011ol. le referred particularly to Inspector ýgu1ire's paper'Lbais 01Phasizing the neeessity of uising these te help parents as well as puipils. The other papers wvere: ''The Ruiral TPime Table, \" by E. Stewart, an d 'Ilandwork' in hural Sehools,\"l hy M1e'8rs. Emsa]1 and Newton. These ap- flear later. TH~TIME TABLE 0F, A RITRAL SI-HOOL ReOy J. Stewart, Neýpa\\xa hefirSt necessitv of the rural qehool tocerl the arrangent (if the prograîin of studios il that hoe etîltivltc tlie facultv of 5'-ttîng aside certain neeepted maxims 'and i8Wç,s cf nature H1e must fer exampie, set '1tireIY aide the age-holiored principie of tOne thi'ng ýzt a time.'' The rural sechool teachler )ývho eanliot dIo everal1 thingq at on110 15 nt likli.l t. atta iîî oîmtýtaîîd ilîgsîeo. Ag\u0026\"', a Well knuvui law ct-mands'that tw o $0bjeeýts shal flot oceclîy tho1îe -puee at th(, tha n e-ti1 If in jnaking nip bis programnne th urlsehool teucher adhercs te this grand- Wthe.ly idea he aiced net expert te keep) 111) \"\"th e ~ coin pace of modern life. Till ni lniin arrives when consolidlationî relegatei th 1 oid0(-time rural sehool te the, (\"hool, anicîities, the toecher cf suîlî lOgh must i gnore aîîv oid fogy îîrocoîts that vea bi ac tiçn and by haviag se- ailu irons ini the fire and several enterprises the 41,11 together, see to it that ho getq jute cise y and the woek the classes anad exer- 8andý reviews that beiong thereto. 'P ~ably every teacher shoulîl ho the creator i'i15 programmle of studioes. lu1.s iadi- 'a, t~Y and the particular conmposition and stritl by1 of the school should net ho re- h\"POn h-i1 bY a1 Cast-iren time-table impcuedl h bas th y lY'of the higher powers. if tioh of SPirit and the ideai and thc gilip- oWn tf the trile teacher ho, will work .îUt bis Otben \u0026aIl One subjeetb takîng it of\" ait Otilente avi hs hýe maust Rive te c-h th dan all81ottedl amouat of time. One cf gr\"hager in a rural scheol xvhere o nilîaîli that t e te ho tauglht se maîîy 'tbjos for th 0 teacher inay sacrific thoroughaess I'hs n0 se f overiag qO înueh grouinil. evier Pays. To illus trnte: If yen have tremutes fora a few' ae reading lesson, it is botter o f Pages reaj indiff e haie a Iu the îeîîisti-tîrtiol, of our time-table care fui pîrov ision mîust bo naade for ssectî roi iew s. l1he thiîîg whiah is taught toda.' mîust 11 t Le aHlowed to bc forgotten heforî'e il, s a 'ýail rcfreshed iii the ehîld 's mîiîîd. Lan teacer iu th(, rural se.hois dIo net thiak lconil ositioîi anl important Subject and (-oi1Sequ 'îtl e tiîe * do0 lot give it a very im- portant th îîghIt in the cooîitruetiflg of tlîeir tinle tai le w,'th the rosilt that in mnany. eaqeo oiily two short lessons a week are givcii ia t bis subleet. To nîy mind it reqiîires more independont thonghit on the child 's part to write a good lettêr than it does for hima te (Io a problemn in arithmetie. In arithmetic there are certain set rîîies hie muîst follow, but in the composition of a letter hc must express bis thoîîghts as bcst hie ceni in his own way. Ia t he lower grades mnore lessons and shorter periods should ho the rule. Twe or three short reading lessens, for example, will ho raneh more valuable than oe long one. The saine rideo applies to their drill in number work, etc. The teaelîeî wiîo is eonstantlY eoînplainiang ablout bainig so maay grades la the rural school, hav ing se many subjects to teach and not having tilce to teac.h some of the sib.jectq is gencrallv the teaimer who is cither a slave of a poorlyv î'oîstruîed tiîne-table or e15' dloeq not peoýssss oîîe ait al]. A teacher must hlave a time-table and the good toacher will nlashave time to i 'eh ail the subjects on, the etîrriruhîîiin to il the grades ia the rural secheel. Reces and neen-heur are the periods for rccrcation and this timne shoul miot 1)0 oecupied by the teaeher lîl eorrecting their ,work undl preparing themn for the work thore- -3fter, on the other han] hoe shiotîld se, that dniricg tluis period. there is orgaaized pla.N aind tcne h tlîîni '' to play while they plav, and work while they wor\" ;.' The lower grades shoiiîk always be kept at -work, as thc work in sehool is the cultivation of judgment. Tt is not advisahle te have toc many grades ia tlic rural sîchool but inite the classes and combine the grades so that the greatest nmoont of time înaY he givent tech grade. Two important Peîents ia the constructionl, the plan. and the carrying out, of a rural seheol time-tabie arc, reguflarity and puactu- n-litv. Botli cf these arise fromn the saine cause, thnt is tiîe lacis of the abiiity of th(, parent or teaeher te hold the vhiid alt sehlool. The atteadance of the rural seheois la this province is Iîîst what the toacher înakes it, and a good attendance' at qcheol is ai mark of efficienCyv foi, the teachler. la the cee.îîstruction of a time-tabie certaili gu idîîîg minci ýpies na%- hoe indicated. 1. Viaviîîg neesSaril.y to îlivide bis atten. tien the, teachler w111i expeet und require and train his puIpils ospeeciaiy in the senior classes te dIo things, te discover tblings te stiudy hv thenîseies alîd te oeup -y therriselve profit nbi.v while ho is eîîgaged wlth others. Ilc(",
         "TIE WESTERN SCETOOL, JOURNAL ivili sec te ut ns far as he v'an that, w'hile be s engageti with others, the î'hildt'en are net rnerelv dloing tasls lînt investigatiîtg anti t iise voi tg. 2. The ttot'e stotîtous weî'k, thtît is, tîtat wvhich detnaîtds inotes of effort, shouît lie Itiaet eariv in the (la.) or the hait day îteî'iet xvheîî the uiiîtîs are fresh and aloît, the mtore ttted'laî,iai andt less exhausting shoul oceuîty the, latter bonis. 3. Thte îîrinttiple of varicty« w'il ito oit serveti net iterelv by the chanîge of work to ptlay' but liv vai'yitîg tbe oeltîtioît frit 1tcîiel te 1îeriod. Getîe'ally s\u003eeakçiing, ito ciass, eveit seniors, wilI bo 'kejt mnorem tbatt haîf ef the balf'lay ' v eriod at a single ferni tif work, andt the woik of the jtîîtiers wili ite sti Il moire frequeîîtlY changeti. 4. Spetiai t'aie utusi lie exet'îisel ity the teathet' te seeure that the basailtj s reand- iîîg, wt'itittg. sjtelil antt aritîtiietit', are nt sacrifiteti wheît soute tbiîîgs tîitst te saci- fioti iti the woî'kiîig ottt of the programmîîe. Tbe drills andt tbe furlîelows Play go; but the ebilti wltose ptow'er te î'cad antd write anîd te (Io tumhier woî'k is sacrifiet is the loser in the end. 5. Itt sjtite of the mtttt erttsh of sailjeits the truie teavhet' will fitîtl tace for the tbittg itîaîîy iiegieet, natnely, itili-net oiîl.y the tîtilitary, but tdrill in thte fitîlaînettals , tdrill ttn adding anti sthtracýtiitg. inultilîiyiii( ng( aîd i, iing, tdrill ini the tales andt tirili itt spelling. Stores of soeniets catittot add îleî'eîtly betause they hav'e îteî'r itect tboreîighly titilieti on, tbis work. 6. The rural scitool teather iust figlît streiiouisly ttgainst ei'er tuescotttiig to the level of gi'iîtg thiltîrot worR te tIt, 't simpîly te luet them n et of îtt isihief. ' The etita tt'at'beî-'; 'silce is nttt tht' fiiliîîg et titîe, lînt settiîîg tb ho ildrî'î oit tht' tatlt et know- letîge. 7. The teatîter imtist ttet allowv hittîsoîf te Itetonte tht' slave of lis titîîo'talîle. A wbole- soute joît now andt tbott nîav imtîreve ltotb ut miii hiîtt. Variety is the s[îit'e of life. Vary it tuot fot' ittoro î'aprîite lint for stintulation andt dis'oî'ery of a btttet' andî mote ail vatîtageous foratt. IIANDWORK IN RI'RAL (tli()01,l l'nîîsall iiîî st'bool distt'it'ts iin Manitobla liffet' ini îiany resjiettt, 4onltO bei ug iii oil 'tettîcîl districts wbere tbey bave everYv t'eive.tîieiît't atnt others ini outlying anti îew settlientts, T bave thougbt it adtvisable te givo a short îles' vi1ttioiî of eut' ow'î ljsttit't, t'uiîat'isoîi cuil thoît le tmatde anti a ptlati of working artii ct at suitable foir aîîy lartittlar v'ase. Norris Sihool is soven mîiles itortliwest 'tt Teuloti andî soite forty'ti'et' tmiles ittîri outf Winînipeg. A ft'w veurs ago tht' w'holt' lis- trit't watt eoveretl witb a tdense fort'st, Ibtis bas Tîcen cleareti awaY anti a thiek grotl tif serubit s takiug, its place. Sioughs inLersect cadi other in ail directions. Tr-ails whieh are ailmost iînpassable in wet weather are thc Chief inîans of comnnicýatioti. The average 4 istance of the ehildrca front sebool is fnily twe utiles. The land beinig diffieuit of cultiva'- lion the miei are often frein homle eariogI nioiney lcavingý the women andi ehiltreli il, barge of the lme. lindfer these eonditions the attendance at sehool is rpregolar. At itresent we have noile over the FiÉti Grade, few stay after they are thirteen or fourtecit years of age. The settlers are purelY 8 ni tavian. In ever ' respect the srhool is a pietteer eue with ali the tlisadvarntages invi' (lent to stieh. l)iawiiig is s0 ilitiliately t'onnevîtte Witlt hautiwork, we cotîsitier it as a ltraîîch of tht' sainle subjeot andt ptUy t'(ial attention to it. To baud work prolper we tievoti' two honrS vvery Friîlay afternoon, also frin nblottt the iteginîîiug of Nux'cîîber nutil Elister nil the, tinte we eau get during the mil-dlay îî''~ At this season of the year the citiltiret cTtîiift\u003c gýo ont to ptlay, ail bring their ýmicb w~ith themn, as soon as this is dispose I of tbey bîave n lot of timie te sîtare, anti being fuît Of energy tltey seon itake themsel~'' kue 1,wfl. sa J suggestetl they iuight dIo the il hnîtîlwor]k if they thought lîreier anti that 1 v7oul belP theni. The ptroposition was haileti witlî(de- ligbt, it was a change frointh flc rdintuî'Y svhool routtinte, antt uow untter the gîtse Of Ilday antd baviug their owîî sweet, will 1titere is nto mo tre bulsy et' muore bappîy al tart Of the clay. Thete is 'ne hartiship in this, it is sitil1)\u003e , ittili 'A rg waste eincrgy. Thte uisutl diltîter lîottr exeitenieitt bas beeîi doite away WN't1, the îhildren have rettlly beeti rested andttiare ltetter fitteti ltoth mieiitally aitd ph *sit'Sly' foi- tb'ir t' uterît oot worlç thait evt'r 0tfri.ô totreWt'e Vait it e tie tîel tb etî t.)ori dtt' utr, iiig tbe ictîidlav t'ess bu~t so far nie \"bie1tti itas beeti mîatle, the ptarettts are pe'îfoetly satisf iet!. The girls'4 work 'oîtsists of lainI t'tsy ithidte tcrv, 1 ittti ttg, ciothet in latt'b- ittg, tluttiiitg, silîîtle î'affia alit adloî w'o'k. As the attentîaîtee at sehool is s0 'litî t't w'e ilevote tîtost attentiont te iieeî'ntlfwerIcj on yv takitïg tPIt the î'affia ai that kint] \\%ork ais opthortîîîîity effets. 1 The teaeber itakes ail jînrebases. \\NJ tot lav itn a hoav'Y stock itut we let it lic0 gooti qîîalitv. Altott hait a tlzttYartî5 't t'a lit'o antdt th tee ti' fotir tof t ot tel iiîttiti l othot' aî'tit'es j t, ptreoo'tiont xvll bl suffie'iel te t'otttinine with. For entbroitlery we çn I M. C . histeret anit tervereî' irtt'0 Rttet v~arionis shaties of tolor te o e iest satîsfa toiry. Vî' use siikçs as Boltlitgs et' iv very spîaî'iîgly, they aire net 01l1 0Xt~ 1 ltnt \u003c'hiltîroî finttI etî soitewbat t!f Tf1Iîlt tMantage. If ptarents tietire sette artiVee5I as a îtillow for a loilitge mutl (le tIl tbey sîîîtîly their owit iuaterial. k p 1er, Whon we first t'înient't't liandttl'Aor . r sutttetl the ptarenits to tiîl\u003ct an intere'Il 01n1c t'bilîlrot 's worl\u003c, eslieeiaiiy the need]e So far as the pttîpils were î.oteeruied te P81",
         "HAND-WORK IN RURAL SCHOOLS Worked admirably, but in other respects it -is Cot to be recommended. When I came to the torris School some eighteen months ago, J tok quite the opposite course and now par- ents have absolutely nothing to do with the handwork. All work is begun in the school and nothing whatever is allowed to be taken bway until it is perfectly finished. Until the begniang of this winter I taught all hand- mork myself, but the pupils now began to re- quire more advance work. Not feeling quite CoIrapent to take the girls in ther needle- iork I prevailed upon a young lady in the district who bas a taste for that kind of work ti take full charge of our needlework for the eater. There is another plan which our male teaChers of the ungraded schools might try. i sany districts there is what is called a ches aid association in connection with the Chsri. I have thought that some such pro- halfon might be made for the day school, say lea dozen ladies agree to supervise thè aeedework and take it in turn to attend school b dople ot hours each week. I think it could t The boys do light woodwork. No heavv eros such as planes, hand saws, heavy ham- isno, axes and so on are required, hence there desks necessity for special benches, the school care thuie for everything; with ordinary in r Will receive no more damage than 0iiilar seheo 1work. Storeraterial we gather up all the spare soi . xWood we can find and prevail upon W0 alsa in the district to plane it smooth. cure it se Cigar box wood when we can pro- bas, 1* For the higher class of work we use Our Wood, white maple and satin-walnut. desC rt 0s are of the simplest and lightest ean such as the youngest boys in school 0 r they andle. Coping saws, fretsaws, nCh tr small chisels, a fine drill, a six- eiht s e, a small tack hammer, an ]ails and le, a packet of half-inch finishing sandpnd an abundance of fine and course the other . Get the simple tools first, adding the I as necessary. Fretsaw frames are lewals t expensive, 75e each. The only re- biad aneeded are sandpaper, nails and saw Pverytind these are very cheap indeed. f lrd 'i\u003eg Can be ardw e scn e obtained at the Ashdown's als aetore on Main Street. They are Ould stor Hobbies' Fretsaw goods. itend taki rongly advise those teachers who the as gup this work to carry witb to0. Part efi their professional equipment 0 oold a lite wood sufficient for a rural n arrik could then begin immediately d be ve a new engagement. The cost b all and 'Vort little, -hile the articles are so e Pecia able their bulks would scarcely ne], ti \"inging handwork we do net spend resmake n mre practising. Children like repeet. Flngs se we indulge them in this otquare or lstance, give a young girl a s fo k much a e calieo to hem, she may e hanker nterest in it, but tell her it er and she will be delight- er rk as mueh as possible, eut off that hem and fold down another, tell- ing her she shall have the handkerchief for ber very own if she makes as much progress ntext time and she will put her whole soul into the work. The same method holds good with the boys. In some such way as this we cheer- fully get all the practice we may think neces- sary. When once this interest bas been aroused we try to maintain it by variety of work, a constant watchfulness for and appreciation of good work, encouraging them to let the next be even better. Then again we let it be known that whatever article is well made shall ultimately become their own property, that whatever article is badly made will be destroyed. Also that should the work be exhibited and prizes won, the money thus ob tained will be fully and fairly distributed. This may seem rather mereenary, but it teaches the children that only good work pays and that whatever is worth doing at all is worth doing well. This constant effort to do good work will gradually become a habit, the eye and hand will have beceome so trained that they can- not do bad or careless work. The mental at- titude is henceforth on the side of good work for its own sake. Again, in our handwork, we try to culti- vate a spirit of self-reliance, a spirit of con- fidence. I rarely, if ever, do any handwork in school. I show the children the nature of their work, how to draw or trace the plan, how to hold tools and so on, but should one of them become really puzzled, I request a more advanced pupil to help him out of the difficulty. He is pleased to do this, he con- siders it an honor te bis own ability and is proud the teacher can place confidence in him. The other day the door of our schoolhouse failed tolock. I asked one of the boys to sec what was the matter. le soon brought his report. ''Can you set it right?'' ''Yes, certainly, sir.'' ''Very good, you may do so.'' Now this boy had never done work of that kind before, but he bad learned to be self-reliant, to have confidence in himself. Many of our agricultural societies offer prizes for school work. The benefits result- ing from the striving for these prizes cannot be over-estimated. When a farmer strives for prizes a marked improvement is soon seen in bis stock, crops and farm generally. In like manner when the same stimulus is applied to school work not only is a decided advance made in the varions branches of study \u003eut the tone, the very atmosphere of the school, as it were, is uplifted. Recognizing the good results arising from this competition we have ever used its prin- ciple as a means for our advancement, our success may be encouragement for others to try to do likewise. As already stated, we have been at this work four years. During this time we have exhibited at the Easter Conventions in Win- nipeg, the Can adian Industrial Exhibition,",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL ttc Dominion Fair, aud various Teach- ers' Con entions. Authough general sehool work was showu, drawing and handwork always formew a stroug feature. We have been suecessful in winning five silver medals, three bronze medals and a very large number of first and second prizes, the exact list of which I cannot at present give. Our best year, 1913, stands out prominently. It was the last year I had charge of the Wester- ham School. This school and Norris Scbool are adjoining districts but in the same Scandinavian settlement. We exhibited at the Dominion Fair, which happened to be at Brandon. We succeeded in winning one silver medal, one bronze medal and $42.00 in prize mone. In addition we were successful lu winning te Cristie Special Library the t Blue Ribbon prize given for ttc testcomi froue rural sehools. Thîs award, coming f roi the Dominion air, had the effeet for that year, of giving the Westerham Srhool the first place among the rural schools of all Canada. Teachers will naturally ask who is to pro- vide thc moncy neccssary fer this manual wrk. th those districts where the trustees arc anxious to introduce the subject they, ef course, will b glad to provide th funds. Iu uany districts, however, and especially in outlying new settlements the trustees will be adverse te spending more money than is ab- solutely necessary. In our own district at Norris the people were indifferent, skeptical, could not sec any benefit to be derived from it, and so on. Tt was a case of either financing the scheme myself or letting the whole thing fall through and going on in the old, old monotonous round so peculiar to rural sehools. Rather than prejudice or imperil the chance of its introduction T determined, for a time at least, to devote the bonus given by the De- partment to the purehase of material and take the risk. The average cost for material for the last cighieen months workçs out nt the rate of $15.00 per year, so T have not tres- p~ased on mny ordinary salary. The results hav been most gratifying. Skepticism tas given place to enthusiasm and the trustees are very willing to pay their share of the expenses. I have spoken of a bonus. This is a grant of $25.00 given on the recommendation of the inspector to those teachers of rural schools who hold the diploma for handwork and who teach the subject as a regular coursc in their setool. To obtain the diploma the teucher musi take a course of training at the Kelvin Tech nical ligh School. The term commences a the beginning of July and terminates abou the middle of August. The hours are fromn 9 a.m. to 12 at noon. The entrance fee i $3.00. This sum pays all expenses for th use of tools, material, etc. Having tad the experience of two courses, can speak in the very highest terms of th training given. All rural school teachers stould try an obtain this diploma. Tt not only entitles ther to a bonus of $25.00, their own private pro- perty, but it really gives then a higher stand- ing in their profession. Even though not re- quired to make use of their knowledge, other things being equal, teachers holding the dip loma have a much better chance of prefer- ment than those who do not do so. PRACTICAL WORK FOR RURAL SCHOOLS. Bv S. T. Newton (A Summary) So much has been written and so muet more has been said on teaching Manual Train ing in the rural schools, and so impractieaî has much of it proved that one hesitates tO offer further advice along this line, knowing the amount of work which the teacher is es pected to accomplish in an ungraded rural school. -Iowever, there is one Une of work whiarl tas not been over emphasized and that is par- ticipation in the actual work of the fari aiid home. For the boys. raising pure bred ctie3k eus and calves, growing potatoes and fhddet corn, and making chicen coops, exhibition crates, milking stands and bird houses. çor the girls, bread and cake baking, knittirg and sewing, canning and preserving. For over a quarter of a century it tas been an accepted principle that education te M effective must include the practical as welhoo the theoretie. For the ungraded rural tol with its numerous classes and wide variatofl in ages, this ideal tas been diffieult tbrig tain until very recently when some individual conceived the idea of again u ing the homely farm pursuits, of digni\u003cplae them and putting them on a iaer Plubs through the medium of boys' and girls' clbu by linking up the home and the setO s carrying out various projects and contes the home farm and garden under the dire and encouragement of the teacher anJ the assistance of varions other agenciesi,, as the Agricultural College, the Agricu Gro an Home Economics Societies, Grain ors' Associations, Boards of Trade, MuthieiPg 'ourdils. auJ above nîl, the parents bo selves. t ese $b By making membership in these r voluntary, encouraging a high standarlbu excellence, and insisting that the actuad ness connected with the club is coluea t the boys and girls themselves, thc Plan tbo appealed alike to parents, teacersu n a hildren thereby increasing productii quality, promoting purposeful thiulcng, t lessening school discipline. *n By interesting the boys and tirlh er s able home enterprises and giving the10 working interest in the farm, ee Ofen atta'1 elements in good citizenship tas and it ' . ed, viz., the feeling of ownershti f a in o e tendant responsibility, and the satisae wb knowing that te tas reached ttc stage lI someone tas confidence in tis abilit g e n willing to trust himi with somjetti'g Per",
         "BUSY WORK ilIg to the farm, even animais and chiekens and grains. That this mens rnanaging ability flot 01n1Y in producing the articles, but in mnarketing them as well, for the resuit of bis Wç'ork is to lie lis own to spend or invest as he sees fit. A, Prominent feature is the Fall Bovs' and Girls' Club Fair where these young 'agrieul- turjsts exhibit the product of their ski and eare, and are enabled to compare their skill *With that of contestants from a score of 0ther. schooîs in the municipality, and better stili, to mieet and get aequainted with the Pupils froin these sections. TPhe Boys' and Girls' Clubs have received the lie artY support of practically every interest 1in the Province. The Departments of Agricul- ture and Edlucation, fully realizing its splen- did Possibulities, are gi-ving eVery possible a\"\"\"stance. A large number of eompetitions havle.been provided, but the Agricultural Col- ! 9e i8 giving special attention to the follow- ing, iarnely: Parm mechanies, fodder corn 11owîn, Pig raising, potato growing, poultry maising, bread baking, sewing, and canning and preservilg. Carefuil plans and instructions have been prepared for the use of the pupil, and the Departnîent of Agriculture as a further en- couragemnent is supplying- a dozeil cggs froni a breed to lay strain of lieus to one niember of each family, 10 pounds of Irish Cobbler Potatoes, sufficient seed for the fodder corn experiment, and sufficient nmaterial for the cnnning and preserving contest, and sending judges to aIl the £airs, for it is readily seea that expert judges are as desirable here as at the agricultural societies, and if a boy or girl fails to win under these conditions, they will lie the first to concede the merits of the winner. Already the response has exeeeded expee- tations, ànd nearly 4000 boys and girls have enrolled in the varions contests in Manitoba, while it is estimated that full-v two million contestants iu Canada and the United States will lie engaged in thig new phase of practical education during the presemît summer. PRIMARY CONFERENCE MINUTES. ~TePrimiary Conferenee of the Mvanitoba Teachers' Association met YeduesdaY iuorning, April 7th. The 111etiu \\as well attended, there being 'llards Of two hundred persons pres- ent during the morning. ery iflteresting programme w-es * jOYed1 bY an appreciative and enthius- la.%tie uine M~iss Krauise's paper on \"Seat -work \" Was well received, and gave risc tOf COs discussion on a matter f ls ftercst to the primary teacher. lthe absence of Miss McLeod, lier Paper oui \" S u ppl m e ta y R ad ng an 4 neaders, la ~ Readin DrW.AndMe hitye, who alsoceontribjited a A.Mcr- hep i,9ving hsonviews and most The nsggestions on the subjeet. Grade l1denionstration of writing in Stee .an its explanation by Miss 18011s received the closest atten- tiýau 0d called forth both questions whi 15 St0eulsoil speaks witli authority r hj 10h i ply justified by lier success -'ae. igti subjeet. eusý'n werse taking part in the dis- SO8 eeMs R. Rodgers and esrs White and Whidenhamincr. On a motion by Miss Mildred Kelly, seconded by Miss Gladys, MeIntyre, a -vote of thanks was extended to the speakers of the morning, and the meet- ing ad.journed. M. L. Maclean, Chairman. BUSY WORK Annie Krause, Gretna The first few years at sehool are in my opinlon tlie mnost difficuit in a child's school if e. Before he cornes to sehool lie is used to perfect freedom of action, and sitting stili at lis desk is harder for him than most of us comprehend. It is easy enougli to keep his attention when iii the class but when the teaeher is busy witli other classes, what are the littie tots te (Io? Tliey will soon find ont if yen do net give thcm something thiat will k-eep their little minds and liands at work. We will see niaîîv different kinds of bnsyv w'ork among tîme sehool exhibits, se 1 will net give a detailed list of the different kinds of busy work but will try te explain the ends whiclî may be obtained throngli it, and by what rnians they are most readily attained. We should have a clear conception of tliese ends and ineans in order te lie successful. .Iust as the nrtist takes tlie dlay and by perserverance, tact an(l skill ho inoulds it into a beautiful statue, se it is with us. We have the raw material plnced in our liands and liv our judicieus busy work along the proper lines we lay pornmanently tlic foundation of the child 's scheol work for years te corne. But on the other bmand if such a foundation iq laidl b.v inîproper netheds it will have its",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL basis upon quicksand and will be a source of evil and detriment to the clild. Busy work should be related as much as possible to the work outlined for the primary grades in the programme of studies. For example, most children when they start school at the age of six are able to do little more than count in the line of number work Then give them objects to group (colored pegs are the most suitable) and let the child group them into l's, 2's, 3's, etc. This will prepare him to some extent for his first les- sons in the study of numbers. To prepare him for writing, write a letter or word on his desk with wet chalk and when it is dry let him outline it with split peas or any other flat seeds. Or mix split peas with melon seeds and let him put down one melon seed and three peas. etc. This will give him an idea of the form of the letter or word and make him count at the same time. After s child as learned several words, make a list of them on the blackboard and give the ehuld tickets with which ie can make the words on his desk. This will make him acquainted -with the fact that words are made up o different parts and will aid him in the study of phonies. Later the child may make words with printed tickets and this will be o great help to him when lie changes from script to printed reading. After telling a story, The Three Bears,'' for instance, give the child a piece of plasticene or paper and seissors and let him make or eut out of the paper di - ferent things that you told him about in the story. This will enable him to express him- self, elothe his ideas in concrete form, give body to spirit and form to thought. As \"Habit is three-fourths of life,'' wo sbould also through busy work try to culti- vate right habit in our pupils. By repetition of work this may be obtained. Care should be taken however that by repeating the work ie does not become automatic and mere meehanical labor. Such is the case many times, and more time is wasted foolishly along this line than in any other part of the school work. Here is where the teacher can use her ingenuity, to avoid the above mentioned error, and by changing the work in every conceivable manner it will bring forth re- petition and at the same time reasoning. Clear reasoning, accuracy and industry should be aimed at from the very start as they are the three principles of success. Good discipline is also obtained through busy work. A child from the time lie is able to sit up wants to be active. This eeaseless activity becomes greater as the child grows older. And when he comes to school, as long as you give him something to do, you will have no trouble with him. An Edueational Beatitude, by M. V. O 'Shea, seems to be very noteworthy here: \"Blessed are thiey who hunger and thirst after the knowledge of how to direct instead of suppress the spontaneous activities of childhood, seeking to transmute what is evil into good, for they shall make happy and competent and well-behaved children.'' Now to secure the above mentioued ends the uccess of the teacher xvili rest chiedly upoi, herself. She must be adapted for ber work and have a love for children, a knowledge of heir tastes, habits and capabilities. Of a oveless teacher Stephens says: ''It was ever a contest between teacher and pupils. She had no love in lier heart and no love. rose up to meet her. So lier days were filled with strife-the bad that was in her calling forth all the bad that was in her school-all of it concentrated against herself. We eau no more think of a good school without love than we can think of a home without love.'' Another way to success is by reading cur- rent educational papers. It is of great im- Portance that the teacher should keep in touch with carrent educational thought and progress. She must know what other teachers are doing. She should be able to select wiselY the work that applies to her own school and adapt it to the needs of lier pupils. Never fail to inspect the children's work carefully and to give a word of encourage- ment to those who have tried to do their work well. All untidiness should be dis- couraged. The time for one line of seat work should also be considered. Generally from ten tO fifteen minutes is long enough but this will depend entirely upon what kind of work your pupils are doing. The teacher will have to use lier ewn judgment in this. But care slould be taken not to waste time or make it tiresome to the pupils. Children's work should be displarcd in your schoolrooms as much as possitle. do will not only be an incentive for them te do their work well but will help to make Your rooms attractive. SUPPLEMENTARY READING IN THE FIRST GRADES. By Miss K. MacLeod The outline here presented does not preteud to set forth a method of teaching priInary rcading. It merely aims to make a few S gestions with regard to supplementary rel ing for the first grade. There are books which may be read t children and books which may be read by children. With the latter alone we are today concerned. Books may be read by childrad in class or out of class, they may bcer aloud or read silently. We shall have in mind during our discussion. .be Suecess in teaching reading is inP oo unless the teacher is systematic and th av in her teaching and unless the pupils abundant practice in actual reading. Systematie Instruction. *,t be overloo.- Systematie instruction eau not b eori ed. In the presentation of words for in the ing in the very earliest stages, an shot17 presentation of phonies, beginnig ShO",
         "SUPPLEMENTARY READING after the pupils come to school, the teacher Must have clear and correct methods. As a rule phonie instruction is not planned with suficient care, nor carried on long enough. To teach merely the values of the vowels and consonants is only to play with the game. Practice in Reading. No imatter how thorough the instruction in the nechanies of reading, pupils will not 'nake satisfactory progress unless they have ample practice in the actual reading of books. brill on detached lists of words is not en- Ough. For ehildren who relish ideas, a diet Of vords is distinctly unpalatable. Motive is laeking unless children are attracted by the content of the reading matter. When a pupil eels that he can find stories in books, he be- gins to take pleasure and to make progress la reading. Supplementary Work ot Blackboard. 1n the early stages of reading, before the ren are able to make independent use et books, the teacher must provide supple- ifitary reading matter, since no text-book i itself is enough. One of the easiest and hast thiugs t o is to follow the vocabulary aet me chosen text, to add to it somewhat, au to write original lessons on the board. lrsually the pictures in the text, taken singly rcelletîvely ily b , suggest themes that may eas- e developed. As soon as pupils have a pring knowledge of phonies, they may use Prthrs, of which there are many that are Worthy of Commendation. First Use of Reading Books The filrst use of these primers-outside of cl will be made when the books are hand- d eut te the children to look at. They may tura time put most of their time on the pic- rasy d1oking at only an occasional word. %n degrees they will begin to read the les- 1s th; and the teacher will see how true it a Children learn te read by reading.'' Choice of Readers n.aniaking a choice of readers for supple- seenitor b rPsess the following suggestions hi R a Y primers rather than a few OOSe primers with large type. 4 OOse Pritners with good illustrations. laet books with possible stories. rar Ae O the best primers an first readers ionablearieau. Sometimes thay have ob.jec- Canad1pages-tht is, objeetionable te us ns befor thns. These panges should be0 removed th upi books are placed in tha bauds et Th Adaptability tha e cher will always select the book thy e adapted te her neads. One reaso 5e f Ta r e. slfiet( Cou stactcorian Supplementary Readar is aition lury bcause it is so suitablo to aity Manitoba; a reas0 fr the pop eondit. Y Bs s beta se it is suited to the intelligence and the interests of ehildren everywhere. Variety It is necessary to have variety in reading mattei. If there is more than eue class in a room, there should be different readers for each class. When children sit at their seats and hear three or four classes reading the saine lessons, it is no wonder if they have little enthusiasm when it comes their turn to recite. There is nothing left for them to do. Work of First Year Nine or ten books are not too mnany te expect six-year-old children to read in class during the first year, if their attendance is fairly regular. As an example, already this year a little class of the most immature and irregular (some not six on beginning, and all absent for at least a month) have read the following books in class: Brooks' Primer, Bass' Primer, Cyr Primer, Stepping Stones to Literature, Playtime Primer, Manitoba Read- er. They will likely read three other books before the close of the term-probablys Art Literature, Book I., Wheeler I., and Victorian Supplementary. At seats they will read much additional matter. In the case of a class more mature, more books and more difficult books have been read. Among suitable books not already mentioned are Cyr's Graded Art Reader, Bunny Cotton-Tail, Alexandra T. Order for a Year It is sometimes asked how much can be done in a year, and how m.uch each term of the year. The following is a suggestion. Septeiber to Christmas- (a) Sentence and word study on blackr- board. (b) Gaines introducing all kinds of action words, names of colors, etc. (c) Reading lessons from blackboard. (d) After first month, regular phone study. (e) After first month, regular readimg from book in class. (f) After second nonth, reading from books for seat work daily. (g) After third month, very little word study except in phonie lessons. (h) After third month, not se many games necessary, but (c), (d), (e), (f) carried on daily. New Year's te Easter- (a) Blackboard reading lessons daily. (b) Phonie study daily and spelling of words. (c) Reading from books in class. (d) Reading from books in seats. (e) Word and sentence building at seats. Easter te Summer Vacation- (a) Occasional blaekboard reading lessons. (b) Phonie study daily. (e) More emphasis placed on spelling. (d) Rading froin books in class. (e) Reading from books in seats. (f) Writing words and sentences. This work applies only' to English-speaking children, and is net suggested for forcigners.",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL List of Books The following is rather a good list of primers and first readers for a library. These are the books which are to be used for seat work: Wide Awake Primer, Beebe's Picture Primer, Child Life Primer, Aldine Primer, Met- calfe-Call Primer, Riverside Primer, Art and Life Primer, Bender Primer, Beacon Primer, Outdoor Primer, Alexandra Primer, Brownie Primer (Baula), Reading-Literature Primer, Jingle Primer, Folk Lore Primer (Grover), Sprague Primer, New Sloan Primer. First Readers-Cyr, Graded Literature, Riv- erside, Metcalfe-Call, Aldine, Progressive Road to Reading, Books I. and Il.; Wide Awake; Reading-Literature, Free \u0026 Tread- well; Cherry Tree Children, Blaisdell; Bunny Cotton-Tail Junior, Smith; Folk Lore Read- ors, Book I., Grover; Sunbonnet Babies, Groev- er; Circus Reader, Jones; Seventeen Little Bears, Smith; Overall Boys. INTERMEDIATE CONFERENCE MINUTES Attendance.-This section was called to order shortly after 9.30 a.m., with an attendance of about 125. It is safe to say that this number increased till it passed the 200 mark, as every avail- able space was occupied. As an index of the popularity of this section, it suf- fices to say that large numbers of ladies and men were standing practically dur- ing the entire morning. SUM MARY Programme.-The programme opened with a paper on map drawing and map building. Owing to the unavoidable absence of Mr. Palmeter, of Neepawa, who had been request- ed to prepare this paper, Bro. Frank, S.M., of Provencher School, St. Boniface, kindly accepted to replace him. He handled the sub- ject in a very masterly way, giving some very practical suggestions on the manner of mak- ing the study of geography both interesting and concrete. After showing how the gen- eral contour of a country should be com- mitted to memory by reducing it to a figure bounded by straight lines, ho entered into detail regarding the manner in which a map should be finished in order to give it a pleas- ing and even artistic appearance. The man- ner of making relief maps was next outlined. The materials suggested for this purpose are plasticene, papier mache, elay and putty, the' last named being especially suitable for maps that are to be kept permanently, plasticene being preferred for ordinary school purposes owing to its plasticity and the facility with which the same material may be used over and over again. Donovan Norman, a pupil of Mr. Palmeter, was present to illustrate the manner of making a relief map with papier mache. The brave littie lad gave a brief ex- planation of the manner of preparing the ma- terial, and then proceeded to give an aetual demonstration by making the map of North Amnerica. After a brief discussion, Miss A. Johnstone, of Dauphin, read a most instructive paper on \"The Oral and Written Story and its Re- lation to Other Subjects on the Curriculum.'' The importance of the oral and written storY in language work was very ably demonstrat- ed, the habit of reading stories was discour- aged as the personality of the person relating the story adds greatly to the effeet. It wa s suggested that every teacher should become proficient in the art of telling stories. Inspec- tor Weidenhammer in his usual humoristiC vein gave a practical illustration of how a story should be effectively told. One of the teachers present gave an illustration of the efects of facial contortions in the telling Of a story. This was so realistically done that the audience jumped from their seats when the climax came. How to apply the course of drawing as out- lined in our course of studies was the sub- ject of the next paper. Bro. Henry Grenon, of Provencher School, St. Boniface, read this paper. The essentially practical and belpful character of this part of the programme was most evident from the fact that there was scarcely a person in the large audience whO did not have pencil in hand and take notes and figures as the lecture proceeded. It wa5 a real drawing lesson, given by a live teacher, who not only has the technical knowledge but who above all knows how to impart h5 subject to his class. The paper was divided into three parts: perspective, lettering and object drawing, and coloring. Discussion.-The discussions following the varions papers were very interesting, the laeC of time being the only reason why they ha'1 to be curtailed. Remarks.-It was suggested that if it eas the intention to continue the division of tbe programme into sections a larger room sheule hpe secured for the intermediate section as for accommodation was entirely in adequate those desiring to get admission. Suggestions.-A suggestion whic de b heartily endorsed by all present was made .)' Bro. Charles, S.M. of St. Mary's School, rnt nipeg, to the effeet that an exact time be g6 for the beginning of each paper so that geent desiring to hear different papers in differ sections might know how to guide themselv in making their selection of subjectg' would also obviate the difficulty and o anee of entering a rooin whilst a paper 1Oc progref and thus inconveniencing the sP ers.",
         "HISTOR1Y SENIOR CONFERENCE M IN UTPES AttendaînceThere wvere one hun- dred and twenty-six present during the session. 11\"ograinm~e.- Rapid and Mental ArihîntieMr. W. J. ilenderson, Dau- p1hin; Ilistory-Tiîne Relation and Im- Por1tancee of Dates Inspector A. A. Her- \"'Ott Gladstone; Our Aim and Method 0f presentation of \"The Lady of the Lake,\" Miss Card, Dauphin. IihsussiOn.-A large number of those P7reet took part in the discussion, M'hieh proved bofli livcly and .interest- iflg, More time could have been profit- abIy spent. There W-as flot sufficient time for the discnl\"sii11 Of Miss Card's. paper on Eng- lish. Ithink that. two papers and their dis- ion811 Would prove sufficient for one ses81011* T,%o hours is long enough to hold a mreetinig of such a nature. E. H. Walker. HISTORY A.A. HIerriott (A Sumnmary) le liglif Of present event s fthe subjeef of Y' has assumled a new andi fremendous anc'e to whicli 1 feel liardly able f0 tiVe Welae almost ey\u003ce witnesscs f0 heli making, and flic place of lis- Our sciools lias become more inmport- Veacliers h ave been urged f0 use fhis nade hisfory f0 revivify flic wliole ', and wliere fhis lias been dlonc flic re- 18 been fruit fui of beotter work. Oiry i, flic record of man's action and t i s Part and parcel of our scliool 11,ery- grade If is formally infro- Inl Grade V and carricd on info flie 3hools. acf as indi, 3Y and i diiuals, as Society, and as 1 are faes r as records of fliese ale resrvedwe aveHisfory. Witli triis races, Hlisfory is essenfially Od flihe process whereby flic frce- fI ran lias been atfained. In Britishi nadian 1{isfory evrfiîgma i about th'i' record. Hn ieeet te nmulesfones fliat mark fuis pro- toward flic freedomi of man. lafors agree fliat a sfudy of hisfory \"'l th folowllgresait s:- hechuîd lears thaf man is anmd acfs as lie chile liea ha flie nation is made up of individuals and acquires a proper sense of proportion between moniarli andî people. 3. The child sees fthe grnwtli of those institutions, flie home, the sehool, the state, the church, and appreciates themn. 4. The child learns the essential facts of- hinan aehievement. 5. The mind is triined to judge the iresent an\u003cl future by the 101sf. 6.* The youth is fitfed for the dunties of eit- izenship i n a self-govcrning country, and 7. Ilistory i's and sliould lie a greaf moral t eac h r. Teacliers are iirgcd to sec that onl . one of these seven resuits has f0 (Io aitli the infor- mation acquirel. and urgcd to keep this iii its proper proportion. Votor Hlisfory work miay lec securing several of the oflier results though if bcie nsuccessful in this one. ', Tinîe Relation a idc Im'portance of ,,ates'1' miglif le mnade to inelude ail hisfory, an1( have chosen to take this wider x iew. If cvery date recorded in our text books of~ Ilisfory conld lie so iipresseîl up1)t1e fic mcm ories of our pupils th af it wonld have its proper denotation and ifs proper connotation, we xvould have more hîsfory than we refluire in the grades representcd here. If onlY highly important dates were chosen as mi1cstones'; and characters, ce ents, reformns amd wars linkcd about thein; this mefliod. could bie well used, but flic abunse of a metliod frviing f0 make dates the strong points in yomir liistory would be f00 danigerous f0 reeomnîend. Eventfs arc infinitely more important flian ftle datec, gind a great deal of hisfory may 1)0 known witliouf any greaf aeeuracy as f0 flic date. The saune canniof lic said of tfme relation. li Ilisfory as iii ail sfory fliere is a fimoe order, a sequence of cause -and resulf witli- ouf which the result is spoiled. There is no beffer way of ouflining a lesson in Hfistory than (1) Cause; (2) Evcnfs; (3) liesuifs. (\u002bet it across f0 vour class in this waY ani flic lesson will lic alriglit. To illustrate mY position on fime relation against dates, fthc sequenee of events leading up to flic prescat w-ar is significant. The date is of no import- ance, but the filet fliat flic violation of Bel- gium 's neutrality i mnidi afely preeeded flic entrance of Great Biiain is vital. Our whole .justification linges licre. Time relation mnust 1)0 kepf cîcar and dates miay well 1)0 kept in flic background as uisefuil but inof essen- tially important. li closing I would repeat fliaf hisfory lias Cfler important v-alues besides fleic mpllrtillg of information, and fliese may well lie kept in mind. In lic heIistory course,; ia flic grades boere represelitcî if is wcll f0 keep iii minij fiaf flie record \u003cof ftmo process wliereby man bans \u003ciftained freedomi is a good guide iii seleet- ilig ploints to emphaîsizv. Keel flic fime re- Iifion elear and coneo properly prepared fo- feacli eachl lesson.",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL RAPID AND MENTAL ARITHMETIC IN SENIOR GRADES By W. J. Henderson (Summary) To-day we are concerned with Arithmetic and that division of the subject known as Mental Arithmetic. If we look in our pro- gramme of studies we see at the end of the course prescribed for the different grades this important note, ''Mental Arithmetic to be emphasized.'' There is also an examination in this subject at the end of Grade 8 work. As Grade 8 work is intended to be a review of work of previous grades it is in these lower grades that the foundation must be laid. There are two important reasons for teach- ing this subjeet, (a) Its utilitarian value, (b) Its value as discipline. Arithmetie holds the same relation to the public school pupil as the higher branches of mathematics do to the Collegiate and Univer- sity student. As regards the utilitarian value we might say that the number of arithmetical processes most people are called on to perform is very small. This includes fundamental rules, simple fractions, decimals, interest, per- centages, weights and measures. But we must remember that arithmetical facts are like food, it is nor the quantity but the assimilation that counts. It is not alto- gether a matter of how much arithmetic a boy learns but what sort of arithmetician he becoimes. With this thought in mind therefore we turn to mental arithmetic, and we laim that if arithmetical facts and processes are presented in a proper manner the utilitarian value merges into and is lost sight of in the higher, the power of reasoning. Speaking of the subject of mental arith- metic McLellan says, ''So far as arithmetic is concerned the principal work of the teacher in the public sehool is to practise the child- ren in Mental Arithmetic' And again, ''As compared with the effectiveness of written arithmetie alone mental arithmetic properly taught will give twice the power in a given time.'' Now what should we aim at in our teaeh- ing of mental arithmetie?-skill in the pro- cesses used, rapidity, accuracy, power to un- derstand what is not known but may have to be studied in the future, power to seize on the meaning of a question. The last mention- ed aims show the relation of mental to writ- ten arithmetic. The pupil by a series of mental questions is led .to see how a long complex problem may be resolved into a num- ber of separate problems, each of whieh is of a simple nature. Here T think is the key to ail successful teaching of written arith- metic. Or to put the matter another way, if mental arithmetic is weil taught,'a vast num- ber of the difficulties in the written work dis- appear as if by magie. Given a boy trained to rapidity of thought, accuracy and power to reason, and picture what will happen in actual business Inter in life, when he is called on to face a new situation. What methods are to be used to attain rapidity, accuracv, power to reason? There is no royal road, and the ends desired are reached only by patient, regular, and systen atic effort. There should be constant practice and drill on adidtion, subtraction, multipli- cation and division, using small numbers. For senior classes twenty minutes every day will (Io much more than spasmodic effort, saY thirty minutes one day, then no exercises for two or three days. ''Have pupils learn tO think by thinking-by using the faculties given to them for that purpose,-have thenf make use of their mental talent, so to speak, and not keep it lying dormant or perhaP5 buried. At first give questions requiring one effort of thought, pass on to those requiring two efforts of thought, and so on.'' Mental Arithmetic of real value to the pupil does not consist of exercises entirelY along the line of one particular rmie, but il rapid and irregular problems in several.. Be' fore working exercises in written arithmetie in any special rule give mental questions until pupils become familiar with the nature of the operations involved. Make oral questions e actly same as the written only shorter and with simpler numbers such as can be readilY held in the mind all at once. Used in this way mental arithmetic has a very decided value in that it concentrates the attention o the problem. Here are some methods and devices thatal would suggest for the teaching of Mentgl Arithmetic. As I mentioned before, give practice on tre simple rules. Then for any special rule pra pare the way for the written work by e ing up to it by simple oral problems. G erally have pupils take pencil and paper te erect in seat, while the question 1s dietate' Sometimes jot down the figures Of quSelsO on board, in this way assisting the pupl hold the facts in mind by the use of bis eyr Then wait a few moments, call for answ\"7j which have been put down by pupil8. co answer is correct count it s0, if not coo wrong. Allow no pupil to count an a correct unless it is down on paper. Gientf number of questions, occupying about te minutes time. Then pass around an ga e number correct or have pupils report. rto sone pupil who got a correct answe ,oie question give the solution. Talk over tion, explaining difficulties. before Or, sometimes dictate questions as boTO Pupils do not have pencil or paper. Te who gets an answer first gives it aloud.- \u0026P several answers, in order that others Wl rite trying after first answer is given. Thon crt on board name of pupil first obtaining certal answer. Keep on in this way until a cbrar,. number, say ten or fifteen names are o haje Each pupil strives to get bis or ber this list for the day. gaý0 Or, divide class into two sectionfs- r el a list of questions ready on board for C Keep list hidden until time to eCÏ do# Allow reasonable tine for pupils toP gliP answers only, on slips of paper. h cortet and correct and figure ont perceutage for each section.",
         "CLASSES 0F INSTRUCTION Aýgain, it is nesrvto have frequent Wiitteu examinutions la Mental Arithmetic. Tphj5 maIY le couducted înuch the samte wav as8 the ]ast exercise, simply distributo slips of Paper to cltir-e clu'ss. Uncover list of qnes- tioi5 set a tinte limit and at cuti of that time Colc'et slips, and cither correct in class or Mark Juter, treating it similurly to any other Oxlaminiationî As te difficulty et questions use ais a guide Prev0115 exainjuation papers. About flic tinte Our bepartmnent of Education dlecided to give 'Pecial attention to the sulijeet of mental ari'thmfetie, a list of questions wus sent out. Tlij5 list M'as to lie the standard of difficulty 0f EOtranc mental work. Then follow course, reerîbcd for different grades lu written arithmetie by our programme of studios, undt Rive Pleulty of simîlar work, usinig, as 1 have 'aid before, sinapler nmibers. As te a text-book, semne autimoritios sav fOlwthe soqueuce of somte book, otherwise the Course is apt to be disconneeted und witii Ou logieal mnethod. As tfar as umy ow îîrac- tie oneerned, J have net used uny text f0 any great extent, although there are two books Which I fiud very suitable te mny work. honeis bY Metelian \u0026 Anies, liased on 'Py h ofoo Numnber\"ý ly Dewey. Thei other la by Scott. Manly tintes, however, a good toxt woull Prove a great benefit, in this way, that it wVOflld Providie questions and preblents for Classes, ail raYmadIe as itwere, adwith- Oru sPecial effort on the part of fthc toachor. ti onconclusion, this subjeot dleserves atteni- 0as f8 Iproimotes concentration of mni aoia question and dlevelops reasouing I)(\u003eWer alu ýWith rait a'nd acduracy. Tbhe-se ar Othint\"J uitîo value ail through life, for what Whoi0 olU1iv-%iduial tends to lieudit tloe TMADPEESENTATION 0F 'filE LAl\u003eY 0F 'fiE LAKE ]\"y Mýi-s N. A. Card (A Snnîînurx) is' te a\" f OD.cmug literature in gomiorul s econd 0lld'PirSt, as a mental agent, andt e ,as a dleveloper of character antI inu C LASSES 0F à Singss flOOm was in charge of a% CO llidlay who iras ably assisted by st,rnra't0fe* There 'vas a continui W~e]l repaf i stors, ail o)f whoin 'vere rei C a for the tirne spent. Those (Ilere kep bus1y answcring t08-There 'vere samples of work t1Idn by tle Pliblîp selloolchlcnam eoYug 9poplc of the '11gl] Sehool. cidentalîx teacli or rex iew histoîv, geography nnd natutre studv. Ail literature is a mientalI agent if childrcu eau reproduce what flic reud-by telling the sterY, gix ing ehuracter hketehes, synopsis of a stanza or the tncan- xngý et a hune or coupler. This xviii dovelup cýlear-sightedncss and flic power to draw con- tlusions from n cuis. lu fthc second place the dcx elopmieut of eharacter eau bie lroduced freint flic tiferent eharacters in the seleetien cf literature studied]. Hlon does tbis apply to ''The Lady et the Lako'\"'? First, this poont has prebably leien put oii for gradles VII and VIII on uccotunt et ils thrilliug opisodes thut held the attention et flic class who arc just developing a tasto fer good literature and to give the pupil a per- inanent appetite fer rending. Heow mucli bet- ter it xveuld lie for the chiîdren et ouir towns if they weuld 1)0 surisficd ut finies, ut umîy rute, xvith a geod bock rather thani leekiug fer pleasuire clsewliere -where the influence is net se geod. It weuld gix c them a powe-r te discriminute the geod freint the bad aud a ceuscieus preference fer the geed, and if in the rcuchiug et iitcraturc the student (tees net acquire un engineering mind theîî there is somethîuig wrong in flic nethod et presen- tution. lut the developmncut et character thore is considerable scoîte in this pein, au'l atter al xvhat dees the bey or girl go te sehool for but te fit him te take bis place lu flic world anti[ iuake if botter by his preseitel Mental growth dees net ncccssarily do this se that a teacher has a furthcr-reaching influence flani lie ettemi unticipates. Thero arc tuaitnv ijualities thaf eue lie lirught eut lu flic char- acters ilepicteit ii '''fli Lady et the Lake,'' lut sîtace w'ill net pernit cf dletails, se a-e shahl just mention flic manlincss, bruvcry and caliincss etfflic Douglas: hew hoe accepted flic iievitulîle with goit gravo. The sut isfactien E'lcixi teck cuit et the little thiugs et lite anid the lriglit, geod hunier thut slîe earricd w-ith lier presencee. 'fliceruelty et Roerick, .vef lie nover luoks hnspifulitv, ovomi toa m foi', anul se xve miglit continue. The provess cf fcaovhing is slow, vet if xve have gainied a, lItflc cur- laliers have ret licou ii vain. INSTRUCTION ITt ncid p(l( 11a in seiving, fa ncyV Ne(vwi19. itijilliiit'y, (lotll-teStinIg. soap-testinig, iîîdry w',ork, and( iii fact ever «ything that w-as directIE' or iiidiretiN reatedl to lîcusekeepiug or sew-îng. One of thc inlost ilnterest ing fea tires 'vas th(c workl of a ls of littie girls frorn the( 'hlH- droei',s I butle 'vito w'ere deîniloîîstratînig w'crk iii p1 0111 sewig. T'Ie .Iourn il",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JIOURNAL hopes to bie able to shortly print one or two articles dealing with this work in dletail. Basketry.-Great interest was mani- fested by the teachers who were taking a short course in. this work. Wovcn mats, baskets, and bags in raffia and rattan were inclnded in the course. Miss MeKeuzie, of Winnipeg, was the instructor, and lier capable direction was thoroughly appreciated. Paper Work.-Miss Reid, of Brandon, conducted the lessons in paper cutting and paper folding. Quite a number of teachers attended and expres.sed them- selves as having received great benefit. Simple forms of folding and cntting wvere followed by more advanced work lu construction and design. Drawing.-The Drawing classes this vear under M1iss Hewitt have been very successful. One of the features in that beld on Wednesday morning was a class in texture work from Grade 3 in which the chidren expressed with their pen- cils the varions tones and effeets used in this work. Twenty-one teachers at- tended this class. That in the afternoofl wvas based upon perspective and had an attendance of 15. On Thursday morn- ing the Prineiples, of Design were shown, by use of a reflectorseope applied to various drawings of flowers, making the lecture vcry helpful and at- tractive. Twenty-six attended this class, making a total of 62 f or the ses- sion. This is a record attendance. Miss Hewitt will bce glad to help any teachers with their Art work by send- ing specimens of the required subjects. Sucli correspondence may be addressed to the Sehool Board offices, Williafl' Avenue. SOHOOL EXIIIBIT The report of the committee on prizes for the Sehool Exhibits was as fol- lows: Prizes for Graded Sehools 1. Sturgeon Creek. 2. St. Laurent. 3. Swan Lake. Britannia recoinmended for a special diploma. This was a very excellent exhibit but was outside the regulations goveruing the contest. Prizes for Ungraded Sehools 1. John Black. _ 2. Headingly. 3. Norris. The exhibit on the whole was of a higher type than that of last year. There were, however, fewer entrie8. Some of the contestants had not paidI close attention to the regulations 901' crning this year 's exhibition. Voulr committee bcg leave to suggest tht possibly a c]ass of contestants in graded sehools having more than four teacher8 Might bie arranged for, also that PeY' haps in the ungraded sehools 501ue, thing might be donc to encourage el\" tries from smaller rural sehools. These sehools under present conditions h'ale no chance at ail against the ýýag sehools situated near the citieS. D. J. Wright, Convener. 31u 1ofrucorut MAJOR JOSEPH McLAREN The first Manitoba teacher to give hi. life for King and country Feil at Langemarck, April 24th, 1915",
         "THE EDUCATOR MUST KNOW THE CHILD FINDING TIME BETWEEN DATES According - to most textbooks the firne between fwo dates is found by the foilowing niefhod: Let it be required to find the time frona August 16, 1906, to Fcbruary 12, 1910. Yr. Mo. Day. 1910--2 - 12 1906 - 8 - 16 3 - 5 - 26 This il calied compound subtraction. The fOliowing method of finding flie finie betwcen two dates, howcvcr, is flO W genieraiiy considcred as the proper fle: Let it be required to find the time from A'ýugust 16, 1906, to February 12, 1910. 1. Prom August 16, 1906, fo Augusf 16, 1909,3 years. 2. From August 16, 1909, to January 16. 1910-5 Mo. 3. From January 16, 1910, to Fcb- ruary 12, 1910-27 days. These thrce steps are so simple that pupils rcadiiy icamu them and a more accurate resuit is obtaincd than by com- pound subtraction. llowcver, tlie re- suifs wvili not vary more than two days in any problem. In problems wherc the days are counfcd across the end of a month of 31 days, as in the probicm above, flic resuif is more accurafe by one day; and in problems whcre flic days are countcd across fhe end of Pcb- ruary (in any ycar except leap ycar), the resuif is more accuraf e by two days. In ail other probiems flic resuifs ob- fained by flie above method and by compound subtracfion are flic saine.- Illinois Instruct or. THE EDUCATOR MUST KNOW THE C'HILD Ul. r, V w A r.Payne fells us, in lis \"'Lectures fl1 Teaching, flin f flic chuld, anid in1 our read- CIoe Work we have beeil saying OVer and Over witli a masteriy repefi- hi n at Wuild credif to flic auflior nbt-and realizing ifs full meaning g1fas inuch as flic scliooiboy wlio dll ei* \"The sun is 93,000,000 nu1ies 'S8tant, *and 866,000 milesinda hieter., a \u003e ircs lafc da What anirositahemind f the chid-and what a worid of cx- hece and endeavor in flic labor of Wing\"1 if! We realize this more and1 riore as flic y cars pass by and our nar- row ellipe hav I PeOf experie,.,e enlarge. We M thli gu t know our own 111nd8 yet. We cannof certainly fell Illder gie1fug-adia us to acf, w fhsane arewvilns until flic cir- iTistaces wven into olir iivcs. hale liad Iy attention calicd to Iflacour'gerM elemnents,, of chuld life, in Ctouse 0f illustrations and explan- af05Of CoînnîlOr things that I have been conducting for a number of years. For exampie, 1 enter a room containing 40 second reader boys and girls. Brighit faces and eycs full of happy an- ficipation greef me as I corne. 1 have a match, a glass jar, itnd two pieces of candie, one on a wire 'for lowering info fthc jar. 1 f alk to fhem a few mo- ments about flic match; find ouf liow many remember flic firsf fime thcy ever saw one lit; what if is good for; whaf if is made of; wliaf if wili do when J rub if across a rougli picce of stick, accidenfiy rub flic wrong cnd, find out why if docsn'f liglit, etc. Teachers, if you think flicre is nofli- ing for you fo learn during sucli an exercise, try if, and you wviil agrec wifh me f hat flicre is. You wiil flnd ouf thaf flic maf cl is made ouf of almost cvcrything fromn powdcr fo asafefida, and sonie of flic briglif littie girls me- meinher about blowing ouf a match when thcy wcrc oniy cigliteen inonflis Oid. Then, fo sec the inclination fo get",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOI, JOURNAL littie bits of miystery and illusion mix- cd uip in their explanations of simple phenomena! For tbem and with them, 1 wonder what inakes the caudle buru iu the air as it does; and theu we 3won- der what makçes it go ont when in the Jar, and there is always some fantasti- cal explanation given. We have heard, ever sinee our sehool days, that a child neyer learus to doubt until hie has been deceived; but cither our seven-year-olds have been grossly imposed upon, or our pretty maxim is not truc. Without touehmng the wiek, light the gas as it escapes from the uewly extînguished candie fiame; ask why it liglits aud hear those little doubters explain: \"'The fire fell off the match,' ''\"It lit the smoke,' ''\"It rau down the wire,\" etc. Truly, teach- ers, a terra incognita lies before us, but our Columbus has crossed over to its Indian shores, and we have ouly to push through the tropical jungles, aud subdue the littie savage intellects, feel- ings and wills, and civilization and en- lightenmeut will follow iu our wake. BOOK REVIEW The Journal is pleased this month to be able to recommend to its readers I'Nelson 's Ilistory of the War,'' a series of reasonably- priced books by Mr. John Buchanan, a writer of great skill and addrcss. This is no0 hurried computation, but a care- fully considered, well-informed and fiuely- written group of histories, forming a work that is at once reliable, philosophie, vivid, and more or less critical. The first number recounts the events of thE conflict ending with the fali of Namur; th( second deals with the stirring days £rom th( Battie of Mons to the German retreat to th( Aisne; and the third, 'which will be issuei by April 21st, will describe the Battie of th( Aisne and the principal movements dowu tý the f ail of Antwerp. The continuation of th, history will bc looked forward to by man, with interest, for it is a story of the wa told in a readable narrative. Good readinj for the preseut time, and an authoritativ record for the future. Every tcacher shoul, endleavor to possess the eoinp]ete series, whice mnay ho ohtained of Thomnas Nelson \u0026 8ow Tyrreil Building, 95-97 King Street Hasi Toronto. How to Carry Money The first consideratioli of intending travellers should be towards arrangiflg to carry their funds safely and in such a manner that they wvill be readily negotiable. With tile developmnent of banking facilities it has corne to be generally recognized that Travellers' Cheques afford complete safety, while at the saine time travellers who carry them ,vill find that they can obtain funds by this me dium in ail counitries which they rnay visit. These cheques wviIl be fouud most useful and coliven1- ent, as the exact amolint of foreigu money which wvill be paid in each coiuUi try is plainly stated on the face of the cheques, thus preventing loss iII eýç change and obviatiug the necessitY of providing oneseif beforehand with the currency of the country visited. Iu 0, few foreign countries a trifliug dedUc- tion is made for staînp duties. iBy re- ferring to the cheques the traveller cafl also ascertain the currency in use in the country through which hie is passiiig. These cheques, which are issued bY ail branches of the Canadian Bank\u003c Of Commerce, who have an off ice at 2 Loin- bard Street, London, E.C., are enciosed in a ucat leather pockzet case, occupyi119 no more space than a small purse, ail are accompanied by a bookiet in whicl is inscribed for identification the sigfla, ture of the purchaser, autheuticatedl by an officer of the bank. The book aiS0 contains a list of the banks and varous institutions where arrange mentS have beeîî made for their encashieflt, and to insure safety it should be carrîed il' different pockçet to that contaiiii1g tlle cheques. To the ave rage traveller is recolli rnended the purchase of $20 an~d$5 cheqes, itha small nuînber at $10 to provide a sufficieut currcncy fortb requirernents of a day or twoinal the sinaller foreign countries. charge for these is 50 cents per $10 which iii view of the facilitiesacod ris a rnost reasonable one. accorde 1 The cheques arc in sucli geucerai o htthey are cashed witbout hliesital h at practically ail large hiotels, a' wh 4,as o11 board ship), etc., aîîd thOSes1e bcarry thenm have invariably express their satisfaction throtigh thecir Ilse.",
         "___________ TUB WEURN( SOOOL JOUR~NAL DAY, MARTIN \u0026 PETTIGREW INSURANCE AGENCY Insurance, Loans and Investments 300 Sterling Bankc Bldg. WINNIPEG R.LAWSON \u002600. Insurance and Financial Agents 101\u003e Farmer Building WINNIPEG j ALLNKILLAM \u0026 McKAY INSURANCE BONDS eOIRTGAGE LOANS WINNIPR0 - MAN. IRy'm-AgerÀcy, Limited INSURANCE eldelity BoIds NOMdg 14. . 6138 C. Nf. Enderton \u0026 Co. Real Estate Investments Mortgage Loans Fire Insurance 228 Portage Ave. Winnipeg Phones : Main 413141»0. TELEPHI0NE MAN 8\"\" WILLIAMS-RAINEY COMPANY DONALDA BUILDING INSURANCE LOANS FINANCIAL AGENTS BRVDGES \u0026 WAUGH, LTD.) KEEWAYDEN BLOCK\u003c, PORTAGE AVE. IAST FP1RE9 Atlas Asrance Co. Calumot Intsunrinoe 0o. Commorelai. Union Afflurance (le. Oiiaodian Atisurance C'o. AOOIDENT Canada A'coldeut, AssuranceO Co. 0uar\u003clian Accident and Quaraittee Co. PLATrE GLASS Canada A.ccident Aitrance Co. Ouardiaij Aooldeit and,(uiarantee Ce. %gemeua. alePrh Rea l 5tate PHONS M 5LaniM. alles Ktnu, 'VUnt W01t, 6hoo4 4011ra1 whom wMltim Il, Adveitlêefm.",
         "THE WE1HTUN SCROOL JOURNAL Science Apparatus and the European War As ail Science Toachers are aware, Germany bas for years been the largest manu- facturer of science Apparatus, partieularly GlasswarC and Cbemicals. The War ini Europe bas thus entirely cut off the chief source of supply for such materiale, causing a temporary shortage. While it will be some' time bef are everything cati be satisfactorily replaeed-in tact, some articles may neyer be-you will be pleased ta kriow that we are manu- 'facturing a considerable number of Unes right iu Toronto, and have located firmu ini other couutrîes who eau supply Apparatus of a quality suitable for use in Canadian Edueational Institutions. We are, therefor ,e, in a position te taIse Pare of your requirements, and shall be g1ad to reeeive your orders or ta furnish quatations. Yeu are assured of prompt and eareful attention to your orders, and the utmont couqderation in regard to prices. Make up à list.qi the equipment you wi sh ta obtain, 'and give us an Opportuuity of proving Our service. If you have not yet obtained our 1914 Catalogue of Physical, Chemical and BioIogieal. Apparatum, writef or a eopy at once. THE QEO. M. HENDRY COMPANY, LIMITED EDUCATIONAL, EQUIPMENT' 215-219 VICTORIA ST., TORONTO, ONT. -Yeu ae notNOTE THE NEW proveent.S'anitary Standard -of the- DESK Thisi i.s the most important ininovation of recent years in connection with school deskS and does àay with the fancy dust-catchîflg and unianitary standards of the oid style. It places the Preston Desk on an cquality with any sanitary school desk made, with the added advantage of considerably lower price. Write us, stating yaur requirements and we wiIl gladly furnish a quotation. The Canadian Office and SchooI Furnitue Ce., Lido Preston, 00t. Kindly mention the Western School Journal when writlng to Advsrtlotre."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "1 electronic text.",
         "Monthly (except July and Aug.)"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg : Western School Journal Co., [1915]"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06770",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06770_95",
      "label" : "[Vol. 10, no. 5 (May 1915)]",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06770_95",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm"
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06770_95/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06877_314/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "doc" : {
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06877_314",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06877",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Scanned from a microfilm held by Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "label" : "March, 1915.",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06877_314",
      "title" : [
         "Educational review. : March, 1915."
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "note" : [
         "Monthly",
         "Index to Vol. XXVIII in issue for May, 1915, CIHM no. 8_06877_316."
      ],
      "published" : [
         "St. John, N.B. : publisher not identified, [1915]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
